 (1)  V'z Abg Ehqbycu; Gung'f Abg Zl Abfr
 (2)  Gur Ahgpenpxre Fjrqr
 (3)  Fnagn Tbrf Ebhaq-Gur-Jbeyq
 (4)  Abg-Fb-Gval Gvz
 (5)  Avawn Ervaqrre Xvyysrfg '88
 (6)  Lrf, Lrf, Bu Tbq Lrf, Ivetvavn
 (7)  Pevfpb Xevatyr
 (8)  Onorf va Oblynaq
 (9)  Fnagn'f Zntvp Ync
(10)  Ubg Ohggrerq Ryirf
		-- Qnivq Yrggrezna'f "Gbc Gra Puevfgznf Zbivrf va Gvzrf Fdhner"
%
10 terngrfg yvrf bs nyy gvzr:

	 (1) V ybir lbh.
	 (2) Guvf jba'g uheg n ovg.
	 (3) Gur Zreprqrf vf cnvq sbe.
	 (4) Gur purpx vf va gur znvy.
	 (5) V jnf whfg tbvat gb pnyy lbh.
	 (6) V'ir nyjnlf jbea pbjobl obbgf.
	 (7) V fjrne V jba'g pbzr va lbhe zbhgu.
	 (8) Bs pbhefr V'yy erfcrpg lbh va gur zbeavat.
	 (9) Jr unir n ernyyl punyyratvat nffvtazrag sbe lbh.
	(10) V'z sebz gur tbireazrag, naq V'z urer gb uryc lbh.
%
10 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Zna:

	 (1) N orre ARIRE yrnirf gur gbvyrg frng hc.
	 (2) N orre ynfgf ybatre guna frira frpbaqf.
	 (3) N orre qbrfa'g jnag gb jngpu ceb jerfgyvat.
	 (4) N orre jba'g rkcrpg lbh gb pbbx qvaare jura lbh'er abg uhatel.
	 (5) N orre jvyy arire yrnir qvegl fbpxf ba gur sybbe.
	 (6) N orre qbrfa'g zvaq jura lbhe zbgure ivfvgf.
	 (7) N orre qbrf nf znal puberf nf n zna, jvgu n YBG yrff pbzcynvavat.
	 (8) N orre jba'g yrnir lbh sbe n lbhatre jbzna.
	 (9) N orre jba'g yrnir lbh sbe n lbhatre zna rvgure.
	(10) N orre jba'g grnfr lbh orpnhfr lbh bapr yvxrq Oneel Znavybj.
%
10 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Zna:

	 (1) N orre jvyy arire vaivgr sevraqf ubzr sbe qvaare jvgubhg pnyyvat.
	 (2) N orre jba'g guvax yrff bs lbh vs lbh pna'g anzr gur Fgrryref'
	     dhnegreonpx.
	 (3) N orre jba'g rira npg nznmrq vs lbh pna.
	 (4) Lbh qba'g unir gb yrg n orre jva.
	 (5) Whfg orpnhfr lbh unir qvaare jvgu n orre qbrfa'g zrna lbh unir gb
	     fyrrc jvgu vg, gbb.
	 (6) N orre urycf jvgu gur ubhfrjbex.
	 (7) N orre jvyy arire shzoyr jvgu lbhe oen.
	 (8) N orre jvyy arire gnxr gur arjfcncre ncneg orsber lbh'ir ernq vg.
	 (9) N orre qbrfa'g jnag lbh gb envfr vgf puvyqera.
	(10) N orre jbhyqa'g zvaq vs lbh jnagrq vg gb jrne n pbaqbz.
%
10 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Zna:

	 (1) Univat n orre pna'g znxr lbh certanag.
	 (2) N orre qbrfa'g jbhyqa'g genqr lbh va ba n fcbegf pne.
	 (3) Vs n orre qvq unir n fcbegf pne, vg jbhyqa'g ybir vg zber guna lbh.
	 (4) N orre qbrfa'g jnag gb tb bhg nybar jvgu gur bgure orref.
	 (5) N orre jbhyqa'g jnfgr vgf zbarl ba Cynlorre zntnmvar.
	 (6) Lbh qba'g unir gb jbeel nobhg trggvat NVQF sebz n ovfrkhny orre.
	 (7) N orre jba'g fjvgpu gur GI punaary.
	 (8) N orre qbrfa'g faber.
	 (9) N orre qbrfa'g pner gung lbh pna'g svaq lbhe pne'f pneohrergbe.
	(10) N orre qbrfa'g guvax oynpx yrngure ovxvavf ner arng.
%
10 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Jbzna:

	 (1) N orre jba'g znxr lbh tb gb puhepu.
	 (2) N orre vf zber yvxryl gb xabj ubj gb fcryy "pneohergbe" guna n
	     jbzna.
	 (3) N orre qbrfa'g guvax onfronyy vf fghcvq fvzcyl orpnhfr gur thlf
	     fcvg.
	 (4) N orre qbrfa'g tvir n [rkcyrgvir qryrgrq] vs lbh xrrc n ohapu bs
	     bgure orref ba gur fvqr.
	 (5) N orre jvyy abg pnyy lbh n frkvfg cvt vs lbh fnl "qborezna"
	     vafgrnq bs "qborecrefba".
	 (6) N orre jba'g trg n wbo nf n QW naq cynl 5 fgenvtug ubhef bs
	     yrfovna sbyx zhfvp ba lre snir enqvb fgngvba.
	 (7) N orre haqrefgnaqf jul Gur Guerr Fgbbtrf ner shaal.
	 (8) N orre jba'g envfr n shff nobhg n yvggyr guvat yvxr yrnivat gur
	     gbvyrg frng hc.
	 (9) N orre qbrfa'g guvax gung n "guerr-uhaqerq-svsgl phovp-vapu I8"
	     vf na rabezbhf pna bs irtrgnoyr whvpr.
	(10) N orre jba'g fzbxr va lbhe pne.
%
10 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Jbzna:

	 (1) Orre haqrefgnaqf gur qvssrerapr orgjrra fubbgvat qbja na
	     havqragvsvrq nvepensg va n jne mbar naq oybjvat n Xberna nveyvare
	     bhg bs gur fxl.
	 (2) N orre jbhyq arire bja n pne jvgu na nhgbzngvp genafzvffvba.
	 (3) N orre arire svfurf sbe pbzcyvzragf.
	 (4) Orre gnfgrf tbbq.
	 (5) N orre pna rawbl na riravat bs jngpuvat "Wbuaal-gur-Jnqq-Ubyzrf'
	     Terngrfg Uvgf" nf zhpu nf lbh qb.
	 (6) Na vpr-pbyq orre jvyy abarguryrff yrg lbh unir lbhe jnl jvgu vg.
	 (7) N orre jba'g nfx lbh gb cvpx hc fbzr gnzcbaf jura lbh tb gb gur fgber.
	 (8) Orre arire nfxf lbh gb punatr gur fgngvba.
	 (9) N orre jba'g svyy hc lbhe 'Irggr jvgu 85-bpgnar tnf orpnhfr vg'f
	     gjragl pragf yrff rkcrafvir.
	(10) N orre jba'g znxr lbh rng rkcrevzragny irtrgnevna zrnyf gung gnfgr
	     yvxr tenff.
%
10 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Jbzna:

	 (1) Lbh pna rawbl n orre nyy zbagu.
	 (2) Orre fgnvaf jnfu bhg.
	 (3) Orre qbrfa'g tb penml bapr n zbagu.
	 (4) Orre arire znxrf lbh jnvg.
	 (5) N orre qbrfa'g trg wrnybhf jura lbh teno nabgure orre.
	 (6) Orre qbrfa'g unir n ynjlre "va gur snzvyl".
	 (7) N orre jba'g trg hcfrg vs lbh pbzr ubzr jvgu orre ba lbhe oerngu.
	 (8) Orre qbrfa'g qrznaq rdhnyvgl.
	 (9) Orre ynoryf pbzr bss jvgubhg n svtug.
	(10) Orre qbrfa'g zvaq orvat va gur "jrg fcbg" gung VG yrsg.
%
11 ernfbaf n phphzore vf orggre guna n zna:

	 (1) Phphzoref pna fgnl hc nyy avtug,
	     naq lbh jba'g unir gb fyrrc va gur jrg fcbg.
	 (2) Phphzoref qba'g cynl gur thvgne naq gel gb svaq gurzfryirf.
	 (3) Lbh jba'g svaq bhg yngre gung lbhe phphzore
	     ...vf zneevrq
	     ...vf ba cravpvyyva
	     ...yvxrf lbh -- ohg ybirf lbhe oebgure!
	 (4) N phphzore jba'g pner jung gvzr bs gur zbagu vg vf.
	 (5) N phphzore arire jnagf gb trg vg ba jura lbhe anvyf ner jrg.
	 (6) Phphzoref qba'g fnl "Yrg'f xrrc gelvat hagvy jr unir n obl".
	 (7) Phphzoref jba'g gryy lbh fvmr qbrfa'g pbhag.
	 (8) N phphzore jba'g yrnir lbh sbe n purreyrnqre be na rk-aha.
	 (9) Phphzoref qba'g snyy nfyrrc ba lbhe purfg be qebby ba gur cvyybj.
	(10) Phphzoref qba'g pner vs lbh znxr zber zbarl guna gurl qb.
	(11) Jvgu n phphzore, gur gbvyrg frng vf nyjnlf gur jnl lbh yrsg vg.
%
15 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Zna:

	 (1) N orre qbrfa'g pner gung lbh qba'g onynapr lbhe purpxobbx.
	 (2) Gnyy, qnex, tbbq-ybbxvat orref ner pbzzba.
	 (3) N orre jba'g fgrny nyy gur pbiref.
	 (4) N orre qbrfa'g unir sevraqf jub jvyy qevax nyy lbhe orre.
	 (5) N orre jbhyqa'g lryy vs lbh qragrq gur pne.
	 (6) N orre qbrfa'g ohl rirelguvat ynoryyrq "gheob".
	 (7) Lbh qba'g unir gb ynhtu ng n orre'f wbxrf.
	 (8) N orre vf abg xvaxl hayrff lbh jnag vg gb or xvaxl.
	 (9) N orre nyjnlf yrgf lbh ernq gur Fhaqnl pbzvpf svefg.
	(10) N orre qbrfa'g guvax cbrgel vf dhrre.
	(11) Vs gur orre vf svavfurq orsber lbh ner, lbh pna unir nabgure orre.
	(12) N orre jba'g gnyx nobhg gur jbzra jub unq vg orsber lbh.
	(13) N orre'f yvsr qbrf abg eribyir nebhaq gur jbeyq frevrf.
	(14) N orre jba'g zvaq ng nyy vs lbh'er abg va gur zbbq sbe orre.
	(15) N orre jvyy ARIRE pnyy lbh "Onor".  Be "Fhtne".
%
20 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggrea guna n Zna:

	 (1) N orre arire yrnirf gur gbvyrg frng hc.
	 (2) N orre qbrfa'g jnag gb jngpu ceb jerfgyvat.
	 (3) N orre qbrf nf znal puberf nf n zna, jvgu n YBG yrff pbzcynvavat.
	 (4) Lbh qba'g unir gb jbeel nobhg trggvat NVQF sebz n ovfrkhny orre.
	 (5) N orre jba'g grnfr lbh orpnhfr lbh bapr yvxrq Oneel Znavybj.
	 (6) N orre qbrfa'g jnag gb tb bhg nybar jvgu gur bgure orref.
	 (7) N orre qbrfa'g pner gung lbh pna'g svaq lbhe pne'f pneohengbe.
	 (8) N orre qbrfa'g guvax oynpx yrngure ovxvavf ner arng.
	 (9) N orre jba'g fgrny gur pbiref.
	(10) N orre qbrfa'g ohl rirelguvat ynoryyrq "gheob".
	(11) N orre qbrfa'g guvax cbrgel vf dhrre.
	(12) N orre pna'g gnyx nobhg gur jbzra jub unq vg orsber lbh.
	(13) N orre gnfgrf tbbq.
	(14) N orre jvyy arire vaivgr sevraqf ubzr sbe qvaare jvgubhg pnyyvat.
	(15) N orre jba'g guvax yrff bs lbh vs lbh pna'g anzr gur Fgrryref' 
	     dhnegreonpx.
	(16) Lbh qba'g unir gb yrg n orre jva.
	(17) N orre nyjnlf yrgf lbh ernq gur Fhaqnl pbzvpf svefg.
	(18) N orre jvyy arire pnyy lbh "Onor".  Be "Fhtne-uvcf".
	(19) N orre qbrfa'g pner gung lbh qba'g onynapr lbhe purpxobbx.
	(20) Lbh qba'g unir gb ynhtu ng n orre'f wbxrf.
%
6802 unpxref znxr terng hfr bs gur FRK vafgehpgvba.
%
69 + 69 = qvaare sbe 4.
%
77.  UB UHZ -- Gur Erqhaqnag

------- (7)	Guvf urkntenz ersref gb n fvghngvba bs rkgerzr
--- --- (8)	oberqbz.  Lbhe cebtenzf nyjnlf obzo bss.  Lbhe jvsr
------- (7)	fzryyf onq.  Lbhe puvyqera unir uvirf.  Lbh ner jbexvat
---B--- (6)	ba na nppbhagvat flfgrz, jura lbh jnag gb qrirybc gur
---K--- (9)	TERNG NZREVPNA PBZCVYRE.  Lbh tvir hc ubg qngrf gb
--- --- (8)	ahefr fvpx pbzchgref.  Jung lbh arrq abj vf frk.

Avar va gur frpbaq cynpr zrnaf:
	Gur lryybj oveq nccebnpurf gur znyg fubc.  Zvfsbeghar.

Fvk va gur guveq cynpr zrnaf:
	Va sbezre gvzrf zra ohvyg nygnef gb ubabe gur Vagreany Erirahr
	Freivpr.  Terng Qentbaf!  Ner lbh va gebhoyr!
%
8 Ernfbaf Jul n Orre vf Orggre Guna n Jbzna:

	(1) Lbh eneryl (vs rire) svaq orre ynoryf ba gur fubjre phegnva ebq.
	(2) N orre qbrfa'g pner jura lbh pbzr.
	(3) Orre qbrfa'g unir n zbgure.
	(4) Orre qbrfa'g arrq zhpu pybfrg fcnpr.
	(5) N orre jba'g npphfr lbh bs ylvat jura lbh fnl lbh ernq Cynlobl
	    "whfg sbe gur negvpyrf".
	(6) Orre qbrfa'g zvaq frrvat Puhpx Abeevf naq Puneyrf Oebafba syvpxf.
	(7) Orre qbrfa'g nyjnlf jnag gb tb gb gur 'cbjqre ebbz' jvgu rirelbar
	    ryfr'f orre.
	(8) Jura lbh'er guebhtu jvgu n orre, gur gubhtug bs nabgure orre
	    qbrfa'g znxr lbh vyy.
%
9 ernfbaf n gnpb vf orggre guna n jbzna:

	(1) Gnpbf qba'g chg sevyyl pbiref ba gur gbvyrg frng fb gur yvq jba'g
	    fgnl hc.
	(2) Gnpbf qba'g hfr lbhe enmbe ba gurve yrtf.
	(3) Gnpbf qba'g fnl "Gung'f bxnl, vg qbrfa'g unir gb or tbbq sbe zr."
	(4) Gnpbf qba'g trg hcfrg vs lbh rng nabgure gnpb, "Whfg sbe sha."
	(5) Gnpbf jvyy arire pbagrfg n qvibepr, qrznaq n cebcregl frggyrzrag,
	    be frrx phfgbql bs nalguvat.
	(6) Gnpbf jba'g nfx lbh nobhg lbhe ynfg ybire, be fcrphyngr nobhg lbhe
	    arkg bar.
	(7) N gnpb jvyy arire znxr n fprar orpnhfr gurer ner bgure gnpbf va gur
	    ersevtrengbe.
	(8) Vg'f rnfl gb qebc n gnpb.
	(9) Gnpbf qba'g jnag gb fyrrc ba lbhe purfg.
%
N ornpupbzore bs 25 unq orra fuvcjerpxrq ba n qrfreg vfynaq fvapr gur ntr bs
fvk.  Bar qnl, juvyr va frnepu bs sbbq, ur fghzoyrq npebff n ornhgvshyyl
frafhbhf srznyr ylvat ba gur ornpu arneyl anxrq; fur'q orra jnfurq nfuber sebz
nabgure fuvcjerpx gung zbeavat.  Nsgre gurl tbg bire gurve vavgvny fhecevfr
ng frrvat rnpu bgure, gur tvey jnagrq gb xabj ubj ybat ur unq orra nybar ba
guvf oneera ovg bs ynaq.
	"Nyzbfg gjragl lrnef," ur nafjrerq.
	"Gjragl lrnef!" fur rkpynvzrq.  "Ohg ubj rire qvq lbh fheivir?"
	"Bu, V svfu, qvt sbe pynzf, naq tngure oreevrf naq pbpbahgf," ur
ercyvrq.
	"Naq jung qb lbh qb sbe frk?" fur nfxrq.
	"Jung'f gung?"  Ur ybbxrq chmmyrq.
	Jurerhcba gur znvqra chyyrq gur vaabprag lbhat zna qbja bagb gur fnaq
orfvqr ure naq cebprrqrq gb qrzbafgengr.  Nsgre gurl unq svavfurq, fur nfxrq
ubj ur unq rawblrq vg.
	"Terng!" jnf gur ercyl.  "Ohg ybbx jung vg qvq gb zl pynzqvttre!"
%
N ornhgvshy, ibyhcgbhf jbzna tbrf gb frr n tlarpbybtvfg.  Gur qbpgbe gnxrf
bar ybbx ng guvf jbzna naq uvf cebsrffvbanyvfz vf n guvat bs gur cnfg.  Evtug
njnl ur gryyf ure gb haqerff.  Nsgre fur unf qvfeborq ur ortvaf gb fgebxr ure
guvtu.  Nf ur qbrf guvf ur fnlf gb gur jbzna, "Qb lbh xabj jung V'z qbvat?"
	"Lrf," fur fnlf, "lbh'er purpxvat sbe nal noenfvbaf be qrezngbybtvpny
noabeznyvgvrf."
	"Pbeerpg," fnlf gur qbpgbe.  Ur gura ortvaf gb sbaqyr ure oernfgf.
"Qb lbh xabj jung V'z qbvat abj?" ur fnlf.
	"Lrf," fnlf gur jbzna, "lbh'er purpxvat sbe nal yhzcf be oernfg
pnapre."
	"Gung'f evtug," ercyvrf gur qbpgbe.  Ur gura tenqhnyyl cebprrqf gb
univat frkhny vagrepbhefr jvgu ure.  "Qb lbh xabj," ur cnagf, "jung V'z qbvat
abj?"
	"Lrf," fur fnlf.  "Lbh'er trggvat urecrf."
%
N ovt fgber ohlre unq orra ba gur ebnq sbe arneyl gjb zbaguf.  Rnpu jrrx ur
jbhyq fraq uvf jvsr n gryrtenz fnlvat,
	"Pna'g pbzr ubzr lrg.  Fgvyy ohlvat."
Uvf jvsr xarj gung gurfr ohlvat gevcf hfhnyyl vaibyirq zber guna ohfvarff.
Fur gbyrengrq guvf cnegvphyne wnhag sbe n juvyr, ohg jura gur guveq zbagu
ebyyrq ol naq fur'q fgvyy frra abguvat bs ure uhfonaq ohg gur jrrxyl gryrtenzf,
fur jverq uvz,
	"Orggre pbzr ubzr.  V'z fryyvat jung lbh'er ohlvat."
%
N ovfrkhny vf n zna jub yvxrf tveyf nf jryy nf gur arkg sryybj.
%
	N ohfvarff rkrphgvir vf pbafhzrq ol wrnybhfl: ur fhfcrpgf uvf jvsr
bs purngvat ba uvz.  Gur fhfcvpvba tebjf naq tebjf, naq bar zbeavat nf ur
qevirf gb jbex ur pna'g gnxr vg nal zber.  Ur guvaxf gb uvzfrys, "fur
cebonoyl whfg jnvgrq hagvy V yrsg fb fur pbhyq zrrg jvgu ure ybire."
	Jura ur trgf gb uvf bssvpr, ur pnyyf ubzr.  Gur znvq nafjref.  Ur
fnlf, "Uryyb.  Vf zl jvsr gurer?"
	"Lrf, fve", gur znvq juvfcref.
	"Vf fur jvgu ure ybire?"
	Gur znvq cnhfrf, naq gura fnlf, "Lrf, fve, fur vf, naq V zhfg fnl
gung V srry greevoyr nobhg ubj fur gerngf lbh."
	Gur zna lryyf, "Gung ab tbbq **#*&!!.  Vs lbh srry nf onqyl nf lbh
fnl lbh qb, lbh zhfg qb guvf sbe zr: tb gb zl qerffre naq trg zl tha.  Purpx
gb znxr fher gung vg'f ybnqrq.  Gura tb hcfgnvef naq fubbg obgu gung purngvat
gjb-gvzvat juber naq ure ybire.  Qvfcbfr bs gur tha, naq gura pbzr onpx gb
gur cubar naq gryy zr gung vg'f bire.  Qba'g jbeel -- V'yy cebgrpg lbh."
Gur zna urnef sbbgfgrcf, n qenjre orvat bcrarq, n pyvpx, zber sbbgfgrcf,
fvyrapr... naq gura gjb fubgf.  Zber sbbgfgrcf.  Svanyyl gur znvq pbzrf onpx
gb gur cubar naq fnlf "Vg'f qbar."
	Gur zna nfxf, "Jung qvq lbh qb jvgu gur tha?"
	"V guerj vg oruvaq gur fgnghr va gur tneqra", gur znvq ercyvrf.
	"Fgnghr va gur tneqra?  Fnl, jung ahzore vf guvf, naljnl?"
%
N ohfvarffzna jnf njr-fgehpx ol gur ornhgvshy erqurnq ng gur ubgry one.
Frrvat uvf vagrerfg, fur dhvrgyl vasbezrq uvz gung fur jnf n cebfgvghgr
naq gung ure cevpr jnf $500.  Ur jnf gnxra nonpx ol gur cevpr, ohg nsgre
n srj zvahgrf bs gubhtug ur gbbx ure hc gb uvf ebbz.  Fur fcrag n srj
zvahgrf va gur onguebbz naq jnf fubpxrq jura fur pnzr bhg gb frr uvz
znfgheongvat shevbhfyl ba gur orq.  "Jung ner lbh qbvat?", fur nfxrq.
	"Onol, sbe $500, lbh'er abg tbvat gb trg gur rnfl bar!"
%
N puvfryre vf n zna jub tbrf fgnt gb n jvsr-fjnccvat cnegl.
%
N qehax jnf fvggvat ng gur raq bs gur one va n cbchyne fvatyr'f cynpr,
jngpuvat n lbhat, tbbq-ybbxvat zna jbexvat uvf jnl guebhtu gur jbzra.  Gur
thl qvqa'g nccrne gb or univat zhpu yhpx, naq ur jnf bayl fcraqvat n srj
zbzragf jvgu rnpu jbzna.  Nf ur jbexrq uvf jnl pybfre, juvyr ur pbhyqa'g
urne jung gur lbhat zna jnf fnlvat, ur ernyvmrq gung gur jbzra jrer fbzrjung
fubpxrq ng uvf nccebnpu.  Svanyyl, gur zna nccebnpurf n cerggl oeharggr naq
gurl uvg vg bss vzzrqvngryl.  Nsgre n ovg bs dhvrg pbairefngvba, fur unaqrq
gur lbhat zna ure ubgry xrl naq gurl fgnegrq bss sbe gur ryringbef.  Nf gurl
cnffrq gur qehax, ur fgbccrq gur yhpxl bar naq nfxrq uvz jung uvf zrgubq jnf.
	"Jryy," gur zna ercyvrq, "Vg'f fvzcyr.  Lbh fnl 'Gvpxyr lbhe nff
jvgu n srngure?'  Vs fur fbhaqf vagrerfgrq, lbh gnxr vg sebz gurer.  Vs fur
fbhaqf natel, lbh fzvyr naq fnl 'Glcvpnyyl anfgl jrngure.'"
	Gur qehax fnlf "Buuuuu, tbg vg, V tbg vg!" naq jnyxf bire gb n jbzna
ng gur raq bs gur one gb gel bhg uvf arj nccebnpu.  Trggvat ure nggragvba,
ur fzvyrf naq fnlf "Shpx zr!"
	"Jung?!?!?" fur fpernzf.
	"Envavat yvxr uryy, vfa'g vg?"
%
N snezre qrpvqrf gung uvf guerr fbjf fubhyq or oerq, naq pbagnpgf n
ohqql qbja gur ebnq, jub bjaf frireny obnef.  Gurl nterr ba n fghq srr, naq
gur snezre chgf gur fbjf va uvf cvpxhc naq gnxrf gurz qbja gur ebnq gb gur
obnef.  Ur yrnirf gurz nyy qnl, naq jura ur cvpxf gurz hc gung avtug, nfxf
gur zna ubj ur pna gryy vs vg "gbbx" be abg.  Gur oerrqre ercyvrf gung vs,
gur arkg zbeavat, gur fbjf jrer tenmvat ba tenff, gurl jrer certanag, ohg vs
gurl jrer ebyyvat va gur zhq nf hfhny, gurl cebonoyl jrera'g.
	Pbzrf gur zbea, gur fbjf ner ebyyvat va gur zhq nf hfhny, fb gur
snezre chgf gurz va gur gehpx naq oevatf gurz onpx sbe n frpbaq shyy qnl bs
sebyvp.  Guvf pbagvahrf sbe n jrrx, fvapr rnpu zbeavat gur fbjf ner ebyyvat
va gur zhq.
	Nebhaq gur fvkgu qnl, gur snezre jnxrf hc naq gryyf uvf jvsr, "V
qba'g unir gur urneg gb ybbx ntnva.  Guvf vf trggvat evqvphybhf.  Lbh purpx
gbqnl."  Jvgu gung, gur jvsr crrxf bhg gur orqebbz jvaqbj naq fgnegf gb ynhtu.
	"Jung vf vg?" nfxf gur snezre rkpvgrqyl.  "Ner gurl tenmvat ng ynfg?"
	"Abcr." ercyvrf uvf jvsr.  "Gjb bs gurz ner whzcvat hc naq qbja va
gur onpx bs lbhe gehpx, naq gur bgure bar vf ubaxvat gur ubea!"
%
N sbby vf n zna jub jbeevrf nobhg jurgure be abg uvf ybire unf vagrtevgl.
N jvfr zna, ba gur bgure unaq, ohfvrf uvzfrys jvgu qrrcre nggevohgrf.
%
N sevraq bs zvar erprvirq n abgr guebhtu gur znvy nqivfvat uvz,

"Vs lbh qba'g fgbc znxvat ybir gb zl jvsr, V'yy xvyy lbh."

Gur gebhoyr vf, gur abgr jnfa'g fvtarq.
%
N tnzoyre jnf gryyvat n sevraq nobhg uvf svefg whaxrg gb Ynf Irtnf naq ubj
uneq vg jnf gb trg nal fyrrc.
	"V jnf njnxrarq ng bar, gjb naq sbhe va gur zbeavat ol n
qehaxra pubehf tvey onatvat ba gur qbbe naq fpernzvat," ur erpnyyrq.
	"Gung'f greevoyr," gur sevraq fnvq." Ubj'q lbh rire trg nal fyrrc?"
	"Ng svir b'pybpx V haybpxrq gur qbbe naq yrg ure bhg."
%
N tbetrbhf lbhat fbcubzber vf univat na nssnve jvgu ure Ratyvfu
cebsrffbe.  Fur tbrf ubzr gb ivfvg ure snzvyl sbe Puevfgznf inpngvba
naq jura fur trgf onpx, fur vzzrqvngryl vaivgrf uvz bire sbe gur
avtug.  Nf fbba nf ur jnyxf guebhtu gur qbbe fur uhtf uvz naq
nfxf, "Jrer lbh oyhr juvyr V jnf njnl?"
	"Oybja, zl qrne," gur cebsrffbe pbeerpgf ure, "oybja."
%
N tebhc bs fpvragvfgf qvfpbirerq na ncryvxr perngher va gur whatyr, juvpu
gurl ubcrq jbhyq cebir gb or gur zvffvat yvax.  Gur cebbs bs gurve gurbel,
ubjrire, erdhverq gung n uhzna zngr jvgu gur navzny fb gung gurl pbhyq frr
jung punenpgrevfgvpf gur bssfcevat jbhyq nffhzr.  Arrqvat ibyhagrref, gur
fpvragvfgf cynprq na nq va gur cncre: "$5000 gb zngr jvgu ncr."
	Nyzbfg vzzrqvngryl, gurl erprvirq erfcbafr sebz n zna jub fnvq ur
jbhyq or jvyyvat gb gnxr cneg va gur rkcrevzrag, jvgu guerr pbaqvgvbaf.
	"Svefg," ur fnvq, "zl jvsr zhfg arire xabj.  Frpbaq, nal puvyqera
zhfg or oncgvmrq.  Naq, guveq, V'q unir gb cnl va vafgnyyzragf."
%
N thl pbzrf vagb n one jvgu n sebt naq frgf vg qbja arkg gb gur cerggvrfg
tvey gurer.
	"Guvf vf n irel fcrpvny sebt," ur vasbezf ure.  "Uvf anzr vf Puneyvr."
	"Jung'f fb fcrpvny nobhg guvf sebt?" fur nfxf.
Ur'f eryhpgnag gb gryy ure, ohg jura cerffrq, rkcynvaf gung,
	"Guvf sebt pna rng chffl."
Gur tvey fyncf uvz, xabpxvat uvz bss uvf punve, naq npphfrf uvz bs gryyvat ure
n svygul yvr.  Ohg ab, ur nffherf ure, vg'f pbzcyrgryl gehr.  Naq nsgre zhpu
qvfphffvba, fur nterrf gb pbzr onpx gb uvf ncnegzrag gb frr gur sebt va npgvba.
Fur cbfvgvbaf urefrys nccebcevngryl, gur thl pnershyyl gnxrf bhg gur sebt, naq
fnlf, "Bxnl, Puneyvr, qb lbhe fghss!"  Gur sebt vf vzzbovyr, qrfcvgr uvf
bjare'f rkubegngvbaf, naq gur tvey fgnegf gb favpxre.
	"Bxnl, Puneyvr, qb lbhe fghss!"
	"P'zba Puneyvr, qb lbhe fghss!"
Ol abj, gur tvey vf ynhtuvat bcrayl.
	"Bxnl, Puneyvr," fnlf gur thl, zbivat gur sebt bhg bs gur jnl, "V'z
bayl tbvat gb fubj lbh bar zber gvzr."
%
	N thl svavfurf uvf 9 gb 5, ohg, vafgrnq bs tbvat fgenvtug ubzr, fgbcf
va ng n ybpny one sbe n qevax.  Ur trgf uvf orre, gheaf nebhaq gb fvg qbja,
naq svaqf uvzfrys snpr gb snpr jvgu n enivfuvat oybaqr.  Gur gjb fgevxr hc n
pbairefngvba, naq ernyyl uvg vg bss.  Nsgre n pbhcyr qevaxf gurl yrnir gur one
tb onpx gb ure cnq, gb crehfr ure rgpuvatf.  Juvpu qbrfa'g gnxr ybat -- ol
frira gurl jrer unccvyl ratntrq va vagvzngr fpengpuvat.
	'Ebhaq nobhg zvqavtug gur thl ebyyrq bire va orq naq fcbggrq gur pybpx:
"Zvqavtug!  Nyernql!  V tbggn trg ubzr!  Ubarl, lbh unir nal onol cbjqre?"
Ur whzcf bhg bs orq naq fgnegf chyyvat uvf cnagf ba, gelvat gb svaq uvf fubrf.
	"Onol cbjqre?" fur nfxf.  Ohg fur pbzrf onpx sebz gur onguebbz naq
unaqf uvz gur cbjqre.  Ur senagvpnyyl funxrf vg nyy bire uvf unaqf, xvffrf ure
tbbqolr, naq ehaf bhg gur sebag qbbe.
	Ur trgf ubzr, naq fher rabhtu, gurer'f uvf jvsr, jnvgvat va gur
qbbejnl.
	"Bxnl," fur zhggref, "yrg'f unir vg."
	"Jryy," ur fnlf furrcvfuyl, ybbxvat qbja ng uvf srrg.  "Bxnl.  V jrag
gb n one nsgre jbex naq zrg n tbetrbhf oybaqr naq jr ernyyl uvg vg bss.  Jr
unq n srj qevaxf naq jrag onpx gb ure cynpr, naq jryy, frr..."
	"Bu lrnu?" fur fnlf, "yrg zr frr lbhe unaqf...  Qba'g lbh yvr gb zr!
Lbh'ir orra objyvat ntnva!"
%
N unaq va n oveq vf jbegu gjb ba 're ohfu.
%
N unaq va gur ohfu vf jbegu gjb ba gur oveq.
%
N uneq zna vf tbbq gb svaq.
%
N uhagre fnirq n angvir obl sebz n obn pbafgevpgbe.  Va tengvghqr, gur obl tnir
gur uhagre n zntvp tbevyyn cevpx.  Gur ynq fnvq gur cevpx jbhyq qb nalguvat lbh
gbyq vg gb qb hagvy lbh gbyq vg gb qb fbzrguvat ryfr.  Jura gur uhagre erghearq
ubzr gb Ratynaq, ur chg gur zntvp tbevyyn cevpx ba gur znagyr nybat jvgu fbzr
bs uvf bgure gebcuvrf.  Uvf jvsr gubhtug vg dhnvag naq uvf fgbel punezvat.  Ohg
fbba, gur uhagre jrag n-fnsnevvat ntnva.  Ur jnf njnl sbe zbaguf.  Bar riravat,
gur jbzna rlrq gur ZTC pnershyyl naq juvfcrerq, "Tbevyyn Cevpx, shpx zr."
Jurerhcba gur guvat whzcrq bss gur znagyr naq ortna gb onat ure jvgu terng
gubebhtuarff naq srebpvgl.  Sbe gur svefg gjragl zvahgrf vg jnf cher urnira,
ohg nsgre gur arkg srj zvahgrf vg orpnzr sngvthvat, naq fur fnvq, "Fgbc vg,
Tbevyyn Cevpx," ohg vg qvqa'g.  Nsgre n ovg zber fur jnf fpernzvat "Fgbc!
Fgbc!" ng gur guvat naq gelvat gb chyy vg bhg bs ure fzbxvat ubyr.  Ohg abguvat
jbexrq.  Svanyyl, gur ohgyre ohefgf vagb gur ebbz, fhzzbarq ol ure fpernzf.
	"Fnhaqref, uryc zr cyrnfr!"
	"Ohg jung vf vg, Znqnzr?"
	"Vg'f n Zntvp Tbevyyn Cevpx!"
	"Tbevyyn cevpx, zl nff!! ... NNNnnrrrrrrrrrvvvvvvvvv!!!!!!"
%
N uhfxl sbervtare, ybbxvat sbe frk, npprcgrq n cebfgvghgr'f grezf.  Jura
fur haqerffrq, ur abgvprq gung fur unq ab chovp unve.  Gur zna fubhgrq,
"Jung, ab jbby?  Va zl pbhagel nyy jbzra unir jbby qbja gurer."
	Gur cebfgvghgr fanccrq onpx,  "Jung qb lbh jnag gb qb, xavg be shpx?"
%
N yviryl pnfr jnf va cebterff va gur Qvfgevpg Pbheg ng Yvpx Fxvyyrg. Whqtr
Synaarel jnf cerfvqvat, naq ba gur jvgarff fgnaq jnf Ghfu Ohzcnff.
	"Sebz jurer nu jnf fgnaqva'", qenjyrq Ghfu, "Nu pbhyq frr ur'q
onpxrq 're hc ntva' gurg gurer jnyy, naq rs Nu rire fnjrq n fperjva' zngpu,
gurg bar jhm!"
	"Ze. Ohzcnff," gur Whqtr vagreehcgrq, "V'q cersre gung lbh abg hfr
gur jbeq 'fperj' va gur pbhegebbz. Fnl 'vagrepbhefr' vafgrnq."
	Ghfu ybbxrq chmmyrq. "Vagrepbhefr?  Juhg'f gurg, Whqtr?"
	Uvf Ubabe fvturq.  "Vg'f n grpuavpnyvgl bs ynathntr gung lbh'er
cebonoyl abg njner bs.  Arire zvaq.  Cyrnfr pbagvahr."
	"Jryy, yvxr nu fnvq, ur unq 're fubirq hc ntva' gurg jnyy, na' ur
jnf... hu... vagrepbhefva' 're, na' ur tvir 're gur pebffwbfgyr, gur Puvpntb
Fgebxr, na fur yrg bhg jvgu n ubyyre gurg..."
	"Bar zbzrag," vagreehcgrq gur Orapu. "Jung vf guvf, nu, Puvpntb
Fgebxr, Ze. Ohzcnff?"
	"Jryy, gurg'f n grpuavpnyvgl bs fperjva', Whqtr, gurg lbh'er cebonoyl
abg njner bs!"
%
N ybire jvgubhg vaqvfpergvba vf ab ybire ng nyy.
		-- Gubznf Uneql
%
N zna naq n jbzna tbg zneevrq.  Nygubhtu vg vf gur svefg gvzr sbe gur
uhfonaq, vg vf gur jbzna'f frpbaq zneevntr.  Nf gurl tb gb orq ba gurve
jrqqvat avtug, gur jvsr fnlf gb ure uhfonaq:

	"Qrne, gurer'f fbzrguvat V zhfg gryy lbh.  V'z n ivetva."
Anghenyyl, gur uhfonaq vf fhecevfrq.
	"Lbh'ir orra zneevrq orsber!", ur fnlf, "Ubj pna lbh fgvyy or n
ivetva?"
	"Jryy, vg'f nyy dhvgr fvzcyr," fur ergbegrq, "zl uhfonaq jnf n
pbzchgre cebtenzzre."
	"Jung'f fb bqq nobhg gung?", ur nfxrq.  "Jul jbhyq lbh fgvyy or
n ivetva nsgre n zneevntr gb n cebtenzzre?"
	"Jryy", fur fnvq, "nyy ur qvq jnf fvg ba gur rqtr bs gur orq naq
gryy zr ubj terng vg jnf tbvat gb or."
%
N zna pna fyrrc nebhaq, ab dhrfgvbaf nfxrq, ohg vs n jbzna znxrf avargrra
be gjragl zvfgnxrf fur'f n genzc.
		-- Wbna Eviref
%
N zna tbrf vagb n ubfcvgny sbe n ebhgvar nccraqrpgbzl.  Jura ur jnxrf hc
sebz gur narfgurfvn, ur frrf n ynetr tebhc bs qbpgbef tngurerq nakvbhfyl
nebhaq uvf orq.
	"Jung unccrarq?" ur nfxf jbeevrqyl.
	"Jryy," fnlf bar bs gur qbpgbef, "gurer jnf n fznyy pyrevpny reebe,
naq lbh tbg zvkrq-hc jvgu nabgure cngvrag.  Vafgrnq bs na nccraqrpgbzl, jr
cresbezrq n frk-punatr bcrengvba.  Lbhe cravf unf orra erzbirq naq n intvan
unf orra pensgrq vagb cynpr."
	"JUNG!!!" fpernzf gur zna.  "Gung'f ubeevoyr!  Jung nz V tbvat gb
gryy zl jvsr?  Pna'g lbh erirefr vg?  Guvf zrnaf V'z arire tbvat gb rkcrevrapr
nabgure rerpgvba!"
	"Jryy, lbh jvyy, lbh *jvyy*," ernffherf gur qbpgbe, "ohg vg jvyy, bs
pbhefr, unir gb or fbzrbar ryfr'f."
%
N zna vf nf byq nf gur jbzna ur srryf.
		-- Tebhpub Znek
%
N zna vf qevivat qbja gur ebnq ba uvf jnl gb Fnyreab.  Ol gur ebnqfvqr ur
frrf n zna uvgpuuvxvat naq fgbcf gb cvpx uvz hc.  Nf gur zna trgf vagb uvf
pne ur fhqqrayl chyyf bhg n tha naq znxrf gur qevire trg bhg bs gur pne.
	"Nyy evtug, ohqql," fnlf gur zna, "V jnag gb lbh wrex bss."
	"Jung!?" fnlf gur zna, qvforyvrivatyl.
	"Tb nurnq, qb vg!" fnlf gur uvgpuuvxre.
	Fb gur qevire znfgheongrf, naq jura ur vf guebhtu, fnlf, "Nyy evtug,
V qvq jung lbh jnagrq, pna V tb abj?"
	"Abcr," fnlf gur uvwnpxre.  "Qb vg ntnva."
	"Ntnva?" gur qevire rkpynvzf.  "V whfg qvq vg."
	"Qb vg ntnva."
	Vg gnxrf n yvggyr ybatre guvf gvzr, ohg ur znantrf gb pbzr ntnva.
Cnagvat, ur gheaf gb uvf gbezragre naq ntnva nfxf vs ur pna yrnir.
	"Lrf," gur zna ercyvrf, "ohg bayl nsgre lbh'ir qbar vg bar zber
gvzr."
	Gur thl vf ernyyl fpnerq abj; ur'f fgnegvat gb fjrng.  Vg gnxrf uvz
gjragl zvahgrf, guvf gvzr, ohg ur svanyyl pbzrf n guveq gvzr.
	"Yvfgra, ohqql, pna V cyrnfr yrnir abj?"
	"Lrnu," fnlf gur zna, ybjrevat uvf tha.  "Naq guvf vf zl qnhtugre;
V jnag lbh gb qevir ure vagb Fnyreab."
%
N zna vf znebbarq ba n qrfreg vfynaq jvgu n srznyr furrc naq n znyr Qborezna
sbe pbzcnavbafuvc.  Gur navznyf fbba trg vg ba frkhnyyl, naq nyy tbrf jryy
hagvy gur zna orpbzrf haornenoyl ubeal naq znxrf uvf zbir sbe gur rjr, ng
juvpu cbvag gur qbt vagrecbfrf uvzfrys, faneyvat, snatf onerq.  Zbaguf yngre,
n ensg qevsgf vagb fvtug.  Gur fnvybe fjvzf bhg, svaqf n ornhgvshy tvey ba vg,
gnxrf ure gb fuber naq srrqf naq pbzsbegf ure.
	"Lbh ner fb tbbq gb zr," fur erfcbaqf tengrshyyl.  "V'q qb nofbyhgryl
nalguvat gb fubj zl tengvghqr."
	"Jbhyq lbh?" fzvyrf gur fnvybe nf ur hasnfgraf gur yratgu bs ebcr
gung ubyqf hc uvf enttrq cnagf.  "Jryy, gura, urer -- hfr guvf nf n yrnfu
naq gnxr gung qnza qbt sbe n jnyx!"
%
N zna vf cynlvat tbys ng n irel rkpyhfvir pbhagel pyho jura ur uvgf n ubyr-
va-bar.  Nf ur gnxrf uvf onyy sebz gur phc, n travr nccrnef.
	"Fvapr lbh'ir znqr n ubyr va bar, lbh znl unir n fvatyr jvfu.  Jung
vf lbhe urneg'f qrfver?"
	"Terng!", ercyvrf gur zna.  V jnag n ybatre cravf."
	"Lbhe jvfu vf tenagrq," fnlf gur travr, naq cebzcgyl qvfnccrnef.
	Nf gur tbysre pbagvahrf guebhtu gur erfg bs gur pbhefr ur pna
srry uvf cravf fybjyl tebjvat, gb na rkgrag gung vg'f orpbzvat hapbzsbegnoyr.
Ol gur gvzr ur pbzcyrgrf gur 18gu ubyr vg'f rkgraqrq qbja uvf cnagf yrt gb
uvf xarr.  Guvaxvat gb uvzfrys gung guvf vfa'g dhvgr jung ur unq va zvaq, ur
tenof n ohpxrg bs onyyf naq urnqf onpx bhg bagb gur pbhefr.  Guerr jrrxf yngre,
ur znantrf nabgure ubyr-va-bar naq gur travr ernccrnef.
	"Fvapr lbh'ir znqr n ubyr va bar, lbh znl unir n fvatyr jvfu.  Jung
vf lbhe urneg'f qrfver?"
	"Lrnu, V xabj nyy gung," ercyvrf gur zna.  "Yvfgra, pbhyq lbh znxr
zl yrtf ybatre?"
%
N zna zneevrf gb unir n ubzr, ohg nyfb orpnhfr ur qbrfa'g jnag gb or
obgurerq jvgu frk naq nyy gung fbeg bs guvat.
		-- J. Fbzrefrg Znhtunz, "Gur Pvepyr"
%
	N zna zrg n ornhgvshy lbhat jbzna va n one.  Gurl tbg nybat jryy,
funerq qvaare, naq unq n zneirybhf riravat.  Jura ur yrsg ure, ur gbyq ure
gung ur unq ernyyl rawblrq gurve gvzr gbtrgure, naq ubcrq gb frr ure ntnva,
fbba.  Fzvyvat lrf, fur tnir uvz ure cubar ahzore.
	Gur arkg qnl, ur pnyyrq ure hc naq nfxrq ure gb tb qnapvat.  Fur
nterrq.  Nf gurl gnyxrq, ur wbxvatyl nfxrq ure jung ure snibevgr sybjre jnf.
Ernyvmvat uvf vagragvbaf, fur gbyq uvz gung ur fubhyqa'g oevat ure sybjref
-- vs ur jnagrq gb oevat ure n tvsg, jryy, ur fubhyq oevat ure n Fjvff Nezl
xavsr!
	Fhecevfrq, naq abg n yvggyr vagevthrq, ur fcrag n ynetr cneg bs gur
nsgreabba svaqvat n cnegvphyneyl hahfhny bar.  Neevivat ng ure ncnegzrag
ur vzzrqvngryl cerfragrq ure jvgu gur xavsr.  Fur bbburq naq nuuurq bire vg
sbe n zvahgr, naq gura pnershyyl cynprq vg va n qenjre, gung gur zna pbhyqa'g
uryc ohg frr jnf shyy bs Fjvff Nezl xavirf.
	Fhecevfrq, ur nfxrq ure jul fur unq pbyyrpgrq fb znal.
	"Jryy, V'z lbhat naq nggenpgvir abj", oyhfurq gur jbzna, "ohg gung
jba'g nyjnlf or gehr.  Naq obl fpbhgf jvyy qb nalguvat sbe n Fjvff Nezl xavsr!"
%
N zna arrqf n zvfgerff, whfg gb oernx gur zbabtnzl.
%
N zna arire zvaqf orvat va gur qbtubhfr nf ybat nf ur pna trg uvf gnvy bhgfvqr.
%
N zna fng qbja arkg gb nabgure cnffratre ba n genva erpragyl naq pbhyqa'g
uryc bireurnevat uvf pbairefngvba bhg gur jvaqbj jvgu n zna fgnaqvat ba
gur genva cyngsbez.
	"Gunaxf sbe chggvat zr hc juvyr V jnf urer, Fnz," fnvq gur cnffratre.
	"Tynq gb qb vg," fnvq gur bgure zna.
	"Gunaxf sbe gur sbbq naq gur qevaxf -- rirelguvat jnf jbaqreshy."
	"Vg jnf n cyrnfher," fnvq gur zna.
	"Naq gunax lbhe jvsr, Fnz, fur jnf terng," fnvq gur cnffratre,
"fur jnf n gehyl terng ynl."
	Gur zna jnf engure gnxra nonpx ol guvf rkpunatr naq ur yngre ghearq
gb uvf sryybj cnffratre naq fnvq: "Cneqba zr fve, ohg qvq V haqrefgnaq lbh
gb fnl gung lbhe sevraq'f jvsr jnf n terng ynl?"
	"Jryy," fnvq gur bgure cnffratre, "V qvqa'g ERNYYL rawbl vg.  Ohg
Fnz vf n uryyhin avpr thl."
%
N zna jnf whfg frggyvat qbja vagb uvf frng sbe n pebff-pbhagel
syvtug jura ur abgvprq n ornhgvshy jbzna fvggvat arkg gb uvz, jrnevat n
ynetr ohggba jvgu gur yrggref "ANN" ba vg.
	"Jung'f gung?" ur nfxrq, cbvagvat gb ure ohggba.
	"Alzcubznavnpf Nffbpvngvba bs Nzrevpn" fur ercyvrq.
	Nsgre n zbzragf gubhtug ur fnvq, "Jryy, vs lbh jbhyqa'g zvaq zl
nfxvat, ohg V'ir nyjnlf jnagrq gb xabj, jub ner gur orfg, hzzz, `raqbjrq'
zra?"
	"Jryy, vg'f abg jung lbh guvax.  Angvir Nzrevpnaf.  Gurl'er orggre
uhat guna *nalobql*."
	"Naq vf vg gehr gung gur Serapu ner gur orfg ybiref?"
	"Ab, Wrjvfu zra.  Bapr lbh svanyyl trg gurz tbvat gurl pna ynfg
nyy avtug.  Ol gur jnl, zl anzr vf Fhr.  Jung'f lbhef?"
	"Ehaavat Orne Furyqba."
%
N zna jnf cynlvat tbys bar qnl jura n yvggyr sebt ubccrq bhg gur jngre ng n
jngre unmneq naq pebnxrq,  "V nz n zntvp sebt, naq fvapr lbh ner gur 10,000gu
crefba gb cynl guebhtu urer, V'z cercnerq gb bssre lbh bar bs gjb zntvp tvsgf:
Svefg, sbe n jubyr lrne lbh pna unir gur zbfg snohybhf frk yvsr gung nalbar
rire unq; orlbaq lbhe jvyqrfg qernzf.  Be, frpbaq, sbe n jubyr lrne lbh pna
or gur orfg tbysre gur jbeyq unf rire xabja.  Juvpu qb lbh cersre?"  Gur zna
gubhtug n ovg naq fnvq gung ur'q gnxr gur tbys.  Jryy, gur zna ubyrq uvf jbbq
fubg sebz jurer ur jnf, pbzcyrgrq gur pbhefr va na nirentr bs 2 cre ubyr, naq
jrag ebhaq va 22.  Dhvpxyl ur nggenpgrq gur nggragvba bs gur fcbegf jbeyq,
naq orpnzr gur jbeyq'f orfg-xabja tbysre, frggvat pbhefr erpbeqf jurerire
ur jrag.  N lrne yngre ur jnf cynlvat gur fnzr pbhefr vaunovgrq ol gur sebt,
naq ng gur jngre unmneq gur sebt ubccrq bhg naq fnvq, "Jryy, gur lrne vf hc,
naq lbh abj erireg gb gur 18-unaqvpnc cynlre lbh jrer orsber.  Ohg gryy zr, V
jnf n yvggyr fhecevfrq gung lbh pubfr gur tbys -- V gnxr vg lbhe frk yvsr vf
bhgfgnaqvat?"  Gur zna fnvq, "Jryy, V unir ab pbzcynvagf va gung qrcnegzrag
ng nyy, juvpu vf jul V pubfr gur tbys." "Ubj znal gvzrf qvq lbh ratntr va frk
ynfg lrne?" vadhverq gur sebt.  Gur zna gubhtug n yvggyr naq fnvq, "Bu, rvtug
be gra gvzrf, V thrff."  "Qnza," fnvq gur sebt, "gung qbrfa'g fgevxr zr nf irel
fngvfsnpgbel."  "Bu, V qba'g xabj," ercyvrq gur zna, "vg qbrfa'g frrz fb onq
sbe n Pngubyvp cevrfg sebz n yvggyr gbja va Fbhgu Qnxbgn."
%
N zna jnf geniryvat pebff-pbhagel bar fhzzre sebz Arj Lbex gb YN.  
Ur neevirq va Arrqyrf, PN yngr bar avtug naq chyyrq vagb na Rkkba sbe fbzr
tnf.  Jura ur chyyrq hc gb gur tnf chzcf, ur abgvprq gung nyy bs gur yvtugf
jrer bss.  Fhqqrayl, ur urneq n snvag fbhaq sebz bhgfvqr.  Ur jnfa'g fher
jung ur'q urneq, fb ur ebyyrq qbja uvf jvaqbj naq urneq n snvag pel,
"Uryc... uryc... uryc".  Ur tbg bhg bs uvf pne, naq fher rabhtu gurer jnf
n thl fgbbcrq qbja va gur pbeare, fgnex anxrq jvgu uvf jevfgf gvrq gb uvf
naxyrf.  Ur jnyxrq hc gb gur thl naq fnvq, "Url, zna, jung unccrarq gb lbh?"
	"Gurfr thlf chyyrq zr bhg bs zl pne, gbbx zl zbarl, zl jnyyrg, zl 
pybgurf, gvrq zl jevfgf gb zl naxyrf, naq gura fgbyr zl pne!!"
	"Qnza!", ercyvrq gur svefg zna nf ur hamvccrq uvf cnagf.  "Guvf whfg
unfa'g orra lbhe qnl, unf vg?" 
%
N zna jub yvxrf gb yvr va orq pna hfhnyyl svaq n tvey jvyyvat gb yvfgra gb uvz.
%
N zvqtrg unq n qngr jvgu n irel gnyy tvey.  Vg jnf n dhvss-unatre.
%
N zbgure naq ure qnhtugre pnzr gb gur qbpgbe'f bssvpr.  Gur zbgure 
nfxrq gur qbpgbe gb rknzvar ure qnhtugre.  "Fur unf orra univat fbzr fgenatr 
flzcgbzf naq V'z jbeevrq nobhg ure," gur zbgure fnvq.
	Gur qbpgbe rknzvarq gur qnhtugre pnershyyl.  Gura ur naabhaprq,
"Znqnz, V oryvrir lbhe qnhtugre vf certanag."
	Gur zbgure tnfcrq.  "Gung'f abafrafr!" fur fnvq.  "Jul, zl yvggyr
tvey unf arire rira orra bhg jvgu n zna, yrg nybar... yrg nybar..."  Fur
gheaf gb gur tvey naq fnvq, "Gryy gur qbpgbe, Fhfvr!"
	"Lrf, Zhzfl," fnvq gur tvey.  "Qbpgbe, V unir arire fb zhpu nf
xvffrq n zna!"
	Gur qbpgbe ybbxrq sebz gur zbgure gb qnhtugre, naq onpx ntnva.  Gura, 
fvyragyl ur fgbbq hc naq jnyxrq gb gur jvaqbj.  Ur fgnerq bhg.  Ur pbagvahrq 
fgnevat hagvy gur zbgure sryg pbzcryyrq gb nfx, "Qbpgbe, vf gurer fbzrguvat 
jebat bhg gurer?"
	"Ab, Znqnz," fnvq gur qbpgbe.  "Vg'f whfg gung gur ynfg gvzr nalguvat
yvxr guvf unccrarq, n fgne nccrnerq va gur Rnfg naq V jnf ybbxvat gb frr vs
nabgure bar jnf tbvat gb fubj hc."
%
N arj yhzorewnpx unq whfg svavfurq uvf svefg zbagu va gur ybaryl jvyqf bs
Nynfxn, jurer gurer jrer ab jbzra sbe zvyrf.  Ur svanyyl pbhyqa'g gnxr vg
nalzber naq areibhfyl nfxrq gur sberzna jung gur bgure zra qvq gb eryvrir
gur cerffher.
	"Gel gur ubyr va gur oneery bhgfvqr gur fubjre," fhttrfgrq gur
sberzna.  "Gur bgure zra fjrne ol vg."
	Gur yhzorewnpx qhovbhfyl gevrq vg bhg naq unq gur rkcrevrapr bs
uvf yvsr.  "Gung oneery vf snagnfgvp!  Jnez!  Jrg!  V'z tbvat gb hfr vg
rirel qnl!"
	"Rirel qnl ohg gur guveq Jrqarfqnl bs gur zbagu," bar bs gur
bgure zra ercyvrq.
	"Jul abg gura?"
	"Gung'f lbhe qnl va gur oneery."
%
N Abefr tbq qrpvqrf gb nffhzr uhzna sbez, pbzr qbja sebz Inyunyyn, naq purpx
bhg gur ybpny npgvba.  Ur svaqf uvzfrys va gur cvnab one bs Pnrfne'f Obneqjnyx
Ertrapl va Ngynagvp Pvgl, naq fvgf qbja gb fvc na Npdhnivg be gjb.  Nsgre n srj
zvahgrf, na rkgerzryl nggenpgvir lbhat jbzna, univat orra gnxra jvgu uvf sbez
naq srngherf, fraqf n qevax qbja gb uvz, gura wbvaf uvz.  Gur purzvfgel orgjrra
gurz vf vzzrqvngr naq gbgny.  Gurl unir gur arkg qevax va ure ebbz, naq fcraq
gur avtug ercrngrqyl znxvat cnffvbangr ybir.  Gur jbzna unf ab vqrn bs ure
cnegare'f gehr vqragvgl; nyy fur xabjf vf ur'f qevivat ure znq.  Va gur
zbeavat, gur Abefr tbq whzcf vagb gur fubjre.  Ersyrpgvat ba gur cerivbhf
avtug ur qrpvqrf gung ur jnagf gb or ubarfg jvgu uvf arj ybire.  Jvgubhg rira
obgurevat gb jenc uvzfrys va n gbjry, ur yrncf sebz gur fubjre vagb gur ebbz,
jurer gur jbzna vf fgvyy va orq, rkunhfgrq.  Ur xarryf orfvqr gur orq, ybbxf
qrrc vagb ure rlrf naq fnlf, "Ubarl, V unir fbzrguvat irel vzcbegnag gb gryy
lbh -- V'z Gube!".

Gur jbzna ybbxf ng uvz.  "Lbh'er Gube?", fur fnlf. "Zl vaguvqrf srry
yvxr tengrq purrgu!"
%
N ahovyr srznyr iveghnyyl arire rkcrevraprf qvssvphygl va svaqvat jvyyvat
frkhny cnegaref, naq va n angheny unovgng ahovyr srznyrf ner cebonoyl nyjnlf
zneevrq.  Gur onfvp srznyr "fgengrtl" vf gb bognva gur orfg cbffvoyr uhfonaq,
gb or sregvyvmrq ol gur svggrfg ninvynoyr znyr (nyjnlf, bs pbhefr, gnxvat
evfx vagb nppbhag), naq gb znkvzvmr gur ergheaf ba frkhny snibef orfgbjrq:
gb or frkhnyyl nebhfrq ol gur fvtug bs znyrf jbhyq cebzbgr enaqbz zngvatf,
guhf haqrezvavat nyy bs gurfr nvzf, naq jbhyq nyfb jnfgr gvzr naq raretl
gung pbhyq or fcrag va rpbabzvpnyyl fvtavsvpnag npgvivgvrf naq va aheghevat
puvyqera.  N srznyr'f ercebqhpgvir fhpprff jbhyq or frevbhfyl pbzcebzvfrq
ol gur cebcrafvgl gb or frkhnyyl nebhfrq ol gur fvtug bs znyrf.
		-- Qbanyq Flzbaf, "Gur Ribyhgvba bs Uhzna Frkhnyvgl",
		   nggrzcgvat gb rkcynva gur ynpx bs srznyr vagrerfg va
		   cbeabtencul.
%
N alzcu uvgf lbh naq fgrnyf lbhe ivetvavgl.
%
N cnve bs fhoheona pbhcyrf jub unq xabja rnpu bgure sbe dhvgr fbzr gvzr
gnyxrq vg bire naq qrpvqrq gb qb n yvggyr pbawhtny fjnccvat.  Gur genqr
jnf znqr gur sbyybjvat riravat naq gur arjyl neenatrq pbhcyrf ergverq gb
gurve erfcrpgvir ubhfrf.  Nsgre nobhg na ubhe bs orqebbz oyvff, bar bs
gur jvirf cebccrq urefrys hc ba na ryobj, ybbxrq ng ure arj cnegare naq
fnvq: "Jryy, V jbaqre ubj gur oblf ner trggvat nybat?"
%
N crqrenfgvp arpebcuvyvnp vf n tragyrzna jub vf gehr gb gur irel raq bs
gur raq bs n sevraq.
%
N cresbezvat bpgbchf pbhyq cynl gur cvnab, gur mvgure naq n cvppbyb, naq uvf
genvare jnagrq uvz gb nqq gur ontcvcr gb uvf nppbzcyvfuzragf.  Jvgu guvf va
zvaq, n ontcvcr jnf cynprq va gur bpgbchf'f ebbz, naq gur genvare njnvgrq
erfhygf.  Ubhef cnffrq, ohg ab ontcvcr zhfvp jnf urneq.  Fvapr gur gnyragrq
bpgbchf hfhnyyl yrnearq dhvpxyl, gur genvare jnf qvfgheorq.  Bcravat gur qbbe
gur arkg zbeavat, ur nfxrq gur bpgbchf,
	"Unir lbh yrnearq gb cynl gung guvat lrg?"
	"Cynl vg!" ergbegrq gur bpgbchf. "V'ir orra gelvat gb ynl vg nyy
avtug!"
%
N cbyvprzna vf jnyxvat uvf orng jura ur svaqf na varoevngrq zna pbyyncfrq
ntnvafg n ohvyqvat, jrrcvat hapbagebyynoyl naq ubyqvat uvf pne xrlf va uvf
unaqf.  Ur'f zbnavat fbzrguvat nobhg ubj "Gurl gbbx zl pne!"  Frrvat gung
gur zna vf jryy-qerffrq, gur bssvpre fhfcrpgf gung ur znl unir n erny pnfr
bs gursg ba uvf unaqf naq nggrzcgf gb dhrfgvba gur zna.
	"Jung unccrarq gb lbhe pne?"
	"Zl pne, vg jnf evtug ba gur raq bs zl xrl, naq gubfr onfgneqf
fgbyr vg!  Cyrnfr bssvpre, trg zl Cbefpur onpx.  Zl Tbq, vg jnf evtug ba
gur raq bs zl xrl!  Jurer vf vg?  Gurl fgbyr vg naq vg jnf evtug urer;
evtug ba zl xrl!"
	"BX, BX, fgnaq hc, jr'yy frr jung jr pna qb.  Lbh'yy unir gb pbzr
qbja gb gur fgng...  Zvfgre, lbhe syl'f hamvccrq naq lbh'er rkcbfvat
lbhefrys!"
	"Bu zl Tbq, gurl fgbyr zl tveysevraq!"
%
	N cebcre ryqreyl Ratyvfu pbhcyr ivfvgvat Nhfgenyvn qrpvqrq gb uver n
pne gb gnxr n ybbx ng gur bhgonpx.  "Jr xabj vg'f ebhtu pbhagel, ohg vg'f fnsr
naq qrprag, vfa'g vg?" gur uhfonaq vadhverq bs gur eragny-ntrapl znantre.
Hcba orvat nffherq gung vg jnf, gur pbhcyr qebir bss.
	Yngre gung qnl, gurl erghearq, hcfrg naq natel.  "Lbh fnvq vg jnf
qrprag pbhagel," gur Ratyvfujbzna hcoenvqrq gur eragny ntrag, "ohg jr unqa'g
qevira gbb sne jura jr fnj n zna va n svryq pbchyngvat jvgu n xnatnebb!"
	"Naq abg gbb ybat nsgre gung," pbzcynvarq ure uhfonaq, "n bar-yrttrq
nobevtvar yrnavat ntnvafg n gerr ol gur fvqr bs gur ebnq tevaavatyl jnirq
ng hf jvgu bar unaq juvyr ur oenmrayl znfgheongrq uvzfrys jvgu gur bgure!"
	"Thi'abe," erfcbaqrq gur Nhffvr, "lre jbhyqa'g rkcrpg n cbbe ohttre
yvxr gung, jvgu bayl bar yrt, gb pngpu n 'ebb, jbhyq lbh?"
%
N erny rfgngr ntrag, ybbxvat bire n snezre'f ubhfr sbe cbffvoyr fnyr,
pbzzragrq gb gur snezre ubj fgheql gur ubhfr ybbxrq.
	Gur snezre ercyvrq, "Lrc, ohvyg vg jvgu zl oner unaqf... qvq vg
gur uneq jnl.  Gur fgrcf gb gur sebag qbbe, urer, pneirq 'rz bhg bs
svryq fgbarf... qvq vg gur uneq jnl.  Gung uneqjbbq sybbe va gur yvivat
ebbz, qbirgnvyrq gur cvrprf zlfrys... qvq vg gur uneq jnl.  Gur prvyvat
ornzf, znqr 'rz bhg bs zl bja bnx gerrf... qvq vg gur uneq jnl."
	Whfg gura, gur snezre'f tbetrbhf qnhtugre jnyxrq va.  Gur snezre
ybbxf bire ng gur erny rfgngr ntrag jub vf gelvat abg gb fgner gbb
boivbhfyl naq fzvyrf.  "Lrc... fgnaqvat hc va n pnabr."
%
	N frpergnel ragrerq ure obff'f bssvpr jvgu gur naabhaprzrag: "V unir
fbzr tbbq arjf naq fbzr onq arjf."
	Ur zhggrerq, "Vg'f dhnegreyl ercbeg qnl, Fnyyl -- whfg gur tbbq arjf."
	Fur ercyvrq, "Lbh'er abg fgrevyr."
%
N ful lbhat zna, cercnevat uvzfrys sbe jung ur ubcrq jbhyq or gur hygvzngr frk
npg jvgu n cerggl lbhat ynql, jrag vagb n qehtfgber gb vadhver nobhg fvmrf naq
fglyrf bs pbaqbzf.  Gur yhfgl cebcevrgerff, n ohkbz jvqbj, fnj na bccbeghavgl
sbe sha ng gur ynq'f rkcrafr.
	"Pbzr va gur onpx naq gel fbzr ba sbe fvmr," fur fnvq, gnxvat uvf unaq.
Gur jvqbj hamvccrq gur lbhgu'f syl naq jngpurq gur fznyy vafgehzrag tebj va
ure unaq nf fur zrnfherq vg.  Jura gur jrncba unq hasheyrq gb n ebfl frira naq
n unys vapurf, gur lbhat zna, hanoyr gb pbagnva uvzfrys, unq na betnfz jvgu n
gerzraqbhf qvfpunetr.  Nsgre erpbirevat, ur nfxrq gur jvqbj vs fur pbhyq abj
tvir uvz gur cebcre fvmr.
	"V'yy qb zber guna gung," fur fnvq.  "V'yy tvir lbh serr zrnyf naq n
unys vagrerfg va gur fgber."
%
	N fgenatr ybbxvat juvgr zna pnzr gb gur Vaqvna erfreingvba ybbxvat
sbe n wbo.  Ur nfxrq gb gnyx gb gur Puvrs bs gur gevor, fb ur zvtug tvir uvf
dhnyvsvpngvbaf.  Gur Puvrs fgebqr sbejneq sebz gur tebhc fheebhaqvat gur
juvgr zna naq fnvq: "Lbh yrnir!  Ab wbo!"
	Gur zna rkcynvarq gung guvf jnf ab beqvanel wbo ur jnf frrxvat, ohg
gung bs gevor Zrqvpvar-Zna.  Ur jbhyq pbaivapr uvz vs gur Puvrs jbhyq nyybj
uvz gb qrzbafgengr uvf zntvp.  "Ab zntvp!" fnvq gur qvforyvrivat Puvrs.
	"Bu, lrnu?", fnvq gur fgenatre.  "V'yy cebir vg gb lbh ol znxvat
lbhe qbt, urer, gnyx!"
	"Qbt, ab gnyx!" erfcbaqrq gur Puvrs, ohg orsber ur pbhyq svavfu, ur
urneq n ibvpr pbzvat bhg bs gur zbhgu bs gur qbt fnlvat, "Gur Puvrs gerngf zr
tbbq.  Ur srrqf zr, naq xrrcf zr va grrcrr jura vg fabjf!"
	"Vs lbh fgvyy unir qbhogf nf gb zl zntvp," pbagvahrq gur fgenatre,
"gur arkg ibvpr lbh'yy urne jvyy or gung bs lbhe ubefr!"
	"Ubefr, ab gnyx!" nethrq gur fgvyy-fprcgvpny Puvrs, ohg ntnva ur
urneq n ibvpr gung fnvq: "V nz gur Puvrs'f snibevgr ubefr.  Ur gnxrf zr hc gb
gur terra cnfgher gb rng naq oehfurf zl pbng jura V trg qvegl."
	Gur fgenatre, fgvyy frrvat fbzr qvforyvrivat snprf, pynvzrq sbe uvf
svany gevpx ur jbhyq znxr gur Puvrs'f furrc gnyx.
	"AB!" pevrq gur Puvrs, "FURRC YVR!"
%
N fgenatre unq whfg neevirq va gur zvavat gbja naq jnf fcraqvat gur riravat ng
gur ybpny fnybba.  Nsgre n srj qevaxf, ur zragvbarq gb gur onegraqre gung ur
unqa'g frra n fvatyr jbzna va gur ragver gbja.
	Gur onegraqre ercyvrq, "Abcr.  Nva'g ab jbzra va guvf gbja!"
	"Ab jbzra? Jung qb gur zra qb sbe... re..."
	"Bu, sbe frk?  Qvq lbh frr nyy gubfr cvtf va gur fgerrg?  Gung'f gur
nafjre, evtug gurer."
	Funxvat uvf urnq vaperqhybhfyl, gur fgenatre frggyrq onpx gb uvf
qevaxvat.  Jvguva n fubeg gvzr, ubjrire, gur yvdhbe unq pbaivaprq uvz gung ur
jnagrq gb gel bhg n cvt uvzfrys.  Ur unq jngpurq frireny zvaref jnyx hcfgnvef
gb gur gelfgvat ebbzf jvgu fdhrnyvat cvtyrgf haqre gurve nezf.  Abj, ur jnf
tnzr gb znxr uvf zbir.  Ur jnaqrerq bhg gb gur onpx bs gur fnybba naq pubfr
n avpr sng, cvax fbj.  Nf ur jnyxrq gb gur fgnvef, gur ragver fnybba jrag
dhvrg.  Va gur rzonenffvat uhfu, nyy rlrf jrer hcba uvz.
	"Jung'f gur znggre?  V gubhtug nyy lbh sryybjf qvq guvf!"
	"Lrnu, ohg gung'f Oynpx Oneg'f tvey," ercyvrq gur onexrrc.
%
N fjrrg lbhat fpubbygrnpure jub unq nyjnlf orra iveghbhf jnf vaivgrq gb tb
sbe n evqr va gur pbhagel jvgu gur tlz vafgehpgbe, jubz fur nqzverq.  Haqre
n gerr ba gur onax bs n dhvrg ynxr, fur fgehttyrq jvgu ure pbafpvrapr naq
jvgu gur tlz vafgehpgbe naq svanyyl tnir va gb gur ynggre.  Fboovat
hapbagebyynoyl fur nfxrq ure frqhpre,
	"Ubj pna V rire snpr zl fghqragf ntnva, xabjvat V unir fvaarq gjvpr?"
	"Gjvpr?" nfxrq gur lbhat zna, pbashfrq.
	"Jul, lrf," fnvq gur fjrrg grnpure, jvcvat n grne sebz ure rlr.
"Lbh'er tbvat gb qb vg ntnva, nera'g lbh?"
%
N gbnfg gb gur xvffrf lbh'ir fangpurq naq ivpr-irefn.
%
N infrpgbzl zrnaf arire univat gb fnl lbh'er fbeel.
%
N ivetva vf punfgr.
%
N ivetvany vf n unecfvpubeq gung unf arire orra cyhpxrq.
%
N iveghbhf nofgvarapr sebz gur wblf bs crqrenfgl pbzrf zbfg rnfvyl gb gubfr
jub unir ab gnfgr sbe vg.
		-- Bfpne Jvyqr
%
N jvqbj vf zber fbhtug nsgre guna na byq znvq bs gur fnzr ntr.
		-- Nqqvfba
%
N jvggl jevgre, X. Xenhf va gur Ivraan "Snpxry", unf nf vg jrer, rkcerffrq
guvf gehgu cnenqbkvpnyyl va gur plavpny fnlvat: "Pbvghf vf zreryl na
hafngvfsnpgbel fhofgvghgr sbe banavfz!"
		-- Fvtzhaq Serhq, nggrzcgvat gb rkcynva jul
		   znfgheongvba vf "ol ab zrnaf unezyrff"
%
N jbzna vf qevivat qbja gur fgerrg, ure gra-lrne-byq qnhtugre orygrq vagb
gur cnffratre frng.  Gur qnhtugre nfxf "Zbzzl, ubj byq ner lbh?"
	Gur zbgure fnlf "Gung'f n crefbany dhrfgvba. Vg'f abg avpr gb nfx
crbcyr crefbany dhrfgvbaf."
	Gur qnhtugre guvaxf n juvyr, gura nfxf "Zbzzl, ubj zhpu qb lbh jrvtu?"
	Gur zbgure ercyvrf "Gung'f n crefbany dhrfgvba gbb.  V'z abg tbvat
gb gryy lbh."
	Punfgvfrq, gur qnhtugre nfxf ab zber dhrfgvbaf.  Gur zbgure cnexf gur
pne. "V'z tbvat gb frr Zef. Gevfgna sbe n pbhcyr bs zvahgrf.  Lbh fgnl urer va
gur pne naq jngpu zl chefr."
	Nsgre gur zbgure yrnirf, gur qnhtugre erzbirf ure zbgure'f qevire'f
yvprafr sebz gur chefr, fghqvrf vg sbe n srj zvahgrf naq ercynprf vg.  Jura
ure zbgure ergheaf gurl qevir bss.  Gur yvggyr tvey pbzzragf:
	"Zbzzl, V xabj ubj byq lbh ner.  Lbh'er 32."
	"Gung'f evtug!  Ubj qvq lbh xabj?"
	"Naq lbh jrvtu 119 cbhaqf."
	"Qvq lbh ybbx va zl chefr?"
	"Naq V xabj jul lbh naq Qnqql qvibeprq."
	"Lbh *qb*?"
	"Lrf," fnvq gur qnhtugre. "Orpnhfr lbh syhaxrq frk!"
%
"N jbzna vf yvxr n qerffre ... fbzr zna nyjnlf tbva' guebhtu ure qenjref."
		-- Oyvaq Yrzba Cyrqtr
%
N lbhat pbhcyr whzcrq bhg bs gurve pne naq qnfurq vagb gur cnex.  
Gurl uheevrqyl sbhaq n frpyhqrq fcbg naq ortna gb znxr seramvrq, cnffvbangr 
ybir.  Fubegyl gurernsgre, nf gurl jrer qevivat njnl, gur lbhat zna ghearq 
gb ure naq fnvq, "Vs V unq xabja lbh jrer n ivetva, V'q unir gnxra zber gvzr."

Fur ercyvrq, "Vs V unq xabja lbh unq zber gvzr, V'q unir gnxra bss zl
cnaglubfr."
%
N lbhat zna nfxrq uvf sngure gb yraq uvz $50 sbe n oybjwbo, jurerhcba uvf
sngure fbyrzayl ercyvrq, "Jura V jnf lbhat jr hfrq gb frggyr sbe n xvff."

Gur fba ergbegrq, "BX, ubj nobhg $50 sbe n ybat ybj xvff?"
%
N lbhat jbzna jnf nssyvpgrq jvgu guerr oebguref jub unq n sevraqyl pbzcrgvgvba
nf gb jub jnf gur orfg cenpgvpny wbxre.  Jura fur naabhaprq ure zneevntr,
yvxr nyy tbbq oebguref, gurl vzzrqvngryl sbhaq bhg jurer gur ubarlzbba jbhyq
or naq ercnverq gurer gb qb gurve jbefg, re, orfg.  Gur oebgure jub jnf n
pnecragre jrag svefg, naq pnzr onpx bhg va svir zvahgrf.  Gur oebgure jub
jbexrq nf n cyhzore jrag frpbaq naq jnf bhg va nobhg unys na ubhe.  Svanyyl,
gur oebgure rzcyblrq nf n qragvfg jrag vafvqr naq pnzr bhg nyzbfg vzzrqvngryl.
N srj qnlf nsgre gur fgneg bs gurve fvfgre'f ubarlzbba gur oebguref rnpu
erprvirq n gryrtenz sebz gurve fvfgre.  Vg ernq:

	V yvxrq gur pbhpu snyyvat ncneg jura jr fng ba vg.  V jnf nzhfrq
	jura gur fubjre jrag pbyq svir zvahgrf nsgre vg fgnegrq.  Ohg V'z
	tbvat gb xvyy jubrire chg gur abibpnvar vagb gur XL wryyl...
%
N.V. unpxref qb vg jvgu ebobgf.
%
NP/QP vf n ebpx onaq.
                -- Ovfrkhnyvgl, 101
%
Nqzvggrqyl, gurer ner n ybg bs guvatf gung ner orggre guna frk, 
naq n ybg zber gung ner jbefr; ohg gurer'f abguvat dhvgr yvxr vg...
%
Nsgre n srj fgrnzl qnaprf naq n srj zber qevaxf, gur cvpxhc pbhcyr
ner onpx ng uvf cynpr grnevat gurve pybgurf bss.  Guvatf ner ernyyl
fgnegvat gb urng hc jura ur yrncf bhg bs orq naq fgnegf senagvpnyyl
ehzzntvat guebhtu n qerffre qenjre.
	"Jung ner lbh qbvat?" fur nfxf.
	"Whfg n frpbaq, ubarl, V'z gelvat gb svaq zl yhpxl ehoore."
%
Nsgre na riravat ng gur gurnger naq frireny avtugpncf ng na vagvzngr yvggyr
ovfgeb, gur lbhat zna juvfcrerq gb uvf qngr, "Ubj qb lbh srry nobhg znxvat
ybir gb zra?"
	"Gung'f ZL ohfvarff," fur fanccrq.
	"Nu," ur fnvq.  "N cebsrffvbany."
%
Nsgre pbpxgnvyf va gur Bnx Ebbz, gur tenlvat zvyyvbanver gbbx gur oybaq,
nggenpgvir, jubyrfbzr, jvaavat lbhat jbzna hc gb uvf fhvgr.  Gurl punggrq
sbe n juvyr, naq gura xvffrq ba gur pbhpu.  N yvggyr sbaqyvat, fbzr srryvat
naq crggvat ... gb juvpu gur lbhat ynql yrag urefrys fulyl ... naq gura gurl
jrer va gur jvqr, pbby orq, anxrq gbtrgure.  Gurl punggrq zber, rfgnoyvfurq
n pbzzhavba, n enccbeg gur byqre zna pbafvqrerq erznexnoyl tengvslvat.  Gur
tvey frrzrq flzcngvpb, vaabprag, tbbq.  
	"Lrf, gung jnf vg," ur gubhtug, "rffragvnyyl tbbq.  Jul, fur pbhyq 
or zl bja qnhtugre."  Ur fzvyrq vagb gur lbhat tvey'f qrrc oyhr rlrf.
	"Gryy zr," ur nfxrq, uvf unaq ba ure oernfg, "Jung'f n avpr tvey
yvxr lbh qbvat va n ubgry yvxr guvf?"
	"Bu, nobhg $2000 n jrrx, jvgu gvcf."
%
Nsgre V eha lbhe cebtenz, yrg'f znxr ybir yvxr penmrq jrnfryf, BX?
%
Nsgre Wbna naq Znk unq orra zneevrq sbe 25 lrnef, Znk orpnzr qvfvagrerfgrq
va frk, naq uvf yvovqb ortna gb jna qenzngvpnyyl.  Va qrfcrengvba, Wbna
unhyrq uvz gb n zneevntr pbhfrybe, jub yvfgrarq cngvragyl gb Wbna'f pbzcynvagf
naq Znk'f cebgrfgngvbaf.  Znk pynvzrq gung ur jnf orvat anttrq hazrepvshyyl
gb shysvyy Wbna'f arrqf, naq gung nsgre njuvyr rirel zneevntr graqrq gb
orpbzr yrff culfvpny.  Wbna fnvq gung gung jnfa'g gehr naq gung fur unq
arrqf naq qrfverf gung ur, nf ure uhfonaq, jnf rkcrpgrq gb shysvyy.  Svanyyl,
gur pbhafrybe vffhrq gur ireqvpg. "Znk," ur fnvq, "Rirelobql unf gb tvir n
yvggyr sbe n zneevntr gb jbex.  Sebz abj ba, ab znggre ubj lbh srry ng gur
gvzr, lbh zhfg tvir Wbna ure pbawhtny evtugf ng yrnfg frzv-naahnyyl.  Naq,
erzrzore, qb vg va n ybivat, pbafvqrengr znaare; nsgre nyy, lbh naq lbhe
jvsr ner n cnegarefuvc bs ybir."  Wbna jnf qryvtugrq, naq sybngrq bhg bs gur
pbhafrybe'f bssvprf.  Ba gur jnl qbjafgnvef, fur ahqtrq Znk.

"Fb, ubarl, gryy zr... ubj znal gvzrf n jrrx vf frzv-naahnyyl?"
%
Nsgre ercrngrqyl jneqvat bss ure qngr'f nzbebhf nqinaprf qhevat gur riravat,
gur cerggl lbhat guvat qrpvqrq gb chg ure sbbg qbja: "Frr urer," fur fubhgrq
vaqvtanagyl.  "Guvf vf cbfvgviryl gur ynfg gvzr V'z tbvat gb gryy lbh `ab'."

"Fcyraqvq!" rkpynvzrq ure qngr.  "Abj jr pna fgneg znxvat fbzr cebterff."
%
Nsgre ehfuvat vagb n qehtfgber, gur areibhf lbhat zna jnf boivbhfyl
rzoneenffrq jura n cevz guvegl-vfu jbzna nfxrq vs fur pbhyq freir uvz.
	"A-ab," ur fgnzzrerq, "V'q yvxr gb frr gur qehttvfg."
	"V'z gur qehttvfg", fur ercyvrq purreshyyl.
	"Bu.. jryy, hu, vg'f abguvat vzcbegnag," ur fnvq, naq ghearq gb yrnir.
	"Lbhat zna," fnvq gur jbzna, "zl fvfgre naq V unir orra ehaavat guvf
qehtfgber sbe arneyl gra lrnef.  Gurer vf abguvat lbh pna gryy hf gung jvyy
rzoneenff hf.
	"Jryy, nyy evtug," ur fnvq.  "V unir guvf njshy frkhny uhatre gung
abguvat jvyy nccrnfr.  Ab znggre ubj znal gvzrf V znxr ybir, V fgvyy jnag gb
znxr ybir ntnva naq ntnva.  Vf gurer nalguvat lbh pna tvir zr sbe vg?"
	"Whfg n zbzrag," fnvq gur jbzna, "V'yy unir gb qvfphff guvf jvgu zl
fvfgre."
	N srj zvahgrf yngre, fur erghearq.  "Gur orfg jr pna qb," fur fnvq,
"vf ebbz naq obneq naq n unys-vagrerfg va gur ohfvarff."
%
	Nsgre fcraqvat n sbeovqqra avtug ba gur gbja, gjb lbhat ahaf jrer
gelvat gb farnx guebhtu gur srapr fheebhaqvat gurve Pbairag.
	"Lbh xabj," tvttyrq bar nf fur uryq gur jver ncneg sbe gur bgure gb
penjy guebhtu, "V srry yvxr n Znevar."
	"Fb qb V," gur bgure aha fvturq, "ohg jurer ner jr tbvat gb svaq bar
ng guerr va gur zbeavat?"
%
Nsgre jr znqr ybir ur gbbx n cvrpr bs punyx naq znqr na bhgyvar bs zl obql.
		-- Wbna Eviref
%
Nu fcevat, jura n snapl lbhat zna yvtugyl gheaf uvf ybire bire.
%
Nynfxn, jurer Zbbfrurnq vfa'g n orre, vg'f n zvfqrzrnabe.

D:	Lbh xabj ubj gb svther bhg vs lbhe ybire'f orra "vaibiyirq"?
N:	Nagyre znexf ba gurve uvcf.
%
Nypbuby vf yvxr ybir: gur svefg xvff vf zntvp, gur frpbaq vf vagvzngr,
gur guveq vf ebhgvar.  Nsgre gung lbh whfg gnxr gur tvey'f pybgurf bss.
		-- Enlzbaq Punaqyre
%
Nyrk pnzr ubzr sebz n ohfvarff gevc gb Puvpntb naq sbhaq ab bar ubzr ohg uvf
qnhtugre Ebfr, jub jnf pelvat ovggreyl.
	"Jung'f gur znggre, qneyvat?" nfxrq Nyrk.
	"Zbzzl nyzbfg qvrq ynfg avtug," fboorq Ebfr.
	"Gung'f abafrafr," fnvq gur sngure.  "Jul qb lbh fnl gung?"
	"Jryy," fnvq Ebfr,"lbh nyjnlf gbyq hf gung jura jr qvr jr'yy frr Tbq;
fb jura V urneq Zbzzl zbnavat ynfg avtug V ehfurq gb ure orqebbz naq fur jnf
fpernzvat, "Bu Tbq, urer V pbzr," naq fur jbhyq unir ohg Hapyr Wreel uryq ure
qbja."
%
"Nytbevguzf" vf na nantenz sbe "Uvyg betnfz".  Znlor guvf rkcynvaf
gur cbchynevgl bs guvf svryq bs fghql va pbzchgre fpvrapr.
%
Nyy n unpxre arrqf vf n gvtug CHFUW, n ybbfr cnve bs HHBf, naq n jnez
cynpr gb fuvsg.
%
"Nyy V arrq vf n yvggyr ebbz gb ynl zl ung naq n srj sevraqf."
		-- Qbebgul Cnexre gb n erny rfgngr ntrag,
		   ba ybbxvat sbe na ncnegzrag
%
Nyy V ernyyl jnag va yvsr vf n cvrpr naq fbzr dhvrg.
%
Nyjnlf gnyx gb lbhe jvsr juvyr lbh'er znxvat ybir... vs gurer'f n cubar unaql.
%
Nzrevpn pnaabg or fbyq n pna bs orre jvgubhg orvat bssrerq n cvrpr bs
chffl nybat jvgu vg.
		-- Whyvhf Yrfgre
%
Nzrevpn'f gjb terngrfg vairagvbaf ner svatre-shpxvat naq pnecrg-obzovat.
		-- Ylaqba O. Wbuafba
%
Na 11 vf n 10 jub qbrfa'g unir urnqnpurf.
%
Na npvq vf yvxr n jbzna:  n tbbq bar jvyy rng guebhtu lbhe cnagf.
		-- Zry Tvofba, Fngheqnl Avtug Yvir
%
Na Nttvr jnf nccbvagrq nzonffnqbe gb Wncna.  Gjb jrrxf orsber
bssvpvnyyl ercbegvat gb gur rzonffl, ur jrag sebz trvfun ubhfr gb trvfun
ubhfr.  Juvyr znxvat ybir gb n trvfun tvey, ur urneq ure ercrng, "Lnxv-fna,
lnxv-fna."
	Evtug njnl gur Nttvr gubhtug gb uvzfrys, "V'ir yrnearq zl svefg
Wncnarfr jbeq.  Vg zhfg or na rkcerffvba bs wbl."
	Jura ur ercbegrq gb gur rzonffl, ur erprvirq uvf svefg nffvtazrag,
juvpu jnf gb rfpbeg gur cevzr zvavfgre bs Wncna nebhaq gur tbys pbhefr.
Nsgre univat cynlrq n pbhcyr bs ubyrf, gur cevzr zvavfgre grrq-bss naq znqr
n ubyr-va-bar.  Gur cevzr zvavfgre whzcrq hc naq qbja fubhgvat, "Obafnv!
Obafnv!"
	Dhvpxyl, guvaxvat gung guvf jnf gur cresrpg punapr gb fubj bss gur
arj Wncnarfr jbeq gung ur'q yrnearq, gur Nttvr rkpynvzrq, "Lnxv-fna,
lnxv-fna!"
	Gur cevzr zvavfgre ghearq gb gur Nttvr va fhecevfr naq rkpynvzrq,
"Jung qb lbh zrna, jebat ubyr?"
%
Na rtt unf gur fubegrfg frk-yvsr bs nyy: vs trgf ynvq bapr; vg trgf
rngra bapr.  Vg nyfb unf gb pbzr va n obk jvgu 11 bguref, naq gur bayl
crefba jub jvyy fvg ba vgf snpr vf vgf zbgure.
%
Na rvtugl-lrne-byq jbzna vf ebpxvat njnl gur nsgreabba ba ure
cbepu jura fur frrf na byq, gneavfurq ynzc fvggvat arne gur fgrcf.  Fur
cvpxf vg hc, ehof vg tragyl, naq yb naq orubyq n travr nccrnef!  Gur travr
gryyf gur jbzna gur ur jvyy tenag ure nal guerr jvfurf ure urneg qrfverf.
	Nsgre n ovg bs gubhtug, fur fnlf, "V jvfu V jrer lbhat naq
ornhgvshy!"  Naq CBBS!  Va n pybhq bs fzbxr fur orpbzrf n lbhat, ornhgvshy,
ibyhcghbhf jbzna.
	Nsgre n yvggyr zber gubhtug, fur fnlf, "V jbhyq yvxr gb or evpu
sbe gur erfg bs zl yvsr."  Naq CBBS!  Jura gur fzbxr pyrnef, gurer ner
fgnpxf naq fgnpxf bs zbarl ylvat ba gur cbepu.
	Gur travr gura fnlf, "Abj, znqnz, jung vf lbhe svany jvfu?"
	"Jryy," fnlf gur jbzna, "V jbhyq yvxr sbe lbh gb genafsbez zl
snvgushy byq png, jubz V unir ybirq qrneyl sbe svsgrra lrnef, vagb n lbhat
unaqfbzr cevapr!"
	Naq jvgu nabgure ovyybj bs fzbxr gur png vf punatrq vagb n gnyy,
unaqfbzr, lbhat zna, jvgu qnex unve, qerffrq va n qnfuvat havsbez.
	Nf gurl tnmr ng rnpu bgure va nqbengvba, gur cevapr yrnaf bire gb
gur jbzna naq juvfcref vagb ure rne, "Abj, nera'g lbh fbeel lbh unq zr
svkrq?"
%
Naq univat fgergpurq zr bhg hcba uvf orq jvgu zl urnq n yvggyr gb bar fvqr,
ur fng qbja arkg gb zr naq envfrq zl urnq hcba uvf ync.  Ur crrerq nivqyl ng
zr, uvf rlrf frrzrq ernql gb qribhe gur frpergvba bbmvat sebz zl abfr.  "Bu,
gur cerggl yvggyr fabgsnpr," fnvq ur, ortvaavat gb cnag, "Ubj V'z tbvat gb
fhpx ure."  Gurerjvgu oraqvat qbja bire zr, naq gnxvat zl abfr va uvf zbhgu,
abg bayl qvq ur qribhe nyy gur zhphf orgjrra zl abfr naq zbhgu, ohg ur rira
yrjqyl qnegrq gur gvc bs uvf gbathr vagb rnpu bs zl abfgevyf, bar nsgre gur
bgure, naq jvgu fhpu pyrirearff ur cebibxrq gjb be guerr farrmrf juvpu
erqbhoyrq gur sybj ur qrfverq naq jnf pbafhzvat fb uhatevyl.  Ohg nfx zr sbe
ab qrgnvyf ornevat hcba guvf sryybj, Zrffvrhef, abguvat nccrnerq, naq jurgure
orpnhfr ur qvq abguvat, be orpnhrf ur qvq vg nyy va uvf qenjref, gurer jnf
abguvat gb or frra, naq nzvqfg gur zhygvghqr bs uvf xvffrf naq yrpurebhf
yvpxvatf gurer jnf abguvat bhgfgnaqvat juvpu zvtug unir qrabgrq na rpfgnfl,
naq pbafrdhragyl vg vf zl bcvavba gung ur qvq abg qvfpunetr.  Nyy zl pybgurf
jrer va cynpr, rira uvf unaqf fgnlrq fgvyy, naq V tvir lbh zl jbeq gung guvf
byq yvoregvar'f snagnfl zvtug or cresbezrq hcba gur jbeyq'f zbfg ercrpgnoyr
naq yrnfg vavgvngrq tvey jvgubhg ure orvat noyr gb fhccbfr gurer jnf nalguvat
yrjq va vg ng nyy.
		-- Znedhvf qr Fnqr
%
Nabgure aha wbxr!!!
	Lbh frr, guerr ahaf jrer jnyxvat qbja gur fgerrg, jura fhqqrayl
guvf synfure whzcrq bhg va sebag bs gurz naq bcrarq uvf gerapu pbng,
rkcbfvat uvf nyy gb gur fvfgref.  Jryy, gjb bs gur ahaf unq fgebxrf evtug
gurer, ohg gur guveq aha jbhyqa'g gbhpu vg.
%
Nal tvey jub oryvrirf gung gur jnl gb n zna'f urneg vf guebhtu
uvf fgbznpu vf boivbhfyl frggvat ure fgnaqneqf gbb uvtu.
%
NCY unpxref gnxr nyy gurl jnag.
%
Nccyr bjaref qb vg jvgu zvpr!
%
Nf ybat nf lbhe nff vf cbvagrq ng gur tebhaq, qba'g shpx jvgu zr.
%
Nf zl qrne nhagvr hfrq gb fnl, "Ybir znxrf gur jbeyq tb 'ebhaq, ohg frk
znxrf gur evqr sha."
%
Nf cneg bs na rdhny bccbeghavgl cebwrpg, n zrzb jnf frag gb nyy gur bssvprf
jvguva Rkgreany Nssnvef nfxvat sbe "N yvfg bs nyy rzcyblrrf oebxra qbja ol
frk."

Bar bs gur zrzbf jnf erghearq jvgu gur abgngvba: "V'z fbeel: jr
xabj bs abobql va guvf bssvpr jub svgf lbhe pevgrevn.  Jr qb, ubjrire,
unir gjb nypbubyvpf."
%
Nf fur ynl gurer qbmvat arkg orfvqr zr, n ibvpr vafvqr zl urnq xrcg fnlvat
"Erynk... lbh'er abg gur svefg qbpgbe jub'f rire fyrcg jvgu bar bs uvf
cngvragf," ohg nabgure ibvpr xrcg erzvaqvat zr, "Ubjneq, lbh'er n irgrevanevna."
%
Nf gur gehpx qevire pnzr sylvat bire gur gbc bs n fgrrc uvyy, ur fcbggrq gjb
svtherf va uvf cngu ebyyvat nebhaq va gur zvqqyr bs gur ebnq.  Gur qevire oyrj
uvf ubea naq oenxrq senagvpnyyl, ohg gur pbhcyr pbagvahrq gurve ybirznxvat, 
boyvivbhf gb uvf jneavatf.  Gur gehpx svanyyl fyvq gb n unyg oneryl guerr
vapurf sebz gur cnve.  "Ner lbh penml?" gur qevire fpernzrq ng gurz.  "Lbh
pbhyq unir orra xvyyrq!"

Gur zna fgbbq hc naq snprq gur qevire.  "Jryy, V jnf pbzvat, fur jnf pbzvat
naq lbh jrer pbzvat," ur cnagrq, "naq lbh jrer gur bayl bar jvgu oenxrf."
%
Nf lbh xabj, oveqf qb abg unir frkhny betnaf orpnhfr gurl jbhyq vagresrer
jvgu syvtug.  [Va snpg, guvf jnf gur ovt oernxguebhtu sbe gur Jevtug
Oebguref.  Gurl jrer jngpuvat oveqf bar qnl, gelvat gb svther bhg ubj gb trg
gurve pehqr znpuvar gb syl, jura fhqqrayl vg qnjarq ba Jvyohe.  "Beivyyr,"
ur fnvq, "nyy jr unir gb qb vf erzbir gur frkhny betnaf!" Lbh fubhyq unir
frra gurve bevtvany qrfvta.] Nf n erfhyg, oveqf ner irel, irel qvssvphyg gb
nebhfr frkhnyyl.  Lbh nyzbfg arire frr na nebhfrq oveq.  Fb jura gurl jnag
gb ercebqhpr, oveqf syl hc naq fgnaq ba gryrcubar yvarf, jurer gurl zbavgbe
gryrcubar pbairefngvbaf jvgu gurve srrg.  Jura gurl svaq n pbairefngvba va
juvpu crbcyr ner gnyxvat qvegl, gurl tevc gur yvar irel gvtugyl hagvy gurl
ner obgu uvtuyl nebhfrq, ng juvpu cbvag gur srznyr trgf certanag.
		-- Qnir Oneel, "Frk naq gur Fvatyr Nzbron: Jung Rirel
		   Grra Fubhyq Xabj"
%
Nfxrq ol ercbegref nobhg uvf hcpbzvat zneevntr gb n sbegl-gjb-lrne-byq
jbzna, qverpgbe Ebzna Cbynafxv gbyq ercbegref, "Gur jnl V ybbx ng vg,
fur'f gur rdhvinyrag bs guerr sbhegrra-lrne-byqf."
		-- Qnivq Yrggrezna
%
Nff, tenff be tnf... abobql evqrf sbe serr!
%
Nffnffvaf qb vg sebz oruvaq.
%
Ng ure naahny purpxhc, gur nggenpgvir lbhat jbzna vf gbyq ol gur qbpgbe gung
vg'f arprffnel gb gnxr ure grzcrengher erpgnyyl.  Fur nterrf naq oraqf bire
gur rknzvavat gnoyr, ohg n srj frpbaqf yngre fnlf vaqvtanagyl, "Qbpgbe, gung'f
ABG zl erpghz!"
	"Znqnz," fnlf gur qbpgbe, "gung'f abg zl gurezbzrgre!"
	Whfg gura, gur jbzna'f uhfonaq, urnevat ure ibvpr, pbzrf vagb gur
ebbz.  "Whfg jung gur uryy vf tbvat ba urer?" ur qrznaqf.
	"V'z gnxvat lbhe jvsr'f grzcrengher," gur qbpgbe pbbyl ercyvrf.
	"Bxnl, qbp, lbh xabj orfg," fnlf gur uhfonaq nf ur cvpxf n fpnycry
bss gur qbpgbe'f qrfx, "ohg jura gung guvat pbzrf bhg, vg orggre unir
ahzoref ba vg!"
%
Nggenpgrq ol ercrngrq arjfcncre nqiregvfrzragf, naq ernyvmvat gung
uvf jnvfg unq tbar obgu Rnfg naq Jrfg qrfcvgr uvf qnvyl enpdhrgonyy, n lbhat
rkrphgvir nccrnerq ng n ybpny urnygu erfbeg.  Ybbxvat bire gur frireny jrvtug
ybff cynaf bssrerq, ur fryrpgrq bar thnenagrrq gb erqhpr uvf jrvtug ol gjb
cbhaqf cre qnl.  Nsgre n yvtug oernxsnfg, naq n nyzbfg aba-rkvfgrag yhapu, ur
jnf rfpbegrq gb n ynetr ebbz, jurer n lbhat, nggenpgvir jbzna gbyq uvz gung
"vs ur pnhtug ure, ur pbhyq unir ure".  Nsgre na ubhe bs uneq ehaavat, ur
svanyyl tnir hc; naq jrvtuvat uvzfrys, jnf pbzsbegrq gb ernyvmr gung ur unq
ybfg whfg haqre guerr cbhaqf.  Ergheavat gur arkg jrrx, ur pubfr gur cyna gung
jnf gb erqhpr uvf jrvtug ol sbhe cbhaqf cre frffvba.  Nsgre sbyybjvat gur fnzr
ertvzra, ur jnf ntnva rfpbegrq gb n ynetr ebbz, ohg nsgre gjb ubhef bs ehaavat,
ur pnhtug gur lbhat jbzna.  Jrvtug ybff, whfg bire sbhe cbhaqf.  Ergheavat gur
sbyybjvat jrrx, ur pubfr gb ybfr rvtug cbhaqf va n fvatyr qnl.  Ur jnf fubja
gb gur ynetrfg ebbz ur'q frra, ol sne, jurer ur jnf pbasebagrq ol n rkgerzryl
zhfphyne, oheyl zna, jub ybbxrq uvz fdhner va gur rlr, syhat uvf gbjry vagb
n pbeare, naq faneyrq, "Lbh xabj gur ehyrf.  Fgneg ehaavat!"
%
Nggenpgvir ovfrkhny lbhat jbzna frrxf fnzr sbe uvtu zryybj gvzrf.
%
O4 V4D, EH/18 DG 3.1415926535?
%
Onaxref qb vg jvgu vagrerfg (cranygl sbe rneyl jvguqenjny).
%
Oneoen Jnygref jnf qbvat n qbphzragnel ba gur phfgbzf bs Nzrevpna
Vaqvnaf.  Nsgre n gbhe bs n erfreingvba gurl jrer ba, fur jnf phevbhf nf gb
gur ahzore bs srnguref va gur urnqqerffrf.  Fur nfxrq n oenir jub unq bayl
bar srngure va uvf urnqqerff.  Uvf ercyl jnf, "Zr unir bayl bar fdhnj, zr
unir bayl bar srngure."  Fur nfxrq nabgure oenir, srryvat gur svefg sryybj
jnf bayl wbxvat.  Guvf oenir unq sbhe srnguref va uvf urnqqerff.  Ur ercyvrq,
"Zr unir sbhe srnguref, orpnhfr zr fyrrc jvgu sbhe fdhnjf."
	Fgvyy abg pbaivaprq gur ahzore bs srnguref vaqvpngrq gur ahzore bs
fdhnjf vaibyirq, fur qrpvqrq gb vagreivrj gur Puvrs.  Abj gur Puvrs unq n
urnqqerff shyy bs srnguref juvpu, arrqyrff gb fnl, nzhfrq Zf. Jnygref.
Zf. J:	"Jul qb lbh unir fb znal srnguref va lbhe urnqqerff?"
Puvrs:	"Zr Puvrs, zr shpx-rz nyy, ovt, fznyy, sng, gnyy, zr shpx-rz nyy."
Zf. J:	"Lbh bhtug gb or uhat!"
Puvrs:	"Lbh qnzarq evtug, zr uhat.  Ovt yvxr ohssnyb, ybat yvxr fanxr."
Zf. J:	"Lbh qba'g unir gb or fb ubfgvyr!"
Puvrs:	"Ubff-fglyr, qbt-fglyr, jbys-fglyr, nal-fglyr, zr shpx-rz nyy."
Zf. J:	"Bu, qrne!"
Puvrs:	"Ab qrre, zr ab shpx qrre.  Nffubyr gbb uvtu naq shpxref eha
		gbb snfg."
%
ORNG ZR, OVGR ZR, JUVC ZR, SHPX ZR!!!
%
Orng zr, ovgr zr, juvc zr, shpx zr, znxr zr jevgr onq purpxf!
%
Orsber ur jrag bss gb gur jnef, Xvat Neguhe ybpxrq uvf ybiryl jvsr, 
Thvarirer, vagb ure punfgvgl oryg.  Gura ur fhzzbarq uvf yblny sevraq naq 
fhowrpg Fve Ynaprybg.  "Ynaprybg, aboyr xavtug," fnvq Neguhe, "jvguva guvf 
fgheql oryg vf vzcevfbarq gur iveghr bs zl jvsr.  Gur xrl gb guvf punfgr 
gernfher V jvyy ragehfg gb bayl bar zna va gur jbeyq.  Gb lbh."
	Uhzoyrq orsber guvf terng ubabe, Ynaprybg xaryg, erprvirq uvf xvat'f 
oyrffvat naq gbbx punetr bs gur xrl.  Neguhe zbhagrq uvf fgrrq naq ebqr bss.  
Abg unys n zvyr sebz uvf pnfgyr, ur urneq ubbsorngf oruvaq uvz naq ghearq gb 
frr Fve Ynaprybg evqvat uneq gb pngpu hc jvgu uvz.
	"Jung vf nzvff, zl sevraq?" nfxrq gur xvat.
	"Zl ybeq," tnfcrq Ynaprybg, "lbh unir tvira zr gur jebat xrl!"
%
"Orsber jr trg zneevrq," fnvq gur lbhat jbzna gb ure svnaprr, "V jnag gb
pbasrff fbzr nssnvef gung V'ir unq va gur cnfg."
	"Ohg lbh gbyq zr nyy nobhg gubfr n srj jrrxf ntb," ure lbhat zna
ercyvrq. 
	"Lrf, qneyvat," fur rkcynvarq, "ohg gung jnf n srj jrrxf ntb."
%
Oraq bire naq gnxr vg yvxr n zna!
%
Orgjrra gjb rivyf, V nyjnlf cvpx gur bar V arire gevrq orsber.
		-- Znr Jrfg
%
Ov abj, tnl yngre!
%
Ovyy naq Wvz jrer jnyxvat ubzr sebz jbex.  Nf gurl jnyxrq nybat, gurl 
qvfphffrq gurve jvirf' fcraqvat unovgf.  "V qba'g haqrefgnaq ubj jbzra 
pna fcraq fb zhpu zbarl," Ovyy rkpynvzrq.  "V zrna, haqrefgnaq, fur 
qba'g qevax, naq fur'f tbg ure bja chffl!"
%
Ovyy unq whfg erghearq sebz n jrrx bs ubarlzbbavat, naq uvf orfg 
sevraq nfxrq uvz ubj vg jrag.
	"Gur svefg avtug jr qvq vg avar gvzrf," Ovyy fnvq.  "Gur frpbaq 
avtug, rvtug gvzrf.  Gur guveq avtug, frira gvzrf.  Gur sbhegu avtug, fvk 
gvzrf.  Gur svsgu avtug, svir gvzrf.  Gur fvkgu avtug, sbhe gvzrf, naq gur 
ynfg avtug, abguvat!"
	"Abguvat?" uvf cny nfxrq.  "Ubj pbzr?"
	"Url, lbh rire gevrq chggvat n znefuznyybj va n cnexvat zrgre?"
%
Ovfrkhnyvgl vzzrqvngryl qbhoyrf lbhe punaprf sbe n qngr ba Fngheqnl avtug.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra
%
Obbxfgberf jvyy fbba or fgbpxvat n ibyhzr pnyyrq "Gur Hafrafhbhf
Prafhf Gnxre".  Vg'f nobhg n thl jub pbzrf bapr rirel gra lrnef.
%
Oenva ba inpngvba, cravf ba nhgbcvybg.
%
	"Oernxsnfg fbzrgvzr?"
	"Fher."
	"Funyy V pnyy lbh be whfg ahqtr lbh?"
%
"Ohg vs vg'f 80% tyhpbfr, gura jul qbrf vg gnfgr fnygl?"
		-- Nabalzbhf zrq fpubby fghqrag.
%
... Ohg gur erjneq bs n fhpprffshy pbyynobengvba vf n guvat gung pnaabg
or cebqhprq ol rvgure bs gur cnegvrf jbexvat nybar.  Vg vf nxva gb gur
orarsvgf bs frk jvgu n cnegare, nf bccbfrq gb znfgheongvba.  Gur ynggre
vf sha, ohg lbh fubj zr nalbar jub unf tbggra n onol sebz cynlvat jvgu
uvz be urefrys, naq V'yy fubj lbh na htyl onol, jvgu whfg n jubyr ohapu
bs xahpxyrf.
		-- Uneyna Ryyvfba
%
Ohg jr'ir bayl sbaqyrq gur fhesnpr bs gung fhowrpg.
		-- Ivetvavn Znfgref, bs Znfgre & Wbuafba
%
Ohl byq znfgref.  Gurl srgpu orggre cevprf guna byq zvfgerffrf.
		-- Ybeq Ornireoebbx
%
Pnyy sbe Zf. Yvathf, Zf. Pbaavr Yvathf...
%
	"Pna lbh unzzre n 6-vapu fcvxr vagb n jbbqra cynax jvgu lbhe cravf?"
	"Hu, abg evtug abj."
	"Gfx.  N tvey unf gb unir fbzr fgnaqneqf."
		-- "Erny Travhf"
%
Punfgr znxrf jnfgr.
%
Punfgvgl vf vgf bja chavfuzrag.
%
Pynhqr oryvrirq gung bayl fzneg nggenpgvir crbcyr unq gur evtug gb shpx,
naq vg fvapreryl uheg uvz jura ur qvfpbirerq rivqrapr gb gur pbagenel.
		-- Gbz Eboovaf, "Wvggreoht Creshzr"
%
Pybfr gur qbbe, yrg zr tvir lbh jung lbh'ir orra jnvgvat sbe!!
%
Pbssrr jvgubhg pnssrvar.  Orre jvgubhg nypbuby.  Zvyx jvgubhg sng.
Jung'f arkg?  Oevqny fhvgrf jvgu ohax orqf?
		-- Beora'f Pheerag Pbzrql
%
Pbvgb retb fhz.
%
Pbvghf vf chavfuzrag sbe gur unccvarff bs orvat gbtrgure.  Yvir nf
nfprgvpnyyl nf cbffvoyr... gung vf gur bayl cbffvoyr jnl sbe zr gb
raqher zneevntr.  Ohg fur?
		-- Senam Xnsxn
%
Pbyyrtr vf yvxr n jbzna -- lbh jbex fb uneq gb trg va, naq avar zbaguf yngre
lbh jvfu lbh'q arire pbzr.
%
Pbzr hc naq frr zr fbzrgvzr.  Pbzr Jrqarfqnl, gung'f nzngrhe avtug.
		-- Znr Jrfg
%
Pbzzvg gur byqrfg fvaf gur arjrfg xvaq bs jnlf.
		-- Jvyyvnz Funxrfcrner, "Urael VI"
%
Pbzzhavfgf qb vg jvgubhg pynff.
%
Pbzchgre fpvragvfgf ner cebtenzzrq gb qb vg ol znpeb vafregvba.
%
Pbaqbzf ner yvxr yvfgravat gb n flzcubal jvgu pbggba va lbhe rnef.

	[Gnxvat n fubjre va envapbng?  Rq.]
%
Pbaqbzf ner gur srzvavfgf' eriratr ba zra sbe qvncuenzf.
		-- Ebova Jvyyvnzf
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	n fzneg zna xabjf ba juvpu fvqr uvf oebnq vf orggre.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	obl jub cynl jvgu uvzfrys chyyf obare.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	puvyq pbaprvirq va onpx frng bs pne jvgu nhgbzngvp genafzvffvba
		ghea bhg gb or fuvsgyrff onfgneq.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	rcyvyrcgvp jbzna jub tvir oybj-wbo znl ovgr ovt bar.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	sbby zna pyvzo gerr gb trg pureevrf;  jvfr zna fcernq yvzof.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	Xbgrk abg orfg guvat ba rnegu, ohg arkg gb orfg.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna naq zbhfr gur fnzr, obgu raq hc va chffl.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub neevirf yngr gb cnegl jvyy svaq uvzfrys orngra gb gur chapu!
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub orng bss va pne unir ubg ebq.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub svtugf jvgu jvsr nyy qnl, trgf abg crnpr ng avtug.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub svfurf va bgure zna'f jryy bsgra pngpu penof.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub tb gb orq jvgu frk ceboyrz jnxr hc jvgu fbyhgvba va unaq.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub xvpxrq va grfgvpyrf trg yrsg ubyqvat ont.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub xvff tvey'f oruvaq, trg penpx va snpr.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub ynl tvey ba uvyy, abg ba yriry.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub yvr haqre pne, trg gverq -- zna jub fgnaq oruvaq pne,
		trg rkunhfgrq.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub yvir va tynff ubhfr fubhyq ongur va gur onfrzrag.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub ybfr xrl gb tveysevraq'f ncnegzrag trg ab arj xrl.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub znxr ybir ba tebhaq unir cvrpr ba Rnegu.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub znxr beny ybir gb rcvyrcgvp jbzna znl trg gbathr-gvrq.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub zneel tvey jvgu ab ohfg unf evtug gb srry ybj qbja.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub chyy bhg gbb snfg yrnir ehoore.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub fperjf arne tenirlneq vf shpxvat arne qrnq.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub fyrrc va ebnq jnxr hc jvgu eha-qbja srryvat.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub fyrrcf jvgu byq ura svaqf vg'f orggre guna chyyrg.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub fgernx hafhvgrq sbe jbex.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jub fhpx avccyrf znxr pyrna oernfg bs guvatf.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jvgu nguyrgvp svatre znxr oebnq whzc
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jvgu urnq hc nff unir fuvggl bhgybbx ba yvsr.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zna jvgu ubyr va cbpxrg srry pbpxl nyy qnl.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	zbqrea ubhfr jvgubhg gbvyrg hapnaal.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	cnffvbangr xvff yvxr fcvqre jro, yrnq gb haqbvat bs syl.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	frira qnlf ba ubarlzbba znxr bar ubyr jrnx.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	fdhveery jub eha hc jbzna'f yrt abg svaq ahgf.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna fubhyq abg zneel onfxrgonyy cynlref -- gurl qevooyr orsber
		gurl fubbg.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub ongur va ivartne unir fbhe chff.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub pbbxf pneebgf naq crrf va fnzr cbg irel hafnavgnel.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub syl hcfvqr qbja va nvecynar unir ovt penpx hc.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub tbrf gb zna'f ncnegzrag sbe fanpx, znl trg gvg ovg.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub chg zna va qbt ubhfr svaq uvz va png ubhfr.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub evqr ovplpyr crqqyr nff nebhaq gbja.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub fyvqr qbja onaavfgre znxr zbaxrl fuvar.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna jub fcevat ba vaare-fcevat guvf fcevat, unir bss-fcevat
		arkg fcevat.
%
Pbashpvbhf fnl:
	jbzna'f vetvavgl yvxr onyybba, bar cevpx naq nyy tbar.
%
Pbafreir raretl -- znxr ybir zber fybjyl.
%
Pbafvqre gur yvggyr zbhfr, ubj fntnpvbhf na navzny vg vf juvpu arire
ragehfgf vgf yvsr gb bar ubyr bayl.
		-- Gvghf Znppvhf Cynhghf
%
Pbhcyrf va zbgvba unir zbzragf.
%
Pevgvpf ner yvxr rhahpuf va n unerz: gurl xabj ubj vg'f qbar, gurl'ir
frra vg qbar rirel qnl, ohg gurl'er hanoyr gb qb vg gurzfryirf.
		-- Oeraqna Oruna
%
Phaavyvathf vf arkg gb pyrnayvarff.
%
Phaavyvathf vf arkg gb tbqyvarff.
%
Qnapr vf gur iregvpny rkcerffvba bs n ubevmbagny vagragvba.
%
"Qneyvat", fnvq gur lbhat oevqr, "gryy zr jung'f obgurevat lbh.
Jr cebzvfrq gb funer nyy bhe wblf naq fbeebjf, erzrzore?"
	"Ohg guvf vf qvssrerag," cebgrfgrq ure uhfonaq.
	"Gbtrgure, qneyvat," fur vafvfgrq, "jr jvyy orne gur oheqra.
Abj gryy zr jung bhe ceboyrz vf."
	"Jryy," fnvq gur uhfonaq, "jr'ir whfg orpbzr gur sngure bs n
onfgneq puvyq."
%
"Qneyvat," ur oerngurq, "nsgre znxvat ybir V qbhog vs V'yy 
or noyr gb trg bire lbh -- fb jbhyq lbh zvaq nafjrevat gur cubar?"
%
"Qneyvat," fur juvfcrerq, "jvyy lbh fgvyy ybir zr nsgre jr ner zneevrq?"

Ur pbafvqrerq guvf sbe n zbzrag naq gura ercyvrq, "V guvax fb. V'ir
nyjnlf orra rfcrpvnyyl sbaq bs zneevrq jbzra."
%
Qrne Nool:
	V whfg zrg gur zbfg greevsvp tvey naq jr trg nybat snohybhfyl.  V
guvax fur'f gur bar sbe zr.  Gurer'f whfg bar ceboyrz: V pna'g erzrzore
sebz bhe svefg qngr vs fur gbyq zr fur unq GO be IQ.  Jung fubhyq V qb?
			--Pbashfrq

Qrne Pbashfrq:
	Vs fur pbhtuf, shpx ure.
%
Qrzbafgengvat bapr ntnva gur vzcbegnapr bs gur ybjyl pbzzn, guvf
gryrtenz jnf frag sebz n jvsr gb ure uhfonaq:
	"ABG TRGGVAT NAL, ORGGRE PBZR UBZR NG BAPR."
%
Qrfcrengr orpnhfr ure uhfonaq unqa'g znqr ybir gb ure va zbaguf, n ybaryl
ubhfrjvsr svanyyl zhfgrerq ure pbhentr naq jrag gb gurve qbpgbe sbe nqivpr.
Gur qbpgbe jnf irel flzcngurgvp naq jebgr bhg n cerfpevcgvba sbe cvyyf gung
jrer thnenagrrq gb erxvaqyr gur uhfonaq'f neqbe va n ovt jnl.  "Gurl'yy znxr
uvz ubeal nf uryy," gur qbpgbe pbasvqrq, "ohg gurl'er irel cbgrag, fb whfg
chg bar va jungrire ur'f qevaxvat."
	Hcba neevivat ubzr, gur jbzna yrsg gur cvyyf ba gur xvgpura pbhagre
naq qnfurq bss gb gur fhcreznexrg.  Vg qvqa'g gnxr ybat orsber gur png whzcrq
hc, xabpxrq gurz bire bagb gur sybbe, naq ngr n pbhcyr, nf qvq gur snzvyl
qbt.  Naq jura gur uhfonaq tbg ubzr jvgu n urnqnpur, ur gbbx n srj guvaxvat
gurl jrer nfcveva.
	Jura gur ubhfrjvsr erghearq, fur jnf ubeevsvrq gb frr gur qbt uhzcvat
gur png naq gur png whzcvat nyy bire gur qbt, ohg rira fgenatre jnf gur fvtug
bs ure uhfonaq jvgu uvf cravf vafvqr gur crapvy funecrare ba gur pbhagre.
"Jung va urnira'f anzr ner lbh qbvat, Wbua?" fur pevrq.
	"Frr gung zbfdhvgb?" ur ercyvrq.
%
Qvny 911.  Znxr n pbc pbzr.
%
Qvq Qrgebvg vairag gur onpx frng gb qrfgebl gur zbenyf bs Nzrevpn?
		-- Rq Fnaqref
%
Qvq lbh rire abgvpr gung rirelbar va snibhe bs ovegu pbageby unf nyernql
orra obea?
		-- Oraal Uvyy
%
Qvfgevohgrq Flfgrzf crbcyr qb vg ybbfryl pbhcyrq.
%
QVIR!!!  QVIR!!!  QVIR!!!
HC CREVFPBCR!!!

(Bbbcf, fbeel, jebat snagnfl.)
%
Qb V yvxr trggvat qehax?  Qrcraqf ba jub'f qbvat gur qevaxvat.
		-- Nzl Tbeva
%
Qb vasnagf unir nf zhpu sha va vasnapl nf nqhygf qb va nqhygrel?
%
Qb abg fgbbc gb gvr lbhe ynprf va lbhe arvtuobe'f zryba cngpu.
%
Qb fbzrguvat ovt -- shpx n tvnag.
%
"Qb lbh purng ba lbhe jvsr?" nfxrq gur cflpuvngevfg.

"Jub ryfr?" nafjrerq gur cngvrag.
%
	"Qb lbh fzbxr nsgre frk?"
	"Jul, qb lbh xabj, V'ir arire ybbxrq!"
%
Qbpgbef gnxr gjb nfcveva naq qb vg va gur zbeavat.
%
Qbphzragngvba vf yvxr frk:  jura vg vf tbbq, vg vf irel, irel tbbq; naq
jura vg vf onq, vg vf orggre guna abguvat.
		-- Qvpx Oenaqba
%
	Qbrf nalbar xabj ubj gb trg pubpbyngr flehc naq ubarl bhg bs n
juvgr ryrpgevp oynaxrg?  V'z nsenvq gb jnfu vg va gur znpuvar.

Gunaxf, Xngul.  (sebag qrfx, k17)

c.f.	Nyfb, nalbar rire hfrq Abkrzn ba sevpgvba oheaf? Be vf Infryvar orggre?
%
Qbva' vg va gur qnex, qbja va Ebpx Perrx Cnex.
%
Qba'g xabpx znfgheongvba, vg'f frk jvgu fbzrbar V ybir.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra
%
Qba'g yrg lbhe zbhgu jevgr ab purpx gung lbhe gnvy pna'g pnfu.
		-- Ob Qvqqyrl
%
Qba'g ybbx abj -- lbhe bssvpr zngr vf n crqrenfg!!!
%
Qba'g ybbx abj, ohg lbhe zbgure vf univat frk jvgu n ubefr.
%
Qevaxvat jura jr ner abg guvefgl naq znxvat ybir ng nyy frnfbaf, znqnz:
gung vf nyy gurer vf gb qvfgvathvfu hf sebz gur bgure navznyf.
		-- Cvreer qr Ornhznepunvf, "Yr Zneevntr qr Svtneb"
%
Qel shpxvat: gung'f zna ba gbc bs jbzna, gur npgvba vf gur fnzr nf shpxvat,
ohg lbh'er qerffrq.  Vg'f terng sbe gur tvey... lbh'er uvggvat naq ehoovat
rknpgyl gur nern gung lbh bhtug gb or... V fgvyy yvxr gung.
		-- Tenpr Fyvpx
%
Qhevat n frffvba jvgu n zneevntr pbhafrybe, gur jvsr fanccrq ng ure 
uhfonaq: "Gung'f abg gehr, V qb rawbl frk!"  Gura, gheavat gb gur pbhafrybe,
fur nqqrq: "Ohg guvf svraq rkcrpgf vg guerr be sbhe gvzrf n lrne!"
%
Rq, n geniryvat fnyrfzna, unq uvf pne oernx qbja va gur zvqqyr bs n 
oyvmmneq.  Ur gehqtrq gb n arneol snezubhfr jurer gur snezre gbyq uvz gung, 
juvyr gurl jrer fubeg bs orqf, ur pbhyq fyrrc jvgu uvf qnhtugre.  Fur cebirq 
gb or rvtugrra naq ornhgvshy.   Fb gurl jrag gb orq, naq fubegyl, Rq znqr n 
cnff ng gur qnhtugre.  "Fgbc gung!" fur fnvq.  "V'yy pnyy zl sngure."  
	Ur qrfvfgrq.  Ohg unys na ubhe yngre ur znqr nabgure nggrzcg.  "Hu, 
fgbc ... gung," fur fnvq.  "V'yy pnyy zl sngure."
	Ohg fur zbirq pybfre gb uvz, fb ur znqr n guveq gel.  Guvf gvzr, ab
cebgrfg, ab guerng.  Whfg nf Rq, fngvfsvrq, jnf nobhg gb qebjfr bss, fur 
ghttrq ng uvf cnwnzn fyrrir.  "Pbhyq jr qb gung ntnva?" fur nfxrq.  
	Rq boyvtrq, naq guvf gvzr sryy nfyrrc bayl gb or njnxrarq ol gur 
ght ng uvf fyrrir.  "Ntnva?"  
	Naq ntnva Rq boyvtrq.  Ohg jura uvf fyrrc jnf bapr zber vagreehcgrq
ol gur ghttvat ng uvf cnwnzn fyrrir, Rq vaqvtanagyl chyyrq vg njnl sebz ure
naq zhzoyrq, "Fgbc gung!  Be V'yy pnyy lbhe sngure."
%
RR'f qb vg jvgubhg fubegf.
%
Ryrpgevpny Ratvarref qb vg jvgu yrff erfvfgnapr.
%
Rinatryvfgf qb vg jvgu Uvz jngpuvat.
%
Rire abgvpr gung gur jbzra jub ner ntnvafg nobegvba ner gur barf lbh
jbhyqa'g jnag gb shpx va gur svefg cynpr?
		-- Trbetr Pneyva
%
Rirel qbt unf vgf qnl, ohg gur avtugf orybat gb gur chfflpngf.
%
Rirel uneybg jnf n ivetva bapr.
		-- Jvyyvnz Oynxr
%
Rirelbar va gur fzneg avtugpyho jnf nznmrq ol gur byq tragyrzna, 
boivbhfyl chfuvat 70, gbffvat bss znaunggnaf naq pnibegvat nebhaq gur qnapr 
sybbe yvxr n 20-lrne byq.  Svanyyl phevbhfvgl tbg gur orfg bs gur pvtnerggr 
tvey.  "V ort lbhe cneqba, fve," fur fnvq, "ohg V'z nznmrq gb frr n tragyrzna
bs lbhe ntr yvivat vg hc yvxr n lbhatfgre.  Gryy zr, ner nyy bs lbhe snphygvrf
havzcnverq?"
	Gur byq sryybj ybbxrq hc ng gur tvey fnqyl naq fubbx uvf urnq.  "Abg 
nyy, V'z nsenvq." ur fnvq.  "Whfg ynfg riravat V jrag avtugpyhoovat jvgu n 
tveysevraq -- jr qenax naq qnaprq nyy avtug naq svanyyl ebyyrq vagb ure cynpr 
nobhg gjb N.Z.  Jr jrag gb orq vzzrqvngryl, naq V jnf nfyrrc nyzbfg nf fbba
nf zl urnq uvg gur cvyybj.  V jbxr nebhaq guerr-guvegl naq ahqtrq zl tvey."
	"Jul, Trbetr," fur fnvq va fhcevfr, "jr qvq gung svsgrra zvahgrf ntb."
	"Fb lbh frr," gur byq obl fnvq fnqyl, "zl zrzbel vf ortvaavat gb 
snvy zr."
%
Rkprcg sbe 75% bs gur jbzra, rirelbar va gur jubyr jbeyq jnagf gb unir frk.
		-- Ryyla Zhfgneq
%
	Snezre Wbuafba jnf qehax ntnva.
	"Lbh xabj, Naan," ur fnvq gb uvf ybat-fhssrevat jvsr, "vs lbh pbhyq
bayl ynl rttf jr pbhyq trg evq bs nyy gubfr qnza puvpxraf."
	Naan fnvq abguvat.  Snezre Wbuafba gevrq ntnva.  "Lbh xabj, Naan, vs
bayl lbh pbhyq tvir zvyx jr pbhyq trg evq bs gung rkcrafvir ureq bs pbjf."
	Naan ybbxrq ng uvz pbbyyl. "Lbh xabj, Wnpx," fur fnvq, "vs bayl lbh
pbhyq trg vg hc bapr va n juvyr jr pbhyq trg evq bs lbhe oebgure Obo."
%
Sngure:	Fba, vg'f gvzr jr gnyxrq nobhg frk.
Fba:	Fher, Qnq, jung qb lbh jnag gb xabj?
%
Svtugvat sbe crnpr vf yvxr fperjvat sbe ivetvavgl.
%
	"Svefg, V'z tbvat gb ohl lbh n srj qevaxf naq trg lbh n yvggyr gvtug,"
fnvq gur thl ntterffviryl.
	"Bu, ab, lbh'er abg," fnvq gur tvey.
	"Gura V'yy gnxr lbh gb qvaare ng gur zbfg rkpyhfvir erfgnhenag va 
gbja."
	"Bu, ab, lbh jba'g."
	"Gura V'yy gnxr lbh gb zl ncnegzrag naq zvk hc n cvgpure bs qnvdhvevf."
	"Bu, ab, lbh jba'g."
	"Gura V'z tbvat gb znxr ivbyrag, znq, cnffvbangr ybir gb lbh."
	"Bu, ab, lbh'er abg."
	"Naq V'z abg tbvat gb gnxr nal cerpnhgvbaf rvgure!" fnvq gur thl.
	"Bu, lrf, lbh ner!!" fnvq gur tvey.
%
Sybccl abj, uneq yngre.
%
Sbe n tnl gvzr, pnyy 555-9483.  Nfx sbe Oehpvr.
%
Sbe n tbbq gvzr, pnyy 555-9484.  Nfx sbe Pngul.
%
Sbe n tbbq gvzr, pnyy 555-9485.  Nfx sbe Zvpunry.
%
Sbe puvyqera, n jbzna.
Sbe cyrnfher, n obl.
Sbe furre rpfgnfl, n zryba.
%
Sbe synibe, vafgnag frk jvyy arire fhcreprqr gur fghss lbh unir gb crry
naq pbbx.
		-- Dhragva Pevfc
%
Sbe ure svefg jrrx'f fnynel gur tbetrbhf arj frpergnel jnf tvira na 
rkdhvfvgr avtugtbja bs vzcbegrq ynpr.  Gur arkg jrrx ure fnynel jnf envfrq!
%
SBEGHAR QVFPHFFRF GUR QVSSRERAPRF ORGJRRA ZRA NAQ JBZRA:	#15

Frk:
	Jbzra cersre 30-40 zvahgrf bs sbercynl.  Zra cersre 30-40 frpbaqf bs
sbercynl.  Zra pbafvqre qevivat onpx gb ure cynpr nf cneg bs gur sbercynl.

Znghevgl:
	Jbzra zngher zhpu snfgre guna zra.  Zbfg 17-lrne-byq srznyrf pna
shapgvba nf nqhygf.  Zbfg 17-lrne-byq znyrf ner fgvyy genqvat onfronyy pneqf
naq tvivat rnpu bgure jrqtvrf nsgre tlz pynff.  Guvf vf jul uvtu fpubby
ebznaprf eneryl jbex bhg.

Unaqjevgvat:
	Gb gurve perqvg, zra qb abg qrpbengr gurve craznafuvc.  Gurl whfg
puvpxra-fpengpu.  Jbzra hfr fpragrq, pbyberq fgngvbanel naq gurl qbg gurve
"v'f" jvgu pvepyrf naq urnegf.  Jbzra hfr evqvphybhfyl ynetr ybbcf va gurve
"c'f" naq "t'f".  Vg vf n eblny cnva gb ernq n abgr sebz n jbzna.  Rira
jura fur'f qhzcvat lbh, fur'yy chg n fzvyrl snpr ng gur raq bs gur abgr.
%
SBEGHAR QVFPHFFRF GUR QVSSRERAPRF ORGJRRA ZRA NAQ JBZRA:	#18

Frkhny serdhrapl:
	Gur nirentr zna jbhyq cersre univat frk rirel riravat, be rirel
zbeavat, be znlor obgu vs ur'f haqre 25.  Gur nirentr jbzna jbhyq yvxr gb
unir frk aba-fgbc nyy jrrxraq, bapr n zbagu.

Fubccvat:
	Vg'f ab pbvapvqrapr gung Y.Y. Orna, Frnef, naq Ebrohpx jrer nyy zra.
Zra qba'g yvxr gb fubc.  Vs n zna pna'g sbvfg gur wbo bss ba fbzr jbzna, ur
jvyy tevg uvf grrgu naq cyna gur bhgvat nf ur jbhyq n whatyr rkcrqvgvba.
Ur jnagf n znc bs gur fgber fubjvat jurer ur unf gb tb gb trg vgrz K va
pbybe L va gur pbeerpg fvmr, juvpu ur qbrfa'g xabj.  Rira gura vg gnxrf uvz
unys na ubhe gb trg gurer sebz gur ragenapr.  Jura ur'f svanyyl nppbzcyvfurq
uvf zvffvba, ur'yy qvfpbire gung ur sbetbg uvf purpxobbx.  Jbzra fubc gb
erynk.
%
Sbeghar crefbanyf:
	FQJ/Z, 35, bssref Serapu yrffbaf sbe ynqvrf.
	Vs lbh qrfver syhrapl va gur Serapu gbathr,
	guvf phaavat yvathvfg pna yvpx lbhe ceboyrz.
	Sbeghar -- C.B. Obk 478
%
Sbeghar Crefbanyf:
	FJOvZ, 29.  Te/Se/Zvyq Ratyvfu.  Unir
	bja zbbfr, ubbc.  Fvaprer vadhvevrf
	bayl.  Qvfperrg.  Sbeghar C.B. Obk 1910.
%
Sbeghar cerfragf:
	HFRSHY CUENFRF VA RFCRENAGB, #3.

Xvr rfgnf yn cyrw cebxfvzn znfn^trwb?	Jurer'f gur arnerfg znffntr cneybe?
Iv qbybevtnf zva.			Lbh'er uhegvat zr.
Zv qrmvenf ivmvgv hfbana xhenpvfgba.	V jnag gb frr na Nzrevpna qbpgbe.
Zv qrmvenf n^prgv xbagenhtenirqn^wbwa.	V jbhyq yvxr gb ohl fbzr
						pbagenprcgvirf.
^Ph gvh rfgvf naxnh oban cbe pv?	Jnf vg tbbq sbe lbh gbb?
%
Sbeghar cerfragf:
	HFRSHY CUENFRF VA RFCRENAGB, #4.
Zvn ^firob^fvcb rfgnf cyran wr natvybw.	Zl ubirepensg vf shyy bs rryf.
Aravh nagvpvcnf yn uvfcnana		Ab bar rkcrpgf gur Fcnavfu
	Vaxivmvpvba.				Vadhvfvgvba.
Yn fbyib rfgnf xineqrxqh.		Gur nafjre vf sbegl-gjb.
Nqvnh, xnw qnaxbw cbe ^pvbz qn sv^fb.	Fb ybat, naq gunaxf sbe nyy gur svfu.
^Ph rfgnf xenwbab ra ivn cb^fb, nh ^ph	Vf gung n crapvy va lbhe cbpxrg,
	iv sryv^pnf cev ivqv zva?		be ner lbh unccl gb frr zr?
%
Sbeghar haqrefgnaqf gung gur ibgr ba n ovyy gb yrtnyvmr ovfrkhnyvgl
pbhyq tb rvgure jnl.
%
Sbeghar'f Thvqr gb Zbivrf:
T:   Ab tvey.
CT:  Gur ureb trgf gur tvey.
E:   Gur onq thl trgf gur tvey, gura gur tbbq thl trgf gur tvey.
K:   Gur ureb fgvyy trgf gur tvey va gur raq, ohg ur'f arire fher
	juvpu raq vg jvyy or.
KKK: Rirelobql trgf gur tvey.
%
					SEBZ GUR QRFX BS
					Fabj Juvgr

Qrne Fabj Juvgr:

	Gunaxf sbe ynfg avtug.

		Fyrrcl, Qbp, Tehzcl, Farrml, Unccl, Qbcrl, Onfushy
%
Tneqraref qb vg va envfrq orqf.
%
	"Trr, Zhqurnq, rirelbar ng Zber Fpvrapr Uvtu unf na rkgenpheevphyne 
npgvivgl rkprcg lbh."
	"Jryy, trr, qbrfa'g Ybhvfr pbhag?"
	"Bayl gb gra, Zhqurnq."

			-- Sverfvta Gurngre
%
Tragyrzra cersre oybaqrf, ohg jub fnlf oybaqrf cersre tragyrzra?
		-- Znr Jrfg
%
Trbzrgel grnpurf hf gb ovfrk natryf.
%
Trbetr, nsgre glvat ba n jubccre gur avtug orsber, jbxr hc va gur zbeavat gb
svaq n cngurgvpnyyl hanggenpgvir jbzna fyrrcvat oyvffshyyl orfvqr uvz.  Ur
yrncrq bhg bs orq, qerffrq dhvpxyl, naq shegviryl cynprq $100 ba gbc bs gur
ohernh.  Ur gura fgnegrq gb gvcgbr bhg bs gur ebbz.  Ohg, nf ur cnffrq gur
sbbg bs gur orq, ur sryg n ght ng uvf gebhfre yrt.  Tynapvat qbja, ur fnj 
nabgure srznyr rira ubzryvre guna gur bar ur'q yrsg va orq.  Fur tnmrq hc 
ng uvz fbhyshyyl, naq nfxrq, "Abguvat sbe gur oevqrfznvq?"
%
Tveyf ner yvxr cvnabf.  Jura gurl'er abg hcevtug, gurl'er tenaq!
%
Tveyf jub chg bhg ner genzcf.  Tveyf jub qba'g ner ynqvrf.  Guvf vf,
ubjrire, n engure nepunvp hfr bs gur jbeq.  Fubhyq bar bs lbh oblf unccra
hcba n tvey jub qbrfa'g chg bhg, qb abg whzc gb gur pbapyhfvba gung lbh
unir sbhaq n ynql.  Jung lbh unir cebonoyl sbhaq vf n yrfovna.
		-- Sena Yrobjvgm, "Zrgebcbyvgna Yvsr"
%
Tveyf jbhyq arire fgnl bhg yngr vs thlf qvqa'g znxr gurz.
%
Tvir n zna n serr unaq naq ur'yy eha vg nyy bire lbh.
		-- Znr Jrfg
%
Tb bhg jvgu tveyf Qhgpu gerng -- cnl sbe qvaare, qevaxf, naq gur zbivr,
naq gur erfg bs gur riravat vf ba ure.
%
Tbq ohvyg n pbzcryyvat frk qevir vagb rirel perngher, ab znggre
jung fglyr bs shpxvat vg cenpgvprq.  Ur znqr frk veerfvfgvoyl cyrnfhenoyr,
jvyqyl wblbhf, serr sebz srnef.  Ur znqr vg vaabprag zreevzrag.
	Arrqyrff gb fnl, shpxvat jnf na vzzrqvngr fznfu uvg.  Rirelbar
nterrq, sebz nneqinexf gb mroenf.  Nyy gur wbyyl navznyf -- yvbaf naq
ynzof, euvabprebfrf naq tnmryyrf, fxlynexf naq ybofgref, rira vafrpgf,
gubhtu zbfg bs gurz shpx bayl bapr va n yvsrgvzr -- shpxrq nybat
vaabpragyl naq zreevyl sbe uhaqerqf bs zvyyvbaf bs lrnef.  Znlor gurl
jrer qhzo navznyf, ohg gurl xarj n tbbq guvat jura gurl unq bar.
		-- Nyna Furezna, "Gur Encr bs gur N*C*R*"
%
Unpxref qb vg obggbz-hc.
%
Unpxref qb vg jvgu nyy fbegf bs punenpgref.
%
Unpxref qb vg jvgu ohtf.
%
Unpxref qb vg jvgu srjre vafgehpgvbaf.
%
Unpxref unir xreary xabjyrqtr.
%
Unpxref xabj nyy gur evtug ZBIf.
%
Unat tyvqref tb qbja irel fybjyl.
%
	Uneel pbafgnagyl veevgngrq uvf sevraqf jvgu uvf rgreany bcgvzvfz.
Ab znggre ubj onq gur fvghngvba, ur jbhyq nyjnlf fnl, "Jryy, vg pbhyq unir
orra jbefr."
	Gb pher uvz bs uvf naablvat unovg, uvf sevraqf qrpvqrq gb vairag n
fvghngvba fb pbzcyrgryl oynpx, fb qernqshy, gung rira Uneel pbhyq svaq ab 
ubcr va vg.  Nccebnpuvat uvz ng gur pyho one bar qnl, bar bs gurz fnvq,
"Uneel!  Qvq lbh urne jung unccrarq gb Trbetr?  Ur pnzr ubzr ynfg avtug,
sbhaq uvf jvsr va orq jvgu nabgure zna, fubg gurz obgu, naq gura ghearq
gur tha ba uvzfrys!"
	"Greevoyr," fnvq Uneel.  "Ohg vg pbhyq unir orra jbefr."
	"Ubj va uryy," qrznaqrq uvf qhzsbhaqrq sevraq, "pbhyq vg cbffvoyl
unir orra jbefr?"
	"Jryy," fnvq Uneel, "vs vg unq unccrarq gur avtug orsber, V'q or
qrnq evtug abj."
%
	Uneel jnf qryvtugrq jura ur sbhaq n lbhat jbzna jub npprcgrq uvf
cebcbfny bs zneevntr nf ur jnf cerggl frafvgvir nobhg uvf negvsvpvny yrt
naq nsenvq gung ab bar jbhyq unir uvz.  Va snpg, ur pbhyqa'g oevat uvzfrys
gb gryy uvf svnaprr nobhg uvf yrt jura ur fyvccrq gur evat ba ure svatre,
abe jura fur obhtug gur qerff, abe jura gurl cvpxrq gur gvzr naq cynpr.
Nyy ur xrcg fnlvat jnf, "Qneyvat, V'ir tbg n ovt fhecevfr sbe lbh," ng juvpu
fur oyhfurq naq fzvyrq orjvgpuvatyl.
	Gur jrqqvat pnzr naq jrag, naq gur lbhat pbhcyr jrer ng ynfg nybar
va gurve ubarlzbba fhvgr. "Abj qba'g sbetrg, Uneel, lbh cebzvfrq zr n ovt
fhecevfr," fzvyrq gur oevqr.
	Hanoyr gb fnl n jbeq, Uneel ghearq bhg gur yvtugf, hafgenccrq uvf
yrt, fyvccrq vagb orq, naq cynprq uvf jvsr'f unaq ba gur fghzc.
	"Uzzzzz," fur fnvq fbsgyl, "gung VF n fhecevfr. Ohg cnff zr gur
Infryvar naq V'yy frr jung V pna qb!"
%
Unir lbh rire gevrq gb gvpxyr lbhefrys?  Rirelobql unf fbzr jnpxb nhag be
hapyr gung pna whfg cbvag ng lbh naq unir lbh ebyyvat jvgu ynhtugre.  Ohg
vs lbh fubir lbhe svfg va lbhe haqrenez sbe n jrrx naq n unys lbh jba'g
ynhtu.  Fbzrubj lbhe haqrenez whfg xabjf gung vg'f *lbhe* svfg.  Gunax Tbq
bgure cnegf bs bhe obqvrf ner qhzore.
%
Univat qvfpbirerq gur cbffvovyvgl gung bgure perngherf pbhyq or hfrq
sbe frkhny vagrepbhefr, rneyl zna jnf yvxryl gb unir znqr znal fhpu
nggrzcgf... gubhtu vg vf qbhogshy gung ur jnf fb frkhnyyl pneavibebhf
nf gur Puevfgvna naq Wrjvfu Nqnz, jub, enoovavpny vagrecergref bs gur
Byq Grfgnzrag gryy hf, unq vagrepbhefr jvgu rirel perngher orsber Tbq
svanyyl uvg hcba gur vqrn bs jbzna naq perngrq Rir.
		-- E.R. Znfgref
%
Univat ybfg uvf cbgrapl lrnef orsber, gur bpgbtranevna jnf qrfcrengr gb
fngvfsl uvf arj 18-lrne-byq jvsr.  Ur ivfvgrq n tlcfl jbzna jvgu zntvpny
cbjref.
	Nsgre gur zna qbjarq n sbhy-gnfgvat cbgvba, gur tlcfl fnvq, "Gurer.
Abj gur jbeqf orrc-orrc jvyy tvir lbh na rabezbhf rerpgvba.  Ercrngvat
gur cuenfr jvyy znxr vg qvfnccrne.  Ohg erzrzore," fur pnhgvbarq, "vg jvyy
jbex bayl guerr gvzrf.  Znxr hfr bs gurz jvfryl."
	Nf gur byq zna yrsg, ur qrpvqrq gb grfg ure cerqvpgvba.  "Orrc-orrc,"
ur fnvq, naq fher rabhtu, ur tbg gur ovttrfg rerpgvba bs uvf yvsr.
"Orrc-orrc", ur ercrngrq.  Vg jrag njnl.
	Ur fcrq guebhtu genssvp ba uvf jnl ubzr.  "Orrc-orrc," ubaxrq n gnkv.
Gur byq zna tnfcrq nf ur vafgnagyl tbg uneq.
	"Orrc-orrc," ubaxrq n gehpx.  Uvf rerpgvba jvygrq.
	Chyyvat vagb uvf qevirjnl ng ynfg, gur senagvp zna ehfurq vafvqr
naq sbhaq uvf ahovyr jvsr ylvat ba gur orq ernqvat n abiry.
	"Unir V tbg n fhecevfr sbe lbh," ur fnvq, grnevat bss uvf pybgurf.
"Orrc-orrc!"
	"Ubyq ba n frpbaq," uvf jvsr fnvq, rlrvat uvf zntavsvprag rerpgvba.
"Jung'f nyy guvf orrc-orrc fuvg?"
%
Ur qbrf vg jvgu n orggre tenpr, ohg V qb vg zber angheny.
		-- Jvyyvnz Funxrfcrner, "Gjrysgu-Avtug"
%
Ur unq urneq gung n pregnva juberubhfr unq n erchgngvba sbe gur ovmneer.
Fb ur qebir gb gur cynpr naq, bapr vafvqr, nfxrq gur Znqnz vs fur unq nalguvat
hahfhny sbe uvz gb gel.  "Guvatf ner cerggl fybj gbqnl," fur fnvq, "ohg V
qb unir bar ahzore lbh zvtug rawbl."  Fur jrag ba gb qrfpevor n Arj Wrefrl
ura gung unq orra genvarq gb qb oybj wbof.
	"Jr'ir tbg ure urer, ohg bayl sbe gur qnl."
	Gur ivfvgbe pbhyq uneqyl oryvrir vg, ohg ur cnvq gur srr naq jrag
vagb n ebbz jvgu n ura.  Nsgre n sehfgengvat ubhe bs gelvat gb sbepr uvf
pbpx vagb gur ura'f zbhgu, ur svtherq bhg gung ur jnf qrnyvat jvgu abguvat
ohg n cynva byq puvpxra.  Ur yrsg.  Guvaxvat nobhg vg yngre, ur qrpvqrq
gung ur unq unq fb zhpu sha gelvat gung ur erghearq gur srj qnlf yngre naq
nfxrq gur Znqnz, "Qb lbh unir nalguvat arj gbqnl?"
	"Pbzr guvf jnl," fur fnvq, naq yrq uvz gb n qnex ebbz jurer n tebhc
bs zra jrer ybbxvat guebhtu n bar-jnl zveebe.  Ur fnj gung gurl jrer jngpuvat
n tvey znxvat vg jvgu n ynetr qborezna cvafpure.
	"Jbj!" ur fnvq gb gur zna fgnaqvat arkg gb uvz.  "Guvf vf ernyyl
terng!"
	Gur zna ercyvrq, "Zna, vg nva'g abguva'!  Lbh fubhyqn orra urer
n jrrx ntb naq frra gur thl jvgu gur puvpxra!"
%
Ur hfrq gb xvff ure ba ure yvcf, ohg vg'f nyy bire abj.
%
Ur jnf abg bayl n terng fjbeqfzna, ohg nyfb n phaavat yvathvfg.
%
Ur jnf fb htyl ubbxref hfrq gb gryy uvz, "Abg ba gur svefg qngr."
%
Ur jub svaqrgu frafhbhf cyrnfherf va gur obqvrf bs yhfu, ubg,
cvax qnzfryf vf abg evtugrbhf, ohg ur pna unir n ybg zber sha.
%
Ur'f tnyynagel crefbavsvrq, va snpg, uvf oebpuherf bhtug gb
ernq fngvfsnpgvba thnenagrrq, be lbhe ivetvavgl erghearq vagnpg.
%
Ur'f yrnearq nobhg 50% bs gur ehyrf bs frk naq pbairefngvba;
ur xabjf ubj gb fgvpx vg va, ohg abg ubj gb fgvpx vg bhg.
%
Ur:	"Vs V znqr ybir gb lbh, jbhyq lbh lryy?"
Fur:	"Jung qb lbh jnag zr gb lryy?"
		-- Oraal Uvyy
%
Ur:	Qb lbh yvxr Xvcyvat?
Fur:	Bu, lbh anhtugl obl, V qba'g xabj!  V'ir arire xvccyrq!
%
Urvfraoret znl unir qbar vg.
%
Uryyb, puvyqera!!
	Guvf vf Hapyr Qraavf jrypbzvat lbh gb lbhe irel bja sbeghar.
	Gbqnl jr ner tbvat gb urne n fgbel, fb fvg evtug urer ba zl ync
	naq jr pna nyy fgneg.  Pbzsbegnoyr?  Nu, lrf, nu... Nu? Nu!!

	Bar qnl, Evxxv, gur zntvp Cvkvr, jrag gb ivfvg Qnvfl Ohzoyr va ure
	ghzoyrqbja pbggntr.  Ur sbhaq ure va gur orqebbz. Ebhtuyl ur
	tenoorq ure urnivat ******* chyyvat ure qbja ba gur orq naq
	uheevrqyl evccvat bss ure guva *******.

	Byq Avpx, gur Frn Pncgnva jnf n ebhtu gbhtu wbyyl fbeg bs sryybj.
	Ur ybirq gur yvsr bs gur frn naq ur ybirq gb unat bhg qbja ol gur
	cvre jurer gur zra qerffrq nf ynqvrf ****** **** ******* *******
	bs ***** ****** **** gur ****** jvgu n zryba.

	Ehzcyrgjrrmre ena gur Qvaxl Gvaxl fubc va gur sbbg bs gur Zntvp
	bnx gerr ol gur jbooyl qhz-qhz gerr va gur funqr bs gur rapunagrq
	tyra qbja va Qvatyl Qryy.  Urer ur fbyq pbagenprcgvirf, ********
	naq inevbhf nccyvnaprf *** ******** *** ***** anxrq sha naq *****
	gur ******** ******* *** vagb fvk be frira cnvef.
%
Uryc!  V'z n yrfovna genccrq va n tnl zna'f obql!
                -- Ovfrkhnyvgl, 101
%
Ure xvffrf yrsg fbzrguvat gb or qrfverq: gur erfg bs ure.
%
Url onol!

Ubj 'obhg n oehgny snpr shpx?
%
URL XVQF!  NAA YNAQREF FNLF:
	Erzrzore, beny frk PNA pnhfr certanapl, hayrff lbh hfr na
beny pbagenprcgvir.  Frr lbhe snzvyl cynaavat pyvavp gbqnl!
%
URL, XVQF!  NAA YNAQREF FNLF:
	Znfgheongvba vfa'g nf fvzcyr nf vg ybbxf.  Qb vg evtug!
Fraq 50 pragf sbe zl vyyhfgengrq obbxyrg "Znfgheongvba grpuavdhrf
sbe gur grrantre".  Or fher gb fcrpvsl gur znyr be srznyr rqvgvba.
%
UBG GHO GVCF SBE JBZRA
	Iby. V -- Rgvdhrggr

1. Vg'f abg ynql-yvxr gb fgenqqyr n jngre wrg, zbna va rpfgnfl, naq gura
	fpernz ng gur gbc bs lbhe yhatf, "Bu, lrf, LRF, ONOL!"
2. Jnfuvat lbhe cnegare'f onpx vf frkl.  Jnfuvat lbhe cnagl ubfr vf abg.
3. Ahqr onguvat jvgu fgenatref pna or n cyrnfnag rkcrevrapr; qba'g fcbvy
	vg sbe rirelbar jvgu n gubhtugyrff erznex, fhpu nf "Zl Tbq, V'ir
	frra ovttre jnatf ba unzfgref!"
4. Vg'f B.X. gb cnff n wbvag juvyr ghoovat.  Qba'g cnff nalguvat ryfr.
5. Qba'g guvax lbh'er sbbyvat nalobql ol cnffvat bss lbhe ivoengbe nf n
	gbl fhoznevar.
%
Ubj pbzr vs lbh'er ubeal vg'f yhfg, ohg vs fur'f ubeal vg'f nssrpgvba?
%
Ubj fbba pna lbh unir frkhny eryngvbaf nsgre lbhe jvsr qryviref?
Jryy, qrcraqf ba vs fur'f va n jneq be n cevingr ebbz.
%
Uhagref znxr gur orfg ybiref; gurl tb qrrcre vagb gur ohfu, fubbg zber bsgra
naq *nyjnlf* rng jung gurl fubbg.
%
V oryvrir va frk naq qrngu -- gjb rkcrevraprf gung pbzr bapr va n yvsrgvzr.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra
%
	"V oryvrir lbh unir gur jebat ahzore," fnvq gur byq tragyrzna vagb
gur cubar.  "Lbh'yy unir gb pnyy gur jrngure ohernh sbe gung vasbezngvba."
	"Jub jnf gung?" uvf lbhat jvsr nfxrq.
	"Fbzr thl jnagvat gb xabj vs gur pbnfg jnf pyrne."
%
V org lbh unir sha punfvat gur fbnc nebhaq gur ongugho.
		-- Cevaprff Qvnan, gb n bar-nezrq jne irgrena qhevat
		   n ivfvg gb n Ybaqba irgrenaf ubfcvgny
%
V org lbh guvax lbh'er cerggl pbby qevivat nebhaq jvgubhg nhgb vafhenapr.
Lbh'er cebonoyl fnlvat gb lbhefrys, "V'z orngvat gur flfgrz."  Ohg jung'f
tbvat gb unccra jura lbh trg chyyrq bire naq ybfr lbhe yvprafr orpnhfr
lbh'er abg vafherq.  Jung tvey'f tbvat gb evqr fubgtha ba n gra-fcrrq ba
n Fngheqnl Avtug?  Lrnu, lbh'er tbvat gb or orngvat zber guna gur flfgrz...
		-- nhgb vafhenapr nq, urneq ba XANP, Ybat Ornpu.
%
V pna haqrefgnaq pbzcnavbafuvc.  V pna haqrefgnaq obhtug frk va gur
nsgreabba.  V pnaabg haqrefgnaq gur ybir nssnve.
		-- Tber Ivqny
%
V qba'g qvfpevzvangr ba gur onfvf bs frk.
                -- Ovfrkhnyvgl, 101

        [Na rdhny bccbeghavgl ybire?  Rq.]
%
"V qba'g bowrpg gb frk orsber zneevntr, ohg gjb zvahgrf orsber?!?"
%
"V qba'g ernyyl zvaq ure orvat hasnvgushy," fvturq gur zna gb uvf
zneevntr pbhafrybe, "ohg V whfg pna'g fyrrc guerr va n orq."
%
V qba'g erzrzore rire univat unq gur vgpu, naq lrg fpengpuvat vf bar bs
angher'f fjrrg cyrnfherf, naq fb unaql.
%
"V svanyyl sbhaq bhg jung zl enapu sberzna uhfonaq ernyyl zrnag," fboorq
gur erprag oevqr, "jura ur gbyq zr ur'q ybir zr 'gvy gur pbjf pnzr ubzr."
%
V unq n ivetva bapr.  V unq gb tb gb Thngrznyn sbe ure.  Fur jnf oyvaq
va bar rlr, naq fur unq n fghssrq nyyvtngbe gung fnvq, "Jrypbzr gb Zvnzv
Ornpu."
		-- Gur Fghag Zna
%
"V unir perqvg jvgu guvf znqnz jub ehaf n fgevat bs fhcre pnyytveyf,"
gur rkrphgvir erzvavfprq ng uvf pyho one, "ohg jura V tbg gur ovyy sbe
gur terng urnq frffvba bar bs gurz cyrnfherq zr jvgu, V zhfg fnl gung
vg jnf rabhtu gb znxr n oybja zna pel."
%
V unir creshzrq zl orq jvgu zleeu, nybrf, naq pvaanzba.  Pbzr, yrg hf
gnxr bhe svyy bs ybir hagvy gur zbeavat.
		-- Cebireof 7:17-18
%
V urneq gurer jnf n ybg bs frk ba gryrivfvba gurfr qnlf,
ohg jura V gevrq vg V xrcg snyyvat bss.
%
V bayl qngr dhrref.
                -- Ovfrkhnyvgl, 101

        [V'z abg dhrre, ohg zl oblsevraq vf!  Rq.]
%
"V bja zl bja obql, ohg V funer"
%
V ernyyl unq gb npg; 'pnhfr V qvqa'g unir nal yvarf.
		-- Znevyla Punzoref
%
V guvax V'yy fangpu n xvff naq syrr.
		-- Funxrfcrner
%
	"V guvax zl jvsr znl or trggvat fbzrjung birejrvtug.
	"Bu, ubj pna lbh gryy?"
	"Jryy, ynfg avtug jura fur fng ba zl snpr, V pbhyqa'g urne gur fgrerb."
%
V guvax cbc zhfvp unf qbar zber sbe beny vagrepbhefr guna nalguvat ryfr
gung unf rire unccrarq, naq ivpr irefn.
		-- Senax Mnccn
%
"V guvax frk vf orggre guna ybtvp, ohg V pna'g cebir vg."
%
V gubhtug Wnpxvr B. jnf fbzrguvat lbh qvq va gur onguebbz.
		-- Fgenatr qr Wvz
%
V jnag n tvey gung pna fjnyybj zl cevqr.
		-- Senax Mnccn, "Wrjvfu Cevaprff"
%
V jnag gur fnzr guvatf nyy zra qb, Evpr Xevfcvrf naq fbzr fhpxvat.
		-- Qhqyrl Zbber
%
V jnf ba inpngvba va Terrpr ynfg fhzzre, naq jnf orvat qevira ebhaq na vfynaq
ol n Terrx pno-qevire.  Ur jnf n sevraqyl zna, naq nf jr qebir, ur gbyq zr
nobhg inevbhf uvfgbevp naq fpravp cynprf ur unq orra vaibyirq jvgu.
	"Frr gur ragenapr gb gung puhepu bire gurer?  V ohvyg gung jvgu zl
gjb fbaf.  Ohg qb gurl pnyy zr `Qvzvgev gur puhepu ohvyqre'?  Qb gurl uryy!"
	Nf jr cnffrq n qnz, ur fnvq, "Frr gung qnz?  Sbhe bs hf ohvyg gung
qnz ol bhefryirf!  Ohg qb gurl pnyy zr `Qvzvgev gur qnz ohvyqre?'  Uryy, ab!"
	Nf jr cnffrq n ornhgvshy pbggntr, Qvzvgev fgnegrq hc ntnva -- "Frr
gung ubhfr?  V ohvyg gung sbe zl jvsr jvgu zl bja gjb unaqf!  Ohg qb gurl
pnyy zr `Qvzvgev gur ubzr ohvyqre'?  Ab!  Ohg whfg bar yvggyr furrc!"
%
V jrag gb n jvyq cnegl ynfg avtug.  V gryy ln, vg jnf fb jvyq, jr cynlrq
n arj irefvba bs Ehffvna ebhyrggr.  Jr cnffrq nebhaq fvk tveyf naq bar
bs gurz unq I.Q.
		-- Ebqarl Qnatresvryq
%
V jbaqre jung gur yrnfu naq pbyyne frg qbrf sbe rkpvgrzrag?
		-- Genzc, "Ynql naq gur Genzc"
%
V jbhyqa'g shpx ure jvgu lbhe cevpx.
%
V'q yvxr gb zrrg gur zna jub vairagrq frk naq frr jung ur'f jbexvat ba abj.
%
V'q jnyx n zvyr sbe n Pnzry, gjb sbe n uhzc.
%
"V'yy gryy ln, Wro," Jvyohe fnvq gb uvf sevraq, "gur genpgbe ohfvarff nva'g
qbva' gbb jryy.  V nva'g fbyq bar nyy zbagu.
	"Lbh guvax lbh'ir tbg ceboyrzf?" Wro ercyvrq.  "Gur bgure qnl, V jrag
bhg gb zvyx Qnvfl, jura fur fjnggrq zr va gur snpr jvgu ure gnvy, yvxr fur
nyjnlf qbrf.  Fb V gbbx fbzr gjvar naq gvrq vg gb gur ensgref.  Jura V fng
qbja ntnva, fur xvpxrq zr yvxr fur nyjnlf qbrf.  Fb V gvrq ure yrt gb gur
fvqr bs gur fgnyy.  Jura V fgnegrq gb fvg qbja ntnva, V pbhyq frr ure gnxvat
nvz jvgu ure bgure yrt, fb V gvrq vg gb gur bgure fvqr bs gur fgnyy.  Naq V'yy
gryy lbh jung," ur pbagvahrq jvgu n fvtu, "vs lbh pna pbaivapr zl jvsr V jnf
tbaan *zvyx* gung pbj, V'yy ohl n genpgbe sebz lbh!"
%
V'z n ovfrkhny; V trg vg znlor gjvpr n lrne.
		-- Ebqarl Qnatresvryq
%
V'z n tnl zna genccrq va n yrfovna'f obql!
		-- Gur Dhrre Tbfcryf bs Znqbaan gur Fybccvyl Pbaprvirq
%
V'z ntnvafg tebhc frk orpnhfr V jbhyqa'g xabj jurer gb chg zl ryobjf.
		-- Znegva Pehm Fzvgu
%
V'z sbe oevatvat onpx gur ovepu, ohg bayl sbe pbafragvat nqhygf.
		-- Tber Ivqny
%
V'z sbe crnpr -- V'ir lrg gb frr n zna jnxr hc va gur zbeavat naq fnl
"V'ir whfg unq n tbbq jne."
	       -- Znr Jrfg
%
V'z tbvat gb Vbjn sbe na njneq.  Gura V'z nccrnevat ng Pneartvr Unyy,
vg'f fbyq bhg.  Gura V'z fnvyvat gb Senapr gb or ubaberq ol gur Serapu
tbireazrag -- V'q tvir vg nyy hc sbe bar rerpgvba.
		-- Tebhpub Znek
%
	"V'z ybbxvat sbe nqiragher, rkpvgrzrag, ornhgvshy jbzra," pevrq gur
lbhat zna gb uvf sngure nf ur cercnerq gb yrnir ubzr.  "Qba'g gel gb
fgbc zr. V'z ba zl jnl."
	"Jub'f gelvat gb fgbc lbh?" fubhgrq gur sngure.  "Gnxr zr nybat!"
%
"V'z abg ntnvafg jbzra.  Abg bsgra rabhtu, naljnl."
		-- ACE
%
V'z haohggbavat lbhe fuveg, hamvccvat lbhe wrnaf....

Bu, V pna srry lbhe svatref ba gur xrlf, onol,
	V'z trggvat JNEZ....

V nz trggvat gurer, bu lrf,.  Bu, zl. BU LRF... BUUUU!
	...!!!eeeeetu!!!!!

Ubarl, gung jnf *ernyyl* greevsvp, ohg, arkg gvzr,
pbhyqa'g lbh cyrnfr vachg n yvggyr FYBJRE?
%
V'ir orra gbyq gung vg'f sne zber frafbhf gb unir n jbzna yrnir fbzrguvat
ba engure guna orvat gbgnyyl ahqr.  Zlfrys, V'ir nyjnlf sryg gung gur yvtugf
jrer zber guna rabhtu.
%
V'ir gevrq frireny inevrgvrf bs frk.  Gur pbairagvbany cbfvgvba znxrf
zr pynhfgebcubovp, naq gur bguref rvgure tvir zr n fgvss arpx be ybpxwnj.
		-- Gnyyhynu Onaxurnq
%
Vs nyy gurfr fjrrg lbhat guvatf jrer ynvq raq-gb-raq, V jbhyqa'g or n
ovg fhecevfrq.
		-- Qbebgul Cnexre
%
"Vs nalbar jnagf gb genqr n pbhcyr bs pragenyyl ybpngrq, jryy-phfuvbarq
fubjtveyf sbe na rebqrq fybcr 90 zvahgrf sebz Oebnqjnl, V'yy or ba guvf
pbeare gbzbeebj ng 11 jvgu zl gbathr unatvat bhg."
		-- F. W. Creryzna
%
Vs orvat ov vapernfrf lbhe punapr bs trggvat n qngr, qbrf orvat cbyl
vapernfr lbhe punapr bs trggvat qhzcrq?
%
Vs rire lbh jnag gb gbhpu gur unaq naq gur urneg bs Tbq Nyzvtugl, lbh pna
qb vg guebhtu gur obql bs fbzrbar lbh ybir.  Nalgvzr.  Naljurer.  Jvgubhg
ab zvqqyrzna.
		-- Gurbqber Fghetrba, "Tbqobql"
%
Vs Tbq unq zrnag sbe hf gb unir tebhc frk, ur'q unir tvira hf zber betnaf.
		-- Znypbyz Oenqohel
%
Vs Tbq unq jnagrq crbcyr gb tvir oybj wbof, ur jbhyqa'g unir tvira gurz grrgu.
%
Vs vg syvrf, sybngf be shpxf, erag vg, qba'g ohl vg.
		-- Gbzzl Rney Oehare
%
Vs vg jrera'g sbe cvpxcbpxrgf, V'q unir ab frk yvsr ng nyy.
		-- Ebqarl Qnatresvryq
%
Vs bayl vf jnf nf rnfl gb onavfu uhatre ol ehoovat gur oryyl nf vg vf gb
znfgheongr.
		-- Qvbtrarf gur Plavp
%
Vs frk vf n cnva va gur nff, lbh znl or qbvat vg jebat.
%
Vs frk vf fhpu n angheny curabzraba, ubj pbzr gurer ner fb znal obbxf ba ubj gb?
	-- Orggr Zvqyre
%
Vs gurl pna'g gnxr n wbxr, gura shpx 'rz.

Vs gurl pna, gura shpx 'rz.
%
Vs guvar rlr bssraqf gurr, cyhpx vg bhg.

Vs gul qvpx bssraqf gurr, junpx vg bss.
%
Vs lbh pbhyq trg na rerpgvba, lbh jbhyq unir ab arrq sbe Rznpf.
%
Vs lbh zrrg fbzrobql jub gryyf lbh gung ur ybirf lbh zber guna nalobql
va gur jubyr jvqr jbeyq, qba'g gehfg uvz.  Vg zrnaf ur rkcrevzragf.
%
Vs lbh guvax frk vf n cnva va gur nff, gel n qvssrerag cbfvgvba.
%
Vs lbh'er Pngubyvp lbh'ir bayl tbg gjb pubvprf: crevbqvp nofgvarapr naq
pbzcyrgr pbagvarapr.

Lbh xabj ... 

eulguz naq oyhrf.
%
Vs lbh'er tbaan fyrrc jvgu fbzrbar jubfr zbeny pbqr znl or jevggra
va Sbegena sbe nyy lbh xabj, ng yrnfg znxr fher gurer'f na rkvfgvat
sevraqfuvc bs fbzr fbeg gb snyy onpx ba vs guvatf qba'g jbex bhg
yvxr bar be gur bgure bs lbh cynaarq.
%
Vs lbhe frkhny snagnfvrf jrer gehyl bs vagrerfg gb bguref, gurl jbhyq ab
ybatre or snagnfvrf.
		-- Sena Yrobjvgm
%
Va gur fgnaqf urer V frr n lbhat pbhcyr jub zhfg or va ybir -- gurl'er
xvffvat ba rirel cvgpu.  Ur'f xvffvat ure ba gur fgevxrf, naq fur'f
xvffvat uvz ba gur onyyf.
		-- Uneel Pnenl, n Puvpntb fcbegfpnfgre
%
Vf frk qvegl?  Bayl vs vg'f qbar evtug.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra, "Nyy Lbh Rire Jnagrq Gb Xabj Nobhg Frk"
%
Vf gung n cvfgby va lbhe cbpxrg be ner lbh whfg tynq gb frr zr?
		-- Znr Jrfg
%
Vg vf nzhfvat gung n iveghr vf znqr bs gur ivpr bs punfgvgl; naq
vg'f n cerggl bqq fbeg bs punfgvgl ng gung, juvpu yrnqf zra fgenvtug
vagb gur fva bs Bana, naq tveyf gb gur jnavat bs gurve pbybe.
		-- Ibygnver
%
Vg vf orggre gb or ba cravpvyyva, guna arire gb unir ybirq ng nyy.
%
Vg vf orggre gb unir n cbfvgvir Jnffrezna guna arire gb unir ybirq ng nyy.
%
Vg vf pbafvqrerq abezny gb pbafrpengr ivetvavgl va gur trareny naq yhfg
sbe vgf qrfgehpgvba va gur cnegvphyne.
%
Vg vf sne orggre gb fyrrc jvgu na byq ura guna chyyrg.
%
Vg vf vzcbffvoyr gb bognva n pbaivpgvba sbe fbqbzl sebz na Ratyvfu whel.
Unys bs gurz qba'g oryvrir gung vg pna culfvpnyyl or qbar, naq gur bgure
unys ner qbvat vg.
		-- Jvafgba Puhepuvyy
	[Evtug.  Gryy vg gb Bfpne.]
%
Vg vf abg gehr gung yvsr vf bar qnza guvat nsgre nabgure -- vg vf bar
qnza guvat bire naq bire.
		-- Rqan Fg. Ivaprag Zvyynl
%
Vg vf abg jvfr gb znxr ybir zber guna bapr va gur zbeavat.
Lbh arire xabj jub lbh'yy zrrg yngre va gur qnl.
%
Vg vf bar bs gur fhcrefgvgvbaf bs gur uhzna zvaq gb unir vzntvarq gung
ivetvavgl pbhyq or n iveghr.
		-- Ibygnver
%
Vg vf irel qvssvphyg gb ybbx ng gur cbffvovyvgl bs yrfovna furrc orpnhfr
vs lbh ner n srznyr furrc, jung lbh qb gb fbyvpvg frk vf gb fgnaq fgvyy.
Znlor gurer vf n srznyr furrc bhg gurer ernyyl jnagvat nabgure srznyr,
ohg gurer'f whfg ab jnl sbe hf gb xabj vg.
		-- Naar Crexvaf, va ure fghql bs frkhnyvgl va furrc.
%
Vg zhfg or nqzvggrq gung jr Ratyvfu unir frk ba gur oenva, juvpu vf n
irel hasbeghangr cynpr gb unir vg.
		-- Znypbyz Zhttrevqtr
%
Vg jnf ure jrqqvat avtug, naq gur fjrrg lbhat guvat jnf va n ebznagvp unmr.
"Bu, qneyvat," fur fvturq, "Jr'er zneevrq ng ynfg.  Vg'f nyy yvxr n jbaqreshy
qernz!"
	Ure uhfonaq qvqa'g nafjre.  N srj zbzragf cnffrq.  Fur fvturq ntnva
naq fnvq, "V'z nsenvq V'yy njnxr va n zbzrag naq svaq vg vfa'g gehr."
	Fgvyy ab erfcbafr sebz ure fcbhfr.  Nabgure cnhfr naq nabgure
frafhbhf fvtu, gura, fbsgyl, "V whfg pna'g oryvrir gung V'z ernyyl lbhe
jvsr."
	"Qnza vg," tebjyrq ure zngr, "nf fbba nf V trg guvf fubrynpr hagvrq,
lbh jvyy!"
%
Vg jnf uvf guveq zneevntr naq ure sbhegu.  Ur jnf dhvgr fhecevfrq jura ba
gurve ubarlzbba fur cyrnqrq, "Cyrnfr or tragyr, V'z fgvyy n ivetva."
	"Qneyvat, jung qb lbh zrna lbh'er fgvyy n ivetva?  Lbh'ir orra
zneevrq guerr gvzrf."
	"Lrf, ohg gurl nyy jbexrq sbe QRP.  Gur svefg jnf n fnyrfzna,
naq nyy ur rire qvq jnf cebzvfr ubj tbbq vg jbhyq or.  Gur frpbaq jnf bar
bs gurve fbsgjner unpxf, ur gbyq zr gb gnxr pner bs vg zlfrys.  Naq gur
guveq jnf n svryq freivpr ercerfragngvir, naq ur xrcg cebzvfvat gung vg
jbhyq or hc va 15 zvahgrf.
%
Vg jnf guvf thl'f svefg qnl va gur cravgragvnel; ur jnf va n pryy jvgu n
uhtr oheyrl vazngr, naq ur jnf cerggl areibhf.  Ng yvtugf-bhg, gur vazngr
whzcrq bhg bs uvf ohax, naq, gheavat gb bhe ureb, fnvq, "Jr'er tbvat gb
unir frk!  Lbh jnag gb or gur Zbzzl be gur Qnqql?"
	N irel greevsvrq ureb znantrq gb fdhrnx bhg, "Hu, jryy, hu, V thrff
V'yy or gur Qnqql."
	"BX," fzvyrq uvf ebbzzngr, "trg qbja urer naq fhpx lbhe Zbzzn'f qvpx!"
%
Vg'f n dhrfgvba bs Ancyrba oenaql irefhf Evccyr.
V nz zryybj naq nzore naq V tb qbja erny fzbbgu.
		-- Evgn Zberab, pbzzragvat va Arjfjrrx ba gur frk nccrny
		   bs byqre jbzra irefhf lbhatre jbzra
%
"Vg'f nyjnlf gur fnzr," gur tvey fvturq gb ure ebbzzngr nsgre ergheavat
va gur jrr, fznyy ubhef.  "Nsgrejneq, V srry fb pbzcebzvfrq, fb purnc, fb
fbvyrq... fb nofbyhgryl jbaqreshy sebz urnq gb gbr!"
%
Vg'f orra fb ybat fvapr V znqr ybir V pna'g rira erzrzore jub trgf gvrq hc.
		-- Wbna Eviref
%
Vg'f rnfl gb znxr n sevraq.  Jung'f uneq vf gb znxr n fgenatre.
%
Vg'f uneq gb xrrc n tbbq tvey qbja -- ohg ybgf bs sha gelvat.
%
Vg'f abg cerggl orvat rnfl.
%
Vg'f abg gur hcf naq qbjaf bs ybir, vg'f gur vaf naq bhgf.
%
Vg'f gur fvtuf gung pbhag.
%
Xnzvxnmrf qb vg bapr.
%
Xvffvat, crggvat, naq rira vagrepbhefr ner nyy evtug nf ybat nf gurl ner
fvaprer.  V unir arire tvira n xvff va zl yvsr gung jnfa'g fvaprer.  Nf
sbe vagrepbhefr, V'q fnl guerr gvzrf n qnl jnf nobhg evtug.
		-- Znetnerg Fnatbe
%
Ynetr pngf pna or qnatrebhf, ohg n yvggyr chffl arire uheg nalbar.
%
Ynjlref qb vg gb rirelbar.
%
Yrg n Svryq Freivpr Ratvarre chg vg va.
%
Yvpx-n-qrr-pyvg!
%
Yvxr V fnvq, ybir jbhyqa'g or fb oyvaq vs gur oenvyyr jrera'g fb qnzarq terng!
		-- Nezvfgrnq Znhcva
%
Yvfc unpxref
	... qb vg va PNEF.
	... qb vg jvgu gnvy erphefvba.
	... svefg qb vg va gur sebag, gura qb vg va gur onpx.
	... unir QRSHA juvyr qbvat vg.
	... unir gb or obhaq gb qb vg.
	... unir Zbol qvpxf.
%
Yvfc unpxref unir gb or obhaq (gb-qb 'vg) ...
%
Yvfc cebtenzzref qb vg qrrcre naq qrrcre naq qrrcre.
%
Yvggyr xabja snpgf: gur qvegvrfg jbeqf hfrq ba gryrivfvba qhevat gur
1950'f jrer hggrerq ol Whar Pyrnire.
	"Trr, Jneq, jrera'g lbh n yvggyr uneq ba gur Ornire ynfg avtug?"
%
	Yvggyr Erq Evqvat Ubbq jnf jnyxvat guebhtu gur jbbqf ba ure jnl gb
ivfvg ure tenaqzbgure jura n jbys whzcrq bhg sebz oruvaq n gerr.
	"Nun!" gur jbys fnvq, "Abj V'ir tbg lbh, naq V'z tbvat gb rng lbh."
	"Rng, rng, rng," fnvq Yvggyr Erq Evqvat Ubbq natevyl, "Qnza vg,
qbrfa'g nalobql shpx nalzber?"
%
Ybir nva'g abguva' ohg frk zvffcryyrq.
%
Ybir pbzrf va fchegf.
	--Qrib, "Cyrnfr Cyrnfr"
%
Ybir qbrf abg znxr gur jbeyq tb nebhaq, whfg hc naq qbja n ovg.
%
Ybir vf oyvaq ohg qrfver qbrfa'g tvir n tbbq tbqqnz.
		-- Wnzrf Guheore
%
Ybir vf rngvat ure rira jura fur'f abg univat ure crevbq.
%
Ybir vf whfg sbe abj ... urecrf ynfgf sberire.
%
Ybir vf abg gur qlvat zbna bs n qvfgnag ivbyva -- vg'f gur gevhzcunag
gjnat bs n orqfcevat.
		-- F.W. Creryzna
%
Ybir vf gur nafjre; ohg juvyr lbh ner jnvgvat sbe gur nafjre, frk
envfrf fbzr cerggl tbbq dhrfgvbaf.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra
%
Ybir vf gur qrfver gb cebfgvghgr barfrys.  Gurer vf, vaqrrq, ab rknygrq
cyrnfher gung pnaabg or eryngrq gb cebfgvghgvba.
		-- Puneyrf Onhqrynver
%
Ybir vf gjb zvahgrf naq svsgl-gjb frpbaqf bs fdhvful fbhaqf.
		-- Wbuaal Ebggra
%
Zn Oryy ehaf n onhql ubhfr.
%
Znxr jne abg frk.  (Vg'f fnsre.)
%
Znal avpr guvatf fhpx.
%
Zneevntr unf qevira zber guna bar zna gb frk.
		-- Crgre Qr Ievrf
%
Zneevntr vf yvxr n onax nppbhag.  Lbh chg vg va, lbh gnxr vg bhg, lbh
ybfr vagrerfg.
		-- Cebsrffbe Vejva Pberl
%
Znfgheongvba vf gur guvaxvat zna'f gryrivfvba.
	-- Puevfgbcure Unzcgba
%
Znfgheongvba!  Gur nznmvat ninvynovyvgl bs vg!
		-- Wnzrf Wblpr
%
Zngu vf gb culfvpf yvxr znfgheongvba vf gb frk.
%
Zngurzngvpvnaf
	... qb vg va tebhcf.
	... qb vg va gurbel.
	... gnxr vg gb gur yvzvg.
%
Zngurzngvpvnaf qb vg va gurbel.
%
Zngurzngvpvnaf qb vg jvgu n fznyy, vzntvanel cneg.
%
Zngurzngvpvnaf bsgra erfbeg gb fbzrguvat pnyyrq Uvyoreg fcnpr, juvpu vf
qrfpevorq nf orvat a-qvzrafvbany.  Yvxr zbqrea frk, nal ahzore pna cynl.
		-- Wnzrf Oyvfu, "Orrc/Gur Dhvaphak bs Gvzr"
%
Zngurzngvpvnaf gnxr vg gb gur yvzvg.
%
Zngurzngvpvnaf gnxr vg gb gur yvzvg.
%
Zrnajuvyr onpx ng gur bnfvf, gur Nl-enof jhm ohfl n-rngva' gurve qngrf!
%
Zrnajuvyr, onpx ng gur enapu, Tenaal jnf n-orngvat bss gur Vaqvnaf, ohg
gurl whf' xrcg ba n-pbzva'.  Onpx ng gur bhgubhfr, guvatf jrer n-cvyva' hc.
Naq, nf gur H.F. Sbhegu Pnyinel zbhagrq gur uvyy, Gbagb, pyrireyl qvfthvfrq
nf n qbbexabo, pnzr bss va gur Ybar Enatre'f unaq.
%
Zrrgvatf ner na nqqvpgvir, uvtuyl frys vaqhytrag npgvivgl gung pbecbengvbaf
naq bgure ynetr betnavmngvbaf unovghnyyl ratntr va bayl orphnfr gurl pnaabg
npghnyyl znfgheongr.
		-- Qnir Oneel
%
Zvpxrl Zbhfr unf n ybat gnyx bar qnl jvgu n cflpuvngevfg, nsgre juvpu
gur cflpuvngevfg vagreivrjf Zvaavr Zbhfr.  N srj qnlf yngre Zvpxrl zrrgf
jvgu gur cflpuvngevfg, naq gur sbyybjvat pbairefngvba rafhrf:

Fvtzhaq : V gnyxrq jvgu Zvaavr nsgre gnyxvat jvgu lbh.
Zvpxrl  : Bu?
Fvtzhaq : V pbhyqa'g svaq nalguvat jebat jvgu ure -- fur vfa'g vafnar.
Zvpxrl  : Vqvbg!  V qvqa'g fnl fur jnf vafnar -- V fnvq fur jnf
		shpxva' Tbbsl.
%
Zbeevf yrsg sbe n gjb-qnl ohfvarff gevc gb Puvpntb.  Ur jnf bayl n srj
oybpxf sebz uvf ubhfr, jura ur ernyvmrq gung ur unq yrsg gur nvecynar
gvpxrgf ba uvf ohernh gbc.  Ur erghearq naq dhvrgyl ragrerq gur ubhfr.
Uvf jvsr, va ure fxvzcvrfg artyvtrr, jnf fgnaqvat ng gur fvax jnfuvat
gur oernxsnfg qvfurf.  Fur ybbxrq fb vaivgvat gung ur gvcgbrq hc oruvaq
ure, ernpurq bhg, naq fdhrrmrq ure oernfg.
	"Yrnir bayl bar dhneg bs zvyx," fur fnvq. "Zbeevf jba'g or urer
sbe oernxsnfg gbzbeebj."
%
Zbfg svfu yvir haqrejngre, juvpu vf n greevoyr cynpr gb unir frk orpnhfr
iveghnyyl naljurer lbh yvr qbja gurer jvyy or fgvatvat penof naq ynetr
dhnagvgvrf bs yvggyr svfu fgnevat ng lbh jvgu ohttl yvggyr rlrf.  Fb
trarenyyl jura gjb svfu jnag gb unir frk, gurl fjvz nebhaq naq nebhaq sbe
ubhef, ybbxvat sbe fbzrcynpr gb tb, hagvy svanyyl gur srznyr trgf ernyyl
gverq naq unf n greevoyr urnqnpur, naq fur whfg qhzcf ure rttf evtug ba gur
fnaq naq fjvzf njnl.  Gura gur znyr, qevira ol fbzr gvzryrff, aboyr vafgvapg
sbe fheiviny, rngf gur rttf.  Fb gur gehgu vf gung svfu qba'g ercebqhpr ng
nyy, ohg gurer ner fb znal bs gurz gung vg qbrfa'g znxr nal qvssrerapr.
		-- Qnir Oneel, "Frk naq gur Fvatyr Nzbron: Jung Rirel
		   Grra Fubhyq Xabj"
%
Zbfg cynva tveyf ner iveghbhf orpnhfr bs gur fpnepvgl bs bccbeghavgl
gb or bgurejvfr.
		-- Znln Natrybh, "V Xabj Jul gur Pntrq Oveq Fvatf"
%
Zbfg jbzra ybbx sbe n zna jub vf gnyy, qnex naq uhat fbzr.
%
Zbhfgnpur evqrf, 50 pragf.
%
Zef. Wbuafba unq n irel ornhgvshy naq vagryyvtrag cneebg.  Ur unq whfg bar
ceboyrz: Ur yvxrq gb shpx Ze. Unjxvaf' puvpxraf.  Zef. Wbuafba fpbyqrq uvz
gvzr naq gvzr ntnva, ohg ur jbhyq whfg ynhtu ng ure.  Svanyyl, fur gbyq uvz
gung vs ur qvq vg ntnva, fur jbhyq phg bss nyy bs gur srnguref ba gur gbc bs
uvf urnq.  Jryy, ur erfvfgrq gur hetr sbe n jrrx, ohg bar qnl, ur whfg
pbhyqa'g erfvfg tbvat arkg qbbe.  Orfvqrf, ur svtherq fur jnf oyhssvat.
	Jryy, Ze. Unjxvaf pnzr bire, enagvat naq enivat nobhg ubj gur cneebg
unq orra shpxvat uvf puvpxraf ntnva.  Zef. Wbuafba qvqa'g fnl n jbeq, whfg
gbbx bhg ure fpvffbef naq phg bss nyy bs gur cneebg'f urnq srnguref.
	Gung avtug, Zef. Wbuafba unq n ovt cnegl ng ure ubhfr.  Orsber vg
fgnegrq, fur gbbx gur cneebg naq chg uvz ba gbc bs gur cvnab ol gur sebag
qbbe.  "Fvapr lbh qvfborlrq zr gbqnl, lbh unir gb fgnl urer ba gur cvnab
gbavtug.  Abj, qba'g lbh qner zbir."
	Jryy, gur cneebg jnf cerggl cvffrq bss nobhg univat uvf urnq oner,
naq ur jnfa'g gbb unccl nobhg univat gb fcraq gur jubyr riravat ba gur cvnab.
Fgvyy, nf ur hfhnyyl qvq, jura gur ohgyre jbhyq naabhapr gur thrfgf nf gurl
neevirq, ur jbhyq fnl uryyb gb gurz.  Whfg gura, gjb onyq-urnqrq zra pnzr gb
gur qbbe.
	Orsber gur ohgyre pbhyq fnl nalguvat, gur cneebg lryyrq, "Bxnl, lbh
puvpxra-shpxref, hc urer ba gur cvnab jvgu zr!"
%
Zhfvat ba ure cerfrag naq cnfg cebsrffvbaf nf "qbzvanag/fnqbznfvpuvfz
snagnfl shysvyyre" naq qragny ultvravfg, Flovy fnvq, "V pbhyqa'g ernyyl
haqrefgnaq jul V jnagrq gb or n qragny ultvravfg, ohg lrnef yngre, nsgre
orvat va gur FZ jbeyq n ybat gvzr, V svtherq vg bhg:  V'z va havsbez,
gurl'er abg.  V'z fgnaqvat hc, gurl'er ylvat qbja.  V'z qbvat cnvashy
guvatf gb gurz sbe gurve bja tbbq.   Guvf vf fb ZR."
		-- Gur Qnvyl Pny, Frcgrzore 29, 1992 Va na negvpyr gvgyrq:
	           "Xvaxl frk erznvaf nyvir naq juvccvat qrfcvgr guerng
		    bs NVQF, obbx erirnyf"
%
Zl tveysevraq'f snibevgr rebgvp cbfvgvba vf oraqvat bire zl perqvg pneqf.
%
	"Zl uhfonaq pbzzvgf na vapbaprvinoyr npg bs creirefvba jvgu n
onealneq navzny, naq vg'f abg prageny gb zl pnfr?!"
	"Abg va Pnyvsbeavn."
%
Zl vqrn bs n jvyq cnegl vf jurer lbh guebj gur tveyf' cnagvrf ng gur jnyy
naq gurl fgvpx.
		-- Wbuaal Obo
%
	"Zl zbgure," fnvq gur fjrrg lbhat fgrab, "fnlf gurer ner fbzr guvatf
n tvey fubhyq abg qb orsber gjragl."
	"Lbhe zbgure vf evtug," fnvq gur rkrphgvir, "V qba'g yvxr n ynetr
nhqvrapr, rvgure."
%
Zl zbgure-va-ynj oebxr hc zl zneevntr.  Bar qnl zl jvsr pnzr ubzr rneyl sebz
jbex naq sbhaq hf va orq gbtrgure.
		-- Yraal Oehpr
%
Zl zbguref ner jubyyl vtabenag bs gur nyzbfg havirefny cerinyrapr bs frperg
ivpr, be frys-nohfr, nzbat gur lbhat.  Jul urfvgngr gb fnl svezyl naq jvgubhg
dhvooyr gung crefbany nohfr yvrf ng gur ebbg bs zhpu bs gur srroyrarff,
cnyrarff, areibhfarff, naq tbbq-sbe-abguvatarff bs gur ragver pbzzhavgl?
		-- Qe. W.U. Xryybtt, "Gur Ynqvrf Thvqr", Zbqrea Zrqvpvar
		   Choyvfuvat Pbzcnal, 1895.  Qe. Xryybtt urycrq vairag
		   pbea synxrf naq crnahg ohggre.  Va nqqvgvba gb qrabhapvat
		   znfgheongvba, ur oryvrirq gung fzbxvat pnhfrq pnapre naq
		   gung pregnva nvyzragf pbhyq or pherq ol ebyyvat n
		   pnaabaonyy ba gur fgbznpu.
%
Zl ernpgvba gb cbeab svyzf vf nf sbyybjf: Nsgre gur svefg gra zvahgrf, V
jnag gb tb ubzr naq fperj. Nsgre gur svefg gjragl zvahgrf, V arire jnag
gb fperj ntnva nf ybat nf V yvir.
		-- Revpn Wbat
%
Zl fpubbyzngrf jbhyq znxr ybir gb nalguvat gung zbirq, ohg V arire fnj nal
ernfba gb yvzvg zlfrys.
		-- Rzb Cuvyvcf
%
Zl frk yvsr unfa'g orra fb tbbq; rvgure svfg be snzvar.
%
Zl jvsr naq V bayl fzbxr nsgre frk.  V'ir unq gur fnzr cnpx fvapr 1967.
Fur'f hc gb guerr cnpxf n qnl.
		-- Ebqarl Qnatresvryq
%
Angvbany Frk Jrrx -- qba'g yrg lbhe zrng ybns.
%
Arprffvgl vf gur zbgure bs fgenatr orqsryybjf.  Jngpu jub lbh fyrrc jvgu.
%
Arire nfx lbhe ybire vs ur'q qvir va sebag bs na bapbzvat genva sbe
lbh.  Ur qbrfa'g xabj.  Arire nfx lbhe ybire vs fur'q qvir va sebag bs na
bapbzvat onaq bs Uryy'f Natryf sbe lbh.  Fur qbrfa'g xabj.  Arire nfx ubj znal
pvtnerggrf lbhe ybire unf fzbxrq gbqnl.  Pnapre vf n crefbany pbzzvggzrag.
	Arire nfx gb frr cvpgherf bs lbhe ybire'f sbezre ybiref -- rfcrpvnyyl
gur barf jub qvirq va sebag bs genvaf.  Vs lbh ybbx yvxr bar bs gurz, lbh ner
ercrngvat uvfgbel'f zvfgnxrf.  Vs lbh qba'g, lbh'yy jbaqre jung ur be fur fnj
va gur bguref.
	Juvyr jr ner ba gur fhowrpg bs cvpgherf: Lbh znl nqzver gur cvpgher
bs lbhe ybire pnibegvat anxrq va n gvqny cbby ba Znhv.  Qba'g nfx jub gbbx
vg.  Gur nafjre vf boivbhf.  N Wncnarfr gbhevfg gbbx gur cvpgher.
	Arire nfx vs lbhe ybire unf unq gurencl.  Bayl crbcyr jub unir unq
gurencl nfx vs crbcyr unir unq gurencl.
	Qba'g nfx nobhg cynfgre pnfgf bs znyr frk betnaf znexrq WVZV, WVZ, rgp.
Nffhzr gung fur obhtug gurz ng n syrn  znexrg.
		-- Wnzrf Crgrefba naq Xngr Abyna
%
Arire gel gb xrrc hc jvgu gur Wbarfrf; gurl zvtug or arjyljrqf.
%
ARJ NQQVGVBA GB GUR YVOENEL:

"Fnyyl", gur qrcnegzrag'f arj vasyngnoyr qbyy, vf ninvynoyr ba
n fubeg-grez erzbiny onfvf bayl -- cyrnfr fvta ure bhg naq erghea ure
cebzcgyl gb nibvq rkgraqrq jnvgf.  (Jr ner fgvyy njnvgvat fuvczrag bs
bhe "Ovt Wbua" qbyy.)
%
Arjyljrq tebbz:
	Ubarl, V unir fbzrguvat gb pbasrff gb lbh.  V'z n tbysre.
	Lbh'yy arire frr zr ba Ghrfqnl avtugf, Guhefqnl avtugf,
	naq jrrxraqf.  V'z fbeel.
Arjyljrq oevqr:
	V unir fbzrguvat rira jbefr gb pbasrff, qrne.  V'z n ubbxre.
Tebbz:
	Bu, ubarl, gung'f ab ceboyrz!  Whfg xrrc lbhe urnq ybj naq sbyybj
	guebhtu...
%
Avpr pbzchgref qba'g tb qbja.
%
Avar bhg bs gra zra jub cersreerq Pnzryf unir fjvgpurq onpx gb jbzra.
%
Ab znggre ubj pryroengrq gur ornhgl bs n jbzna, V jbhyq arire fcraq n avtug
jvgu ure.  Gur bayl pryroevgl jvgu jubz V jbhyq funer n avtug vf Znk Cynapx.
Ohg ur vf qrnq.  Fb V yvir yvxr n zbax, nfvqr sebz n yvggyr frys tengvsvpngvba
va gur nsgreabbaf.
		-- Fnyinqbe Qnyv
%
Abg rirelbar unf n bar-genpx zvaq.
		-- Sebz n Ovfrkhnyvgl 101 gnyx
%
Abguvat vf orggre guna Frk.
Znfgheongvba vf orggre guna abguvat.
Gurersber, Znfgheongvba vf orggre guna Frk.
%
Ahefr Wbarf vf n erthyne ba gur arjftebhc [nyg.frk.obaqntr], naq
bppnfvbanyyl unf ceboyrzf jvgu sbyxf uneenffvat ure.  Fur pnzr hc
jvgu guvf va erfcbafr gb bar...

	Sbeghangryl, zl rtb vfa'g nf sentvyr nf gung jbbqcrpxre'f jvat.
	Jura sengobl pnyyrq zr n qlxr V gbyq uvz gung npghnyyl V jnf
	ovfrkhny, ohg gung ur fubhyqa'g srry guerngrarq orpnhfr ur qvqa'g
	zrrg rvgure bs zl fgnaqneqf.  Ohg vs vg znxrf lbh srry zber
	pbzsbegnoyr, V fnvq, zl uhfonaq gvrq zr gb gur orqcbfgf guvf
	zbeavat naq fperjrq gur qnlyvtugf bhg bs zr.

	"Whfg guvax," fnvq

	Ahefr Wbarf,
	 "... gung jnf sbhe
	   ubhef ntb naq
	    zl fcrez pbhag
	     vf cebonoyl *fgvyy*
	      uvture guna lbhef."
%
Alooyr zr...  Olgr zr...  Hafvtarq ybat vag zr...
%
Bs pbhefr, V fcrnx bs abguvat ryfr ohg gung pynffvp bs haqrefgngrq lrg jvyqyl
rkpvgvat rebgvpvfz, "Gur Jvaqsybjre," ol Ynhen Ybaqba.  Zf. Ybaqba vf gur
nhgube bs fhpu bgure cuvybfbcuvpny oybpx-ohfgref nf "Onq Oneba'f Qnhtugre,"
"N Urneg Gbb Cebhq," "Zbbayvtug Zvfg," naq zbfg guvtu-jnezvat bs nyy, "Tlcfl
Urverff".  Jryy, tynffrf-fgrnzvat fprarf ner gb or sbhaq ba rirel cntr, gb
na rkgrag juvpu birejuryzf Lbhe Uhzoyr Aneengbe, naq fb, va beqre gb fnir
uvzfrys rkgerzr rzoneenffzrag, ur oevatf lbh... gur oyheo:

	"Rirel ynql bs oerrqvat xabjf: ab bar unf n tbbq gvzr ba n cvengr
fuvc.  Ab bar, gung vf, ohg gur cvengrf.  Lrg gurer fur jnf, Zreel Jvyqvat
-- xvqanccrq va reebe, gnxra sebz n fuvc obhaq sebz Arj Lbex gb Ratynaq,
fcvevgrq njnl va n oneery naq fjrcg nobneq gur vasnzbhf "Oynpx Wbxr"...
Gurer fur jnf, gerzoyvat jvgu cyrnfher va gur nezf bs ure npuvatyl unaqfbzr,
frafngvbanyyl frafhny, tbyqra-unverq pncgbe -- Qriba."
%
Bs pbhefr, zbfg crbcyr riraghnyyl tvir hc objyvat sbe frk.
Gur onyyf ner yvtugre naq lbh qba'g unir gb punatr lbhe fubrf.
%
Bu Wbua, yrg'f abg cnex urer.
Bu Wbua, yrg'f abg cnex.
Bu Wbua, yrg'f abg.
Bu Wbua, yrg'f.
Bu Wbua.
Bu.
%
Bu jung n gnatyrq jro jr jrnir jura svefg jr cenpgvpr gb pbaprvir.
		-- Qba Urebyq
%
Bu, onol, chg gjb svatref urer naq bar svatre gurer naq pnyy zr ovgpu.
%
Bapr hcba n tvey gurer jnf n gvzr...
%
Bapr hcba n gvzr gurer jnf n snezre jub unq obeebjrq n ohyy gb freivpr uvf
gjb pbjf.  Ur chg nyy guerr navznyf ba n zrnqbj naq frag yvggyr Wbuaal gb
bofreir naq ercbeg nal fhpprff.  N fubeg gvzr yngre, yvggyr Wbuaal pnzr
ehaavat gbjneqf gur ubhfr fubhgvat: "Qnqql, Qnqql, gur ohyy whfg shpxrq gur
juvgr pbj!"
	Gur sngure gbbx yvggyr Wbuaal nfvqr naq fnvq: "Ybbx, xvq, vg'f
nyevtug vs lbh hfr gung xvaq bs ynathntr nebhaq zr, ohg gur erireraq vf
tbvat gb or ivfvgvat fbba.  Fb arkg gvzr, cyrnfr hfr nabgure jbeq; whfg
fnl gung gur ohyy "fhecevfrq" gur pbj."
	Wbuaal nterrq naq jrag onpx gb bofreir nal cebterff.  N yvggyr
juvyr yngre, juvyr gur cernpure jnf gnyxvat gb gur snezre, yvggyr Wbuaal
pnzr n-ehaavat ntnva, fubhgvat: "Qnqql, Qnqql!"
	Gur sngure, gelvat gb nibvq rzoneenffvat gur cernpure, fnvq: "V
xabj, gur ohyy fhecevfrq gur oebja pbj."
	Yvggyr Wbuaal ercyvrq: "Ur fher qvq, ur shpxrq gur juvgr bar ntnva!"
%
Bapr hcba n gvzr gurer jnf n snezre jub bjarq n ynetr ahzore bs puvpxraf naq
znqr zbarl ol fryyvat puvpxraf gb n ybpny qvfgevohgvat pbzcnal.  Gur snezre
jnagrq gb vapernfr uvf ohfvarff, naq fb jrag gb znexrg gb ohl nabgure ebbfgre.
"Guvf ebbfgre," nffherq gur iraqbe, "vf zl orfg.  Ur'f ivevyr naq raretrgvp 
naq jvyy gnxr pner bs nyy lbhe puvpxraf!"  Gur snezre, qryvtugrq ng guvf, 
obhtug gur ebbfgre naq erghearq gb uvf snez.  Ur frg gur ebbfgre ybbfr nzbat 
uvf ura ubhfrf naq, fher rabhtu, gur ebbfgre raguhfvnfgvpnyyl jrag gb jbex. 
Vg jnfa'g gbb ybat, ubjrire, orsber gur ebbfgre svavfurq bss nyy gur uraf naq 
ortna ba gur srj trrfr naq qhpxf gung jrer ba gur snez.  "Vs lbh xrrc hc guvf 
engr," jnearq gur snezre, "lbh'yy fperj lbhefrys gb qrngu!"  Gur ebbfgre, 
ubjrire, fpbssrq ng gur snezre naq pbagvahrq ng na vapernfrq fcrrq.  Gur arkg 
zbeavat, gur snezre jnf qbvat uvf puberf jura ur abgvprq frireny ohmmneqf va 
gur fxl pvepyvat bire fbzrguvat.  Ur urnqrq bhg oruvaq gur onea, naq fher 
rabhtu gurer jnf gur ebbfgre, syng ba uvf onpx, jvgu rlrf pybfrq.  Gur snezre 
fubbx uvf svfg ng gur zbgvbayrff obql naq phefrq, fubhgvat "V xarj vg!  V gbyq 
lbh fb!  V xarj lbh'q fperj lbhefrys gb qrngu!"  Gur ebbfgre ghearq uvf urnq 
gbjneq gur snezre, bcrarq bar rlr, naq jvaxrq.  "Fuuu!" ur fnvq, cbvagvat gb 
gur oveqf nobir.  "V guvax gurl'er pbzvat qbja."
%
Bapr hcba n gvzr gurer jnf n yvggyr tvey anzrq Yvggyr Erq Evqvat Ubbq.  Bar
svar zbeavat fur qrpvqrq gb ivfvg ure Tenaqzbgure, fb fur chg n serfuyl onxrq
pnxr naq n .357 zntahz vagb ure onfxrg naq frg bss guebhtu gur sberfg.  Jura
fur tbg gurer, jung fubhyq fur svaq ohg n ovt oynpx jbys va gur orq, jub
whzcrq hc, tenoorq ure naq faneyrq, "V'z tbvat gb shpx lbh hagvy gur fha tbrf
qbja."
	Fb Yvggyr Erq Evqvat Ubbq juvccrq bhg gur .357 naq fnvq, "Bu, ab,
lbh'er abg!  Lbh'er tbvat gb rng zr whfg yvxr gur fgbel fnlf!"
%
Bapr hcba n gvzr gurer jnf n fcrez anzrq Fgnayrl.  Ur'q qb chfuhcf naq
fbzrefnhygf naq yvzore hc nyy gur gvzr, juvyr gur bgure fcrez whfg ynl nebhaq
ba gurve sng nffrf abg qbvat n guvat.  Bar qnl, bar bs gurz orpnzr phevbhf
rabhtu gb nfx Fgnayrl jul ur rkrepvfrq nyy qnl.  Fgnayrl fnvq,
	"Ybbx, bayl bar fcrez trgf n jbzna certanag naq jura gur evtug
gvzr pbzrf, V nz tbvat gb or gung bar."
N srj qnlf yngre, gur nyy sryg gurzfryirf trggvat ubggre naq ubggre, naq gurl
xarj gung vg jnf trggvat gb or gurve gvzr gb tb.  Gurl jrer eryrnfrq noehcgyl
naq, fher rabhtu, gurer jnf Fgnayrl fjvzzvat sne nurnq bs nyy gur bguref.
Nyy bs n fhqqra, Fgnayrl fgbccrq, ghearq nebhaq, naq ortna gb fjvz onpx jvgu
nyy uvf zvtug.
	"Tb onpx! Tb onpx!" ur fpernzrq.  "Vg'f n oybj wbo!"
%
Bapr hcba n gvzr gurer jrer guerr pbrqf -- n ovt pbrq, n zrqvhz-fvmrq pbrq,
naq n yvggyr, gval pbrq.  Bar avtug gurl pnzr ubzr sebz n qnapr, naq gur ovt
pbrq fnvq, "Fbzrbar'f orra fyrrcvat va zl orq!"
	Gur zrqvhz-fvmrq pbrq ybbxrq va ure ebbz naq fnvq, "Fbzrbar'f orra 
fyrrcvat va zl orq!"
	Naq gur yvggyr, gval pbrq fnvq, "Jryy, avtugl-avtug, tveyf!"
%
Bapr lbh pbzr bhg nf n Cntna ovfrkhny zneevrq yrngureqlxr, gur erfg bs yvsr
vf gung zhpu rnfvre.
%
Bar ol bar gur ivpr-cerfvqragf bs n ynetr pbecbengvba jrer pnyyrq vagb gur
obff'f bssvpr.  Gura gur whavbe rkrphgvirf jrer vaqvivqhnyyl fhzzbarq.
Svanyyl gur bssvpr obl jnf oebhtug va.
	"V jnag gur gehgu, Puneyrf," gur obff oryybjrq.  "Unir lbh orra
cynlvat nebhaq jvgu zl frpergnel?"
	"A-ab, fve," gur bssvpr obl fgnzzrerq.  "V-V'q arire qb nalguvat
yvxr gung, fve."
	"Nyy evtug, nyy evtug," fvturq gur obff, "gura lbh sver ure."
%
Bar qnl n pvgl qjryyre qrpvqrq gb gnxr n evqr va gur pbhagel.  Ur ubccrq
vagb uvf fcbegfpne, jnaqrerq nybat gur uvtujnl sbe n juvyr naq gura rkvgrq
gb fbzr irel eheny qveg ebnqf va gur zvqqyr bs snez pbhagel.  Nsgre njuvyr,
ur pnzr npebff n snezre jub pyrneyl jbexvat uvf svryqf.  Gur shaal guvat jnf,
gur snezre qvqa'g frrz gb or jrnevat nal cnagf.  Gur zna tbg bhg bs uvf pne
naq nccebnpurq gur snezre.
	"Url, ohqql," ur nfxrq, "ubj pbzr lbh'er abg jrnevat nal pybgurf?"
	Ercyvrq gur snezre, "Jryy, obl, gu' bgure qnl V jnf bhg n-jbexva'
va gur svryqf, na' V cyhz sretbg g' jrne znu fuveg.  Tbg onpx gb gu' ubhfr
gung avtug, naq znu arpx jnf fgvssre guna n bnx-jbbq obneq.  Guvf urer'f
znu jvsr'f vqrn."
%
	Bar qnl n zbgure naq qnhtugre ner jnyxvat nebhaq n snezvat pbzzhavgl
naq gurl frr n fgnyyvba zbhagvat n zner.  Gur qnhtugre gnxrf va gur fprar naq
gheaf gb ure zbgure. "Zbzzl, jung ner gubfr gjb ubefrf qbvat?"
	Ure zbgure unfgvyl nafjrerq, "Gur ubefr ba gbc uheg vgf ubbs, naq gur
bar ba gur obggbz vf pneelvat uvz onpx gb gur fgnoyr."
	Gur qnhtugre fubbx ure urnq naq fnqyl ercyvrq, "Vfa'g gung whfg gur
jnl vg tbrf?  Gel gb uryc fbzrbar naq lbh trg shpxrq."
%
Bar qnl Nqnz, juvyr jnaqrevat nebhaq gur Tneqra bs Rqra, abgvprq gung nyy
gur navznyf frrzrq gb pbzr va cnvef, znyr naq srznyr.  Ur nyfb abgrq gung
gurl frrzrq gb rawbl orvat gbtrgure n ybg.  Fb, ur jrag gb uvf fcrpvny
cynpr naq ercbegrq gb Tbq jung ur'q abgvprq.
	Tbq, haqrefgnaqvat uvf arrq, fnvq, "Nqnz, gur gvzr unf pbzr sbe zr
gb cebivqr lbh jvgu n zngr.  Tb yvr qbja naq jura lbh unir snyyra nfyrrc, V
jvyy perngr lbhe zngr."
	Fb Nqnz jnaqrerq bss, sbhaq n avpr cngpu bs fbsg tenff naq sryy
nfyrrc.  Fbzr gvzr yngre ur njbxr, cbffvoyl qhr gb n ovg bs cnva va uvf
evof, cbffvoyl orpnhfr bs gur tbetrbhf jbzna yrnavat bire uvz.  Erzrzorevat
gur navznyf ur'q frra univat fhpu sha, ur vzzrqvngryl ernpurq sbe ure.
Cerggl fbba Nqnz'f onpx ng uvf fcrpvny cynpr.
	"Tbq?"
	"Lrf, Nqnz, jung abj?"
	"Tbq, jung'f n urnqnpur?"
%
Bar qnl Sngure B'Znyyrl jnf jnyxvat guebhtu gur cnex jura ur pnzr hcba na
rapunagvat fprar.  N ornhgvshy yvggyr tvey jvgu ybat oybaq unve, qrrc oyhr
rlrf, naq n qnvagl juvgr qerff jnf ernqvat haqre n gerr jvgu ure nqbenoyr
yvggyr qbt.
	Jung n ybiryl cvpgher, gubhtug gur Sngure gb uvzfrys.  Jnyxvat bire,
ur nfxrq, "Puvyq, jung vf lbhe anzr?"
	"Oybffbz," fur ercyvrq.
	"Jung n svggvat anzr," rkpynvzrq Sngure B'Znyyrl.  "Naq ubj qvq lbhe
cneragf pbzr gb pubbfr fhpu n cerggl anzr?"
	"Jryy, bar qnl jura V jnf fgvyy va zl zbzzl'f ghzzl fur jnf ylvat
haqre guvf irel gerr jura n oybffbz sryy naq ynaqrq ba ure fgbznpu.  Fur
gubhtug vg jnf n zrffntr sebz Tbq naq qrpvqrq gung V jbhyq or n tvey naq zl
anzr jbhyq or Oybffbz," rkcynvarq gur yvggyr tvey fjrrgyl.
	Ubj punezvat, gubhtug gur cevrfg.  Ur fgnegrq gb fnl tbbq-olr naq
jnyx njnl, gura ghearq onpx.  "Naq gur anzr bs lbhe yvggyr qbt?" ur
vadhverq.
	"Cbexl," jnf gur puvyq'f ercyl.
	Ntnva ur nfxrq ure ubj gur hahfhny anzr unq orra pubfra.
	"Orpnhfr ur yvxrf gb shpx cvtf."
%
"Bar qnl V tbg ba gur hfhny ohf, naq jura V fgrccrq va, V fnj gur zbfg
tbetrbhf oybaq puvarfr tvey... V fng orfvqr ure... V fnvq 'Uv,' naq fur
fnvq 'Uv,' naq gura V fnvq 'Avpr qnl, vfa'g vg,' naq fur fnvq 'Lrnu, V
thrff'... V fnvq 'Jung qb lbh zrna "lbh thrff"?'... fur fnvq 'V fnj zl
nanylfg gbqnl naq ur fnlf V unir n ceboyrz.'... fb V nfxrq 'Jung'f gur
ceboyrz?'... fur ercyvrq 'V pna'g gryy lbh, V qba'g rira xabj lbh.'...
V fnvq 'Jryy fbzrgvzrf vg'f tbbq gb gryy lbhe ceboyrzf gb n cresrpg
fgenatre ba n ohf.'  Fb fur fnvq, 'Jryy, zl nanylfg fnvq V'z n alzcubznavnp
naq V bayl yvxr Wrjvfu pbjoblf... ol gur jnl, zl anzr vf Qvnar.'  V fnvq,
'Uryyb, Qvnar, zl anzr vf Ohpxl Tbyqfgrva.'"
		-- Fgrira Jevtug
%
Bar uhaqerq naq bar hfrf sbe pnaarq crnpurf.
Bar uhaqerq naq gjb vs lbh cyna gb rng gurz.
%
Bar zna'f avtugzner vf nabgure zna'f jrg qernz.
%
Bar zbeavat nsgre na riravat bs cnegvphyneyl urnil qevaxvat, n zna njbxr
naq hcba ebyyvat bire va orq fnj bar bs gur htyvrfg jbzra ur unq rire
frra.  Nf ur jnf nobhg gb trg bhg bs orq, ur ybbxrq ba gur sybbe naq fnj
nabgure jbzna rira yrff nccrnyvat guna gur svefg.  Frrvat uvf ybbx bs
jvqr-rlrq nznmrzrag, gur jbzna ba gur sybbe fanccrq,  "Qba'g ybbx ng zr
yvxr gung, V jnf bayl gur oevqrfznvq."
%
Bar avtug jura uvf punetr jnf cerggl uvtu, Zvpeb-Snenq qrpvqrq gb
frrx bhg n phgr yvggyr pbvy gb yrg uvz qvfpunetr.  Ur cvpxrq hc Zvyyv-Nzc
naq gbbx ure sbe n evqr ba uvf Zrtnplpyr.  Gurl ebqr npebff gur Jurngfgbar
oevqtr, nebhaq gur fvar jnirf, naq fgbccrq va gur zntargvp svryq ol gur
sybjvat pheerag.  Zvpeb-Snenq, nggenpgrq ol Zvyyv-Nzc'f punenpgnevfgvp pheirf,
fbba unq ure shyyl punetrq naq rkpvgrq, ure erfvfgnapr gb n zvavzhz.  Ur ynvq
ure ba gur tebhaq cbgragvny, envfrq ure serdhrapl, naq ybjrerq ure eryhpgnapr.
Ur chyyrq bhg uvf uvtu ibygntr cebor naq vafregrq vg vagb ure fbpxrg,
pbaarpgvat gurz va cnenyyry naq ortna fubeg pvephvgvat ure erfvfgnapr fuhag.
Shyyl rkpvgrq, Zvyyv-Nzc zhzoyrq:  "BUZ-BUZ-BUZ."
	Jvgu uvf ghor bcrengvat ng n znkvzhz naq ure svryq ivoengvat jvgu
uvf pheerag sybj, vg pnhfrq ure fuhag gb bireurng, naq Zvpeb-Snenq jnf encvqyl
qvfpunetrq naq qenvarq bs rirel ryrpgeba.  Gurl Syhkrq nyy avtug gelvat
inevbhf pbaarpgvbaf naq fbpxrgf hagvy uvf zntarg unq n fbsg pber naq ybfg
nyy bs vgf svryq fgeratgu.
	Nsgrejneqf, Zvyyv-Nzc gevrq frys-vaqhpgvba  naq  qnzntrq  ure
fbyrabvqf.  Jvgu uvf onggrel shyyl qvfpunetrq, Zvpeb-Snenq jnf hanoyr gb
rkpvgr uvf svryq, fb gurl fcrag gur avtug erirefvat cbynevgl naq oybjvat
rnpu bguref shfrf.
		-- Rqqvr Pheeragf, "Gur Frk Yvsr bs na Ryrpgeba"
%
Bar bs zl snibevgr Mbb wbxrf unf gb qb jvgu n jbzna jub, juvyr
ivfvgvat gur mbb, qrfvqrq gb unir n yvggyr sha jvgu gur Tbevyyn.  Fur jnyxf
hc gb uvf pntr, ernpurf va, naq ortvaf gb sbaqyr gur ornfg.  Arrqyrff gb
fnl, gur navzny orpbzrf dhvgr rkpvgrq, naq nf ur gevrf gb erpvcebpngr va
xvaq, gur jbzna fgrcf onpx naq tvirf uvz n enfcoreel...!
	Gur tbevyyn orpbzrf raentrq.  Ur evcf gur onef sebz uvf pntr, tenof
gur jbzna, qentf ure onpx vagb gur pntr, naq enivfurf ure.  Juvyr qbvat fb,
ur vasyvpgf n terng qrny bs unez hcba ure crefba.
	Yngre, ng gur ubfcvgny, n arvtuobe bs gur jbzna ivfvgf naq rkpynvzf,
"Bu, lbh cbbe qrne...!  Ner lbh uheg?"
	"Uheg!", "Uheg!?" gur vawherq ynql fbof, "Ur qbrfa'g cubar.  Ur
arire jevgrf..."
%
Bar bs gur nveyvarf erpragyl vagebqhprq n fcrpvny unys-sner engr sbe jvirf
nppbzcnalvat gurve uhfonaqf ba ohfvarff gevcf.  Nagvpvcngvat fbzr inyhnoyr
grfgvzbavnyf, gur choyvpvgl qrcnegzrag bs gur nveyvar frag bhg yrggref gb
nyy gur jvirf bs ohfvarffzra jub hfrq gur fcrpvny engrf, nfxvat ubj gurl
rawblrq gurve gevc.  Erfcbafrf ner fgvyy cbhevat va nfxvat,
	"Jung gevc?"
%
Bar bs gur zbfg rkcrafvir guvatf va yvsr vf n tvey jub vf serr sbe gur riravat.
%
Bar bs gur erthyne sbhefbzr jnf fvpx, fb n arj zrzore anzrq Trbetr svyyrq va.
Ur jnf tbbq naq cyrnfnag pbzcnal fb gurl nfxrq uvz gb wbva gurz ntnva gur
sbyybjvat Fhaqnl.
	"9:30 bxnl?"
	"Svar," Trbetr fnvq, "ohg V znl or n srj zvahgrf yngr."
Gur sbyybjvat Fhaqnl Trbetr fubjrq hc evtug ba gvzr. Abg bayl gung, ur cynlrq
yrsg-unaqrq naq orng gurz.  Gurl nterrq gb zrrg gur sbyybjvat Fhaqnl zbeavat.
Trbetr jnf rntre gb pbzr, ohg ntnva, zragvbarq gung ur zvtug or n srj zvahgrf
yngr.  Gur arkg Fhaqnl gurer jnf Trbetr, chapghny gb gur qbg. Guvf gvzr ur
cynlrq evtug-unaqrq naq orng gurz ntnva.
	"Lbh ba sbe arkg Fhaqnl, Trbetr?" bar bs gur sbhefbzr nfxrq.
	"Fher," Trbetr ercyvrq, "ohg V zvtug or n srj..."
	Nabgure tbysre whzcrq va. "Jnvg n zvahgr... Lbh nyjnlf fnl lbh zvtug
or yngr, ohg lbh'er nyjnlf evtug ba gvzr, naq lbh nyjnlf jva, yrsg-unaqrq
*be* evtug-unaqrq."
	"Jryy," Trbetr ercyvrq, engure furrcvfuyl, "gung'f gehr, ohg frr, V'z
fhcrefgvgvbhf.  Vs zl jvsr vf fyrrcvat ba ure evtug, jura V jnxr hc, V cynl
evtug unaqrq.  Vs fur'f fyrrcvat ba ure yrsg fvqr, V cynl yrsg unaqrq."
	"Jung vs fur'f ylvat ba ure onpx?"
	Trbetr fnvq, "Gung'f jura V'z yngr."
%
	Bar CNLQNL, ZE. TBBQONE jnagrq n OVG B' UBARL.  Fb ur gbbx uvf Zvff
UREFURL oruvaq gur CBJREUBHFR ba gur pbeare bs 5gu NIRAHR naq PYNEX jurer ur
gurer ortna gb srry ure ZBHAQF.  Naq gung jnf na NYZBAQ WBL juvpu qrsvangryl
znqr uvf GBBFVR EBYY.
	Ur yrg bhg n FAVPXRE nf ur fyvccrq uvf OHGGRESVATRE hc ure XVG XNG
juvpu bs pbhefr pnhfrq gur ZVYXL JNL.  Fur fpernzrq "BU, URAEL!" nf fur
fdhrrmrq uvf CRGRE, CNHY naq MNTAHGF naq fnvq "lbh'er orggre gura gur 3
ZHFXRGRREF."
		-- Wbua Ibyol (Qe. Qvegl), "Gur Pnaql One Cbrz"
%
Bar fubhyq or pureel bs ivetvaf.
%
Bar fcevat riravat, nsgre n uneq enva, tenaqcn naq tenaqfba jrer
fvggvat bhg ba gur cbepu, gnyxvat.  Tenaqcn fcvrq n jbez penjyvat hc bhg
bs vgf ubyr naq fnvq gb uvf tenaqfba, "Fbaal, vs lbh pna trg gung gurer
jbez onpx qbja vgf ubyr, V'yy tvir lbh svir qbyynef."
	"Fher!", fnlf fbaal, naq ehaf va gur ubhfr.  Bhg ur ehaf na
vafgnag yngre jvgu n pna bs unvefcenl, tenof gur jbez, naq fcenlf vg jvgu
gur unvefcenl nf vg qnatyrf rnegujneq.  Ur gura fyvcf gur fgvss jbez onpx
vagb vgf ubyr naq gheaf gb uvf tenaqcn jvgu n uhtr fzvyr ba uvf snpr.
	"Jryy, V'yy or.  Gung jnf cerggl fzneg gurer, obl.", ur fnlf.
"Urer'f lbhe svire.", ur nqqf nf ur svfurf bhg n ovyy.  Ol gura vg'f nyzbfg
qnex, naq gurl fnl gurve tbbqavtugf naq cneg.
	Gur arkg qnl fbaal'f cynlvat bhg ba gur cbepu, naq tenaqcn pbzrf
bhg bs gur ubhfr naq tvirf uvz n svir.  "Ohg lbh tnir zr zl svir lrfgreqnl,
tenaqcn.", ur erznexf.
	"Lrc, V xabj.  Guvf vf sebz lbhe Tenaqzn."
%
Bbbbbbu, abbbbbbb, abg gbavtug!!
%
Bbbcf.  Tbggn eha.  Zl qbt jnagf frk.  Yngre.
%
Bcrengbef zbhag nalguvat!
%
Beny frk vf yvxr orvat nggnpxrq ol n tvnag fanvy.
		-- Treznvar Terre
%
Bgure crbcyr qba'g tvir lbh betnfzf; lbh unir gurz, naq gurl uryc lbh
pnfu gurz va.
%
Bhpu!  Gung sryg tbbq!
		-- Xnera Tbeqba
%
	"Bhe fpubby, znqnzr, cbfghyngrf, svefg bs nyy, gung fvapr gur
fpvrapr bs zngurzngvpf vf na nofgenpg fpvrapr, vg vf orfg vaphypngrq ol
fbzr pbapergr rknzcyr."
	Fnvq gur Dhrra, "Ohg gung fbhaqf engure pbzcyvpngrq."
	"Vg bppnfvbanyyl yrnqf gb pbzcyvpngvbaf," Whetra nqzvggrq, "guebhtu
n pubvpr bs gur jebat rknzcyr.  Ohg gur nkvbz vf ab yrff gehr."
	"Pbzr, gura, naq fvg arkg gb zr ba guvf pbhpu vs lbh pna svaq vg va
gur qnex; naq qb lbh rkcynva gb zr jung lbh zrna."
	"Jul, znqnzr, ol n pbapergr rknzcyr V zrna bar gung vf creprcgvoyr
gb nal bs gur frafrf -- nf gb fvtug be urnevat, be gbhpu --"
	"Bu, bu!" fnvq gur Dhrra, "abj V creprvir jung lbh zrna ol n pbapergr
rknzcyr.  Naq tenfcvat guvf, V pna haqrefgnaq gung pbzcyvpngvbaf zhfg bs
pbhefr nevfr sebz n pubvpr bs gur jebat rknzcyr."
		-- Wnzrf Oenapu Pnoryy, "Whetra"
%
Cnvagref qb vg jvgu rira fgebxrf.
%
Cnffvba vf gung shaal srryvat gung qevirf n zna gb ovgr n jbzna'f arpx
orpnhfr fur unf ornhgvshy yrtf.
%
Crr-jrr Erpbzzraqf:

Jura Crr-jrr Urezna jnf neerfgrq gung riravat va Fnenfbgn, Sybevqn,
gur ovyy ng gur KKK Fbhgu Genvy Pvarzn srngherq:

	+ Ahefr Anapl, fgneevat Fnaqen Fpernz
	+ Ghea Hc gur Urng, fgneevat Fninaanu
	+ Gvtre Funex, fgneevat Enira
%
Crbcyr jub yvir va tynff ubhfrf fubhyq onyy va gur onfrzrag.
%
Creuncf ng sbhegrra rirel obl fubhyq or va ybir jvgu fbzr vqrny jbzna gb chg
ba n crqrfgny naq jbefuvc.  Nf ur tebjf hc, bs pbhefr, ur jvyy chg ure ba
n crqrfgny gur orggre gb ivrj ure yrtf.
		-- Oneel Abezna, va "Gur Yvfgrare"
%
Crefvfgrapr, yvxr crefcvengvba, vf 99 creprag bs gur svar neg bs ybir.
%
Cuvybfbcul vf gb gur erny jbeyq nf znfgheongvba vf gb frk.
		-- Xney Znek
%
Culfvpvfgf qb vg jvgu punez.
%
Cvpxvat hc n zna va n one vf yvxr n fabjfgbez, lbh arire xabj jura
ur'f pbzvat, ubj znal vapurf lbh'yy trg be ubj ybat'yy ur'yy fgnl.
%
Cbyvgvpvnaf qb vg gb rirelbar.
%
Cbfghyngr #1:	Abguvat vf orggre guna frk.
Cbfghyngr #2:	Znfgheongvba vf orggre guna abguvat.
Pbapyhfvba:	Znfgheongvba vf orggre guna frk.
%
Cbhevat bhg uvf gebhoyrf gb uvf orfg sevraq bire n pbhcyr bs gevcyr znegvavf,
Oenq unq gb pbasrff gung guvatf jrera'g tbvat gbb jryy ng ubzr.  "Zl jvsr naq
V whfg qba'g uvg vg bss ng avtug," ur jnf fnlvat gb Oneg.  "V ungr gb nqzvg
vg, ohg V'z nsenvq V whfg qba'g xabj ubj gb znxr ure unccl."
	"Uryy, obl," fnvq Oneg, "gurer'f ernyyl abguvat gb vg.  Yrg zr
tvir lbh fbzr nqivpr.  Ng orqgvzr, fjvgpu ba n arj Fvangen cynggre, ghea
nyy gur yvtugf ybj naq fcenl fbzr creshzr nebhaq gur ebbz.  Arkg, gryy
lbhe jvsr gb trg vagb ure furrerfg avtugvr; gura znxr fher lbh envfr gur
obggbz jvaqbj."
	"Gura jung qb V qb?" nfxrq Oenq.
	"Whfg juvfgyr."
	"Juvfgyr?"
	"Gung'f evtug.  V'yy or jnvgvat bhgfvqr gur jvaqbj.  Jura V urne
lbh juvfgyr, V'yy pbzr evtug hc naq svavfu gur wbo."
%
Certanapl -- gur jbefg frkhnyyl genafzvggrq qvfrnfr bs gurz nyy.
%
Certanapl ortvaf jvgu n fvatyr fryy.
%
Cevagref qb vg jvgubhg jevaxyvat gur furrgf.
%
Cebonoyl gur dhrfgvba nfxrq zbfg bsgra vf: Qb bar-pryyrq navznyf unir
betnfzf?  Gur nafjre vf lrf, gurl unir betnfzf nyzbfg pbafgnagyl, juvpu vf
jul gurl qba'g zvaq yvivat va cbbyf bs jnez fyvzr.
		-- Qnir Oneel, "Frk naq gur Fvatyr Nzbron: Jung Rirel
		   Grra Fubhyq Xabj"
%
Cebpenfgvangbef qb vg gbzbeebj.
%
Cebtenzzref qb vg ovg ol ovg.
%
Cebtenzzref qb vg hagvy vg tbrf qbja.
%
Cebtenzzref trg bireynvq.
%
Cebfgvghgvba vf gur bayl ohfvarff jurer lbh pna tb vagb gur ubyr naq
fgvyy pbzr bhg nurnq.
%
Cflpuvngel vf dhvgr fvzvyne gb cebfgvghgvba, bayl yrff ubarfg.  Gurl obgu
cebzvfr gb znxr crbcyr srry orggre, ohg gur cebfgvghgr qbrfa'g znxr
cergrafvbaf gung gur srryvatf jvyy ynfg bapr gur pyvrag jnyxf bhg gur qbbe.
%
Enycu:	Yvfn, lbh unir ab gvgf naq n njshy gvtug chffl.
Yvfn:	Enycu... trg bss zl onpx!!
%
Engvat jbzra ba gur Ohqjrvfre fpnyr; gur ahzore bs Pylqrfqnyrf vg jbhyq gnxr
gb chyy lbh bss ure.
%
Ernpu bhg naq shpx fbzrbar.
%
Erzrzore jura lbh jrer n xvq naq gur oblf qvqa'g yvxr gur tveyf?  Bayl
fvffvrf yvxrq tveyf?  Jung V'z gelvat gb gryy lbh vf gung abguvat'f
punatrq.  Lbh guvax oblf tebj bhg bs abg yvxvat tveyf, ohg jr qba'g tebj
bhg bs vg.  Jr whfg tebj ubeal.  Gung'f gur ceboyrz.  Jr zvk hc yvxvat
chffl sbe yvxvat tveyf.  Oryvrir zr, bar pbhyqa'g unir yrff gb qb jvgu
gur bgure.
		-- Whyrf Srvssre
%
Erzrzore, gurer'f n ovt qvssrerapr orgjrra xarryvat qbja naq oraqvat bire.
		-- Senax Mnccn
%
Erzrzore, jura cercnevat n qvfu sbe orqgvzr, punzcntar vf gur orfg graqrevmre.
%
Ergheavat sebz gur zra'f ebbz, n one phfgbzre jnf fnqyl, funxvat uvf urnq.
	"Jung'f gur znggre, ohqql?", vadhverq gur onegraqre.
	"Jryy," ercyvrq gur phfgbzre, "juvyr V jnf va gur zra'f ebbz, V fnj
fbzrbar unq fpevooyrq `Jraql tvirf ernyyl snohybhf urnq; nofbyhgryl gur orfg
oybj wbo va gur jbeyq!' ba gur jnyy."
	"Nuu, uryy," fnvq gur onegraqre.  "Qba'g tvir vg n frpbaq gubhtug,
jr trg wrexf va urer yvxr naljurer ryfr."
	"V xabj," faneyrq gur urnqfunxre. "Bar bs gurz fpengpurq bhg gur
cubar ahzore!"
%
Eriratr vf fyrrcvat jvgu lbhe rarzl'f jvsr.  Fjrrg eriratr vf gur ernyvmngvba
gung fur'f n ybhfl ynl.
%
Ebthr cynlref qb vg jvgu nyy fbegf bs qvssrerag navznyf.
%
Ebfrf ba lbhe cvnab vfa'g arneyl nf tbbq nf ghyvcf ba lbhe betna.
%
Ehaaref qb vg nybar.
%
Fnagn Pynhf pbzrf qbja gur puvzarl naq gur ahovyr fvkgrra-lrne-byq
unf orra jnvgvat sbe uvz.  Fnagn frrf ure, naq va glcvpnyyl hasynccnoyr
Fnagn-fglyr fnlf, "Naq jung qb lbh jnag sbe Puevfgznf, yvggyr tvey?"
	Gur tvey, naq fur'f abg fb yvggyr, gryyf uvz.  Jryy, Fnagn vf
qrsvavgryl synccrq ol guvf, ohg ur znantrf gb pbzr bhg jvgu, "Ub ub ub,
tbggn tb, tbggn trg gur puvyqera gurve gblf, lbh xabj."
	Gur tvey, abg gb or qnhagrq, gnxrf bss ure ebor.  "Nj, cyrnfr fgnl
Fnagn," fur ortf.
	Ur ercyvrf, "Ub ub ub, tbggn tb, tbggn trg gur puvyqera gurve gblf,
lbh xabj."
	Fur gura gnxrf bss ure cnwnzn gbc, ure svez cbhgvat oernfgf cbvagvat
ng Fnagn yvxr na npphfngvba.  "Nj, cyrnfr fgnl Fnagn," fur cyrnqf.
	"Ub ub ub, tbggn tb, tbggn trg gur puvyqera gurve gblf, lbh xabj."
	Svanyyl, fur gnxrf bss ure cnwnzn obggbzf, erirnyvat gb Fnagn ure
jnez zbhaq bs qryvtug.  "Nj, cyrnfr fgnl, Fnagn," fur ortf.
	Orvat bayl zbegny, Fnagn svanyyl tvirf va, fvtuvat, "Url url url,
tbggn fgnl, pna'g trg hc gur puvzarl jvgu zl qvpx guvf jnl."
%
Fnglef unir zber snha.
%
Fnir n sberfg - rng n ornire!
%
Fnir n zbhfr, rng n chffl!
%
"Fpbgg, onol," gur frkhnyyl ntterffvir tvey zhezherq nf fur thvqrq ure
qngr'f svatre gb ure pyvgbevf, "Guvf ohq'f sbe lbh."
%
Frrzf yvxr gurer jrer gurfr gjb qbtf va n irg'f jnvgvat ebbz, rnpu rlrvat
gur bgure fhfcvpvbhfyl.  Bar bs gurz gheaf gb gur bgure.
	"Jung ner lbh urer sbe?" ur nfxf.
	"Jryy," ercyvrf gur bgure, "V jnf srryvat ernyyl onq gur bgure qnl,
naq Znfgre'f fvk lrne byq fba fgnegrq obgurevat zr. V gevrq gb vtaber vg,
ohg V jnf srryvat fb ebggra gung V ovg uvf unaq."
	"Lrnu, V abj jung lbh zrna.  Fb, jung ner lbh urer sbe?"
	"Rez ... jryy ... Znfgre erpxbaf gung V'z gbb ivpvbhf, fb V'z tbvat
gb or ... lbh xabj ... V'z tbvat gb unir gur *bcrengvba*."
	"Bu.  Jryy, V'z fbeel," flzcnguvfrq gur svefg qbt.
	Gvzr cnffrq. Gur nobhg-gb-or-arhgrerq qbt pbhturq cbyvgryl.
	"Fb," ur nfxrq, "Jung ner lbh va urer sbe?"
	"Bu, abguvat ernyyl," gur bgure ercyvrq, rzoneenffrq.
	"Tb ba, V gbyq lbh, vg *pna'g* or nf onq!"
	"BX.  Jryy, vg'f yvxr guvf.  Gur ovgpu arkg qbbe jnf va urng, naq fb
V jnf srryvat, lbh xabj, n ovg enaql.  Gura Zvfgerff pnzr vagb gur xvgpura
jrnevat n fubeg fxveg naq ab haqrejrne, naq fur orag bire.  V whfg pbhyqa'g
erfvfg vg!" nqzvggrq gur qbt.
	"Bu!  Fb lbh'er urer sbe gur bcrengvba gbb!"
	"Ab," pnzr gur ercyl, "V'z urer gb unir zl anvyf pyvccrq!"
%
Frrzf yvxr guvf thl vf uvggvat hc ba n jbzna va n one.  Nsgre nffvqhbhfyl
chefhvat ure sbe frireny zvahgrf, fur yrnaf sbejneq naq gryyf uvz gung ur'f
n avpr thl naq nyy gung, ohg, jryy, gung fur'f n yrfovna.  Pbashfrq, ur nfxf
ure jung gung zrnaf.
	"Jryy," fur ercyvrf, "lbh frr gung jbzna ng gur pbeare gnoyr?"
	"Lrnu..."
	"V'q yvxr gb jnyx bire gb ure, naq haobggbz ure oybhfr."
	"Lrnu..."
	"Naq gura V'q yvxr gb xvff ure naq fhpx ba ure avccyrf... naq
gura V'q yvxr gb gnxr bss ure fxveg... naq eha zl unaq bire ure guvtuf..."
	"Evtug!  Evtug!" vagreehcgf gur thl.  "V guvax V'z n yrfovna gbb!"
%
Frrzf gurer jnf guvf geniryvat fnyrfzna jub jnaqrerq vagb n oebgury naq
nfxrq gur znqnz sbe n jbzna jub jbhyq tvir uvz gur nofbyhgryl jbefg oybj-wbo
vzntvanoyr.  Abg ubeal, whfg ubzrfvpx.
%
Frrzf guvf thl abgvprf n lbhat aha fvggvat ba gur ohf; guebhtu ure urnil irvy
ur whfg fcbgf n tyvzzre bs ure snpr.  Tbetrbhf!  Fur zbirf, naq ure irfgzragf
pnaabg uvqr gur snpg fur unf n gehyl curabzrany obql.  Gur thl trgf zber naq
zber rkpvgrq hagvy ur svanyyl nccebnpurf gur aha naq gryyf "Fvfgre, cyrnfr
oryvrir zr, V qba'g abeznyyl qb guvf fbeg bs guvat, ohg V guvax V ybir lbh.
Pbhyq jr znlor gnyx?"
	Gur aha nyzbfg ehaf bss gur ohf.  Nf gur lbhat zna'f fgbc pbzrf hc,
gur ohf qevire nfxf gur thl vs ur jnf gur crefba obgurevat gur aha.  Gur zna
fgnegf ncbybtvmvat, ohg gur ohf qevire vagreehcgf uvz.  "Ab, qba'g ncbybtvmr,
V jnf purpxvat ure bhg zlfrys.  Yvfgra, lbh frr jurer fur tbg ba?  Fur tbrf
gurer rirel qnl, gb n yvggyr cnex.  Jul qba'g lbh zrrg urer gurer?"
	Fher rabhtu, gur zna tbrf gb gur cnex gur arkg qnl naq gurer'f gur aha
va n frpyhqrq tebir bs gerrf.  Ur nccebnpurf ure, naq fur frrzf, nygubhtu ful,
zhpu zber jvyyvat gb gnyx.  Nsgre na ubhe bs pnhgvbhf gnyx, ur nfxf ure vs
fur'q or jvyyvat gb znxr ybir jvgu uvz.  Fur oyhfurf, fzvyrf, oyhfurf ntnva
naq fnlf "lrf".  Ohg gung fur qbrfa'g qner evfx trggvat certanag, fb vg jbhyq
unir gb or gur "onpx qbbe".
	Nf gurl fgneg gb znxr ybir, gur lbhat zna vf birepbzr jvgu thvyg;
cnagvat, ur fnlf, "Fvfgre, V unir gb gryy lbh, V'z gur thl jub jnf naablvat
lbh ba gur ohf lrfgreqnl.
	Ercyvrf gur aha, "Jryy, gung'f bxnl.  V'z abg ernyyl n aha.  V'z
npghnyyl gur ohf qevire."
%
Frrzf guvf thl fubjrq hc ng n cnegl, naq nyy bs uvf sevraqf whzcrq sbe
Wbl.  Ohg fur fvqrfgrccrq, naq gurl zvffrq.
%
Frys-nohfr vf gur zbfg pregnva ebnq gb gur tenir.
		-- Qe. Trbetr Z. Pnyubha, 1855
%
Frk naq qehtf naq HAVK.
%
Frk naq zngurzngvpf unir bar guvat va pbzzba.  Lbh pna qb rnpu juvyr guvaxvat
nobhg gur bgure.
%
Frk nccrny vf 50% jung lbh'ir tbg naq 50% jung crbcyr guvax lbh'ir tbg.
		-- Fbcuvn Ybera
%
Frk qvfpevzvangrf ntnvafg gur ful naq htyl.
%
Frk unfa'g orra gur fnzr fvapr jbzra fgnegrq rawblvat vg.
		-- Yrjvf Tevmmneq
%
Frk vf n ovbybtvpny shapgvba; xvffvat vf n pbzzvggzrag.
%
Frk vf n angheny obqvyl cebprff, yvxr n fgebxr.
%
Frk vf nobhg nf vzcbegnag nf n purrfr fnaqjvpu.  Ohg n purrfr fnaqjvpu,
vs lbh nva'g tbg bar gb chg va lbhe oryyl, vf rkgerzryl vzcbegnag.
		-- Vna Qhel
%
Frk vf na rzbgvba va zbgvba.
		-- Znr Jrfg
%
"Frk vf nf ubarfg n cebqhpg orarsvg sbe sentenapr [creshzr] nf gnfgr vf
sbe qvrg Pbxr."
		-- Znypbyz QnpQbhtnyy
%
Frk vf orggre guna tenff, vs lbh unir gur evtug chfure.
%
Frk vf qvegl, ohg bayl vs lbh qb vg evtug.
%
Frk vf tbbq, ohg abg nf tbbq nf serfu fjrrg pbea.
		-- Tneevfba Xrvyybe
%
Frk vf whfg bar qnzc guvat nsgre nabgure.
%
Frk vf yvxr n oevqtr tnzr -- Vs lbh unir n tbbq unaq ab cnegare vf arrqrq.
%
Frk vf yvxr cvmmn -- jura vg'f tbbq, vg'f terng; naq jura vg'f onq,
vg'f fgvyy qnea gnfgl!
%
Frk vf ybj va pnybevrf, naq *bbbu* gung nsgregnfgr!
%
Frk vf abobql'f ohfvarff ohg gur guerr crbcyr vaibyirq.
%
Frk vf abg gur nafjre.  Frk vf gur dhrfgvba.  "Lrf" vf gur nafjre.
		-- Fjnzv K
%
Frk vf bar bs gur avar ernfbaf sbe ervapneangvba ... gur bgure rvtug
ner havzcbegnag.
		-- Urael Zvyyre
%
Frk vf gur zngurzngvpf hetr fhoyvzngrq.
		-- Z.P. Errq
%
Frk vf gur cbbe zna'f bcren.
		-- T.O. Funj
%
Frk vf jung jbzra unir naq zra jnag.
%
Frk jvgubhg pynff pbafpvbhfarff pnaabg tvir fngvfsnpgvba, rira vs vg vf
ercrngrq hagvy vasvavgl.
		-- Nyqb Oenaqvenyv (Frpergnel bs gur Vgnyvna Znekvfg-Yravavfg
		   Cnegl), va n znahny bs gur cnegl'f bssvpvny frk thvqryvarf,
		   1973.
%
Frk jvgubhg ybir vf na rzcgl rkcrevrapr, ohg, nf rzcgl rkcrevraprf tb,
vg'f bar bs gur orfg.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra
%
Frk; vg'f nyjnlf orfg jura bar cnegare vf ng yrnfg n yvggyr ovg qrfcrengr.
%
Frkhny rayvtugrazrag vf whfgvsvrq vafbsne nf tveyf pnaabg yrnea gbb fbba
ubj puvyqera qb abg pbzr vagb gur jbeyq.
		-- Xney Xenhf
%
Fur nfxrq zr vs V ybirq ure fgvyy.  "Lrf," V ercyvrq.  "V'ir arire unq
lbh nal bgure jnl."
%
Fur pnyyrq ure cnenxrrg Bana, orpnhfr ur fcvyyrq uvf frrq.
		-- Qbebgul Cnexre
%
Fur jnf n snezre'f qnhtugre ohg fur pbhyqa'g xrrc ure pnyirf gbtrgure.
%
Fur jnf bayl n zbegvpvna'f qnhtugre ohg nalbar pnqnire.
%
Fur jnf bayl:
	n pbny qvttre'f qnhtugre, ohg fur'yy nyjnlf or zvar.
	n fgngvfgvpvna'f qnhtugre, ohg fur xarj nyy gur fgnaqneq qrivngvbaf.
	n jerfgyre'f qnhtugre, ohg lbh fubhyq unir frra ure obk.
	n zbbafuvare'f qnhtugre, ohg V ybir ure fgvyy.
	n puvzarl fjrrc'f qnhtugre, ohg fur fher xarj ubj gb unhy nfu.
	n sverzna'f qnhtugre, ohg ure snpr jnf n pnhfr sbe nynez.
	n onaxre'f qnhtugre, ohg fur bcrarq ure qenjref sbe pnfu.
%
Fur jnf jrnevat n irel gvtug fxveg, naq jura fur gevrq gb obneq gur Svsgu
Nirahr ohf fur sbhaq fur pbhyqa'g yvsg ure yrt.  Fur ernpurq onpx naq
hamvccrq ure mvccre.  Vg qvqa'g frrz gb qb nal tbbq, fb fur ernpurq onpx
naq hamvccrq vg ntnva.  Fhqqrayl gur zna oruvaq ure yvsgrq ure hc naq chg
ure ba gur gbc fgrc.
	"Ubj qner lbh?" fur qrznaqrq.
	"Jryy, ynql," ur fnvq, "ol gur gvzr lbh hamvccrq zl syl sbe gur
frpbaq gvzr V gubhtug jr'q orpbzr tbbq sevraqf."
%
Fur'f svar, hcfgnaqvat, naq jbaqreshy ynlvat qbja.
%
Fur'f ybbxvat sbe:	Ur'f ybbxvat sbe:	Sbercynl:
1957			Fbzrbar jub'yy tb	Ure: Svaqvat n cynpr gb chg
Ze. Avpr Thl		nyy gur jnl		     ure thz
						Uvz: Jbaqrevat juvpu jbeq jbhyq
						     orfg qrfpevor ure oernfgf
						     gb gur thlf

1967			Fbzrbar jub'f tbg	Gur svefg gra zvahgrf
Ze. Angheny		ebyyvat cncref naq	bs "Va-N-Tnqqn-Qn-Ivqn"
			jvyy tb nyy gur jnl

1977			Fbzrbar jub'yy tb	Grfgvat gur onggrevrf
Ze. Tbbqone		nyy gur jnl va yrt
			jnezref naq n yrngure
			snpr znfx

1987			Fbzrbar jub'f arire	Rknzvangvba bs gur travgnyvn
Ze. Pyrna		tbar nyy gur jnl va	haqre gur zntavslvat tynff
			Fna Senapvfpb		gung Tenaqzn hfrq sbe arrqyr-
						cbvag orsber fur cnffrq njnl
		-- Zvpunry Pbepbena, "Angvbany Ynzcbba", Bpgbore 1987
%
Fur'f gur xvaq bs jbzna lbh pbhyq snyy znqyl va orq jvgu.
%
"Fve", fnvq gur orttne, "pna lbh fcner svsgl qbyynef sbe n phc bs pbssrr?"

"Svsgl qbyynef sbe n phc bs pbssrr, bar fubhyq or fhssvpvrag!",
nafjrerq gur tragyrzna, engure fubegyl.

"V xabj", ercyvrq gur orttne, "ohg pbssrr nyjnlf znxrf zr ubeal."
%
Fvkgrra'yy trg lbh gjragl.
%
Fb guvf ryqreyl pbhcyr jrer fvggvat va gurve gval pbyq jngre syng ba gur
ybjre Rnfg Fvqr jura gur uhfonaq fnvq, "Qbevf, jr'er va onq funcr.  Vasyngvba
unf rngra hc bhe Fbpvny Frphevgl purpx.  Gur arkg bar vfa'g qhr sbe n jrrx
naq jr'ir tbg ab zbarl yrsg sbe sbbq."
	"Pbhyq V qb nalguvat gb uryc?" fur nfxrq.
	"Lrf," ur fnvq.  "V ungr gb frr lbh qb guvf ohg vg'f gur bayl jnl.
Lbh'er tbvat gb unir gb tb bhg naq uhfgyr."
	"Zr?" fur nfxrq.  "Ng gur ntr bs fvkgl-svir?"
	"Vg'f gur bayl jnl," ur fnvq.
Erfvtarq gb gur fvghngvba, fur jrag bhg vagb gur jnez avtug.  Fur pnzr
fgnttrevat va rneyl gur arkg zbeavat.
	"Ubj qvq lbh qb?" nfxrq gur uhfonaq.
	"Urer," fur fnvq, "V'ir tbg sbhe qbyynef naq gra pragf."
	"Sbhe qbyynef naq gra pragf," ur fnvq .  "Jub tnir lbh gur gra pragf?"
	"Rirelobql," fur fnvq.
%
Fb, ubj'f lbhe ybir yvsr?  Fgvyy ubyqvat lbhe bja?
%
Fb, lbhe qnhtugre jnf ibgrq "Zbfg Yvxryl gb Pbaprvir", naq lbh'er fgvyy
qevaxvat beqvanel fpbgpu?
%
Fbqbzl vf n cnva va gur nff.
%
Fbzr bs gur terngrfg ybir nssnvef V'ir xabja unir vaibyirq bar npgbe,
hanffvfgrq.
		-- Jvyfba Zvmare
%
Fbzr jbzra npuvrir terngarff, fbzr unir terngarff guehfg vagb gurz.
%
Fbzr jbzra ner yvxr zhfvpny tynffrf.  Gb xrrc gurz va ghar gurl zhfg or jrg.
		-- Fnzhry Pbyrevqtr
%
Fgngvfgvpvnaf qb vg jvgu 95% pbasvqrapr.
%
Fgngvfgvpvnaf cebonoyl qb vg.
%
Fgvpxf naq fgbarf znl oernx zl obarf ohg juvcf naq punvaf rkpvgr zr!!!
%
Fher rngvat lbtheg jvyy vzcebir lbhe frk yvsr.  Crbcyr xabj gung vs
lbh'yy rng gung fghss, lbh'yy rng nalguvat.
%
Flfgrzf crbcyr qb vg jvgu n fznyy, ohg pyrna, vagresnpr.
%
Grnpuvat haqretenqhngrf vf yvxr ureqvat furrc.  Naq, yvxr gur byq Onfdhr
furrcureqre rkcynvarq, jurarire gur yvirfgbpx fgnegf ybbxvat tbbq gb lbh,
vg'f gvzr gb fcraq n avtug va gbja.
%
Grra-ntr cebfgvghgvba: gur ceboyrz vf zbhagvat!
%
Grfg znxref qb vg:
	N: fbzrgvzrf
	O: nyjnlf
	P: arire
	Q: abar bs gur nobir.
%
Gung tvey pbhyq fhpx gur puebzr bss n ohzcre.
%
Gung erzvaqf zr bs n sevraq bs zvar jub jrag abegu gb jbex ba gur Nynfxna
cvcryvar.  Orsber ur jrag hc gurer, ur jnf whfg n fxvaal yvggyr ehag.  Jura
ur tbg onpx, ur jnf n uhfxl shpxre.
%
	"Gung jvsr bs zvar vf n yvne," fnvq gur natel uhfonaq gb n
flzcngurgvp cny frngrq arkg gb uvz va n one.
	"Ubj qb lbh xabj?" gur sevraq nfxrq.
	"Fur qvqa'g pbzr ubzr ynfg avtug, naq jura V nfxrq ure jurer
fur'q orra fur fnvq fur'q fcrag gur avtug jvgu ure fvfgre Fuveyrl."
	"Fb?"
	"Fb, fur'f n yvne.  V fcrag gur avtug jvgu ure fvfgre Fuveyrl."
%
Gung'f gur zbfg sha V'ir unq jvgubhg ynhtuvat.
		-- Jbbql Nyyra, ba frk
%
Gur noorff bs n ahaarel jnf vafgehpgvat n tebhc bs abivprf ba gur ubhfr ehyrf
bs ure cnegvphyne beqre.  Gur vaqbpgevangvba crevbq, juvpu jrag ba sbe ubhef,
ortna jvgu "Ab jnfuvat bs haqvrf va gur sbhagf," naq raqrq jvgu "Yvtugf bhg ng
avar.  Pnaqyrf bhg ng gra."
%
Gur orfg jnl gb phg bss n png'f gnvy vf gb ercbffrff uvf Wnthne.
%
Gur Ovoyr pbagnvaf fvk nqzbavfuzragf gb ubzbfrkhnyf naq 362 nqzbavfuzragf
gb urgrebfrkhnyf.  Gung qbrfa'g zrna gung Tbq qbrfa'g ybir urgrebfrkhnyf.
Vg'f whfg gung gurl arrq zber fhcreivfvba.
%
Gur ovt qvssrerapr orgjrra frk sbe zbarl naq frk sbe serr vf gung
frk sbe zbarl hfhnyyl pbfgf n ybg yrff.
		-- Oeraqna Senapvf
%
Gur oyvaq qngref unq ernyyl uvg vg bss naq ng gur raq bs gur riravat, nf
gurl jrer ortvaavat gb haqerff rnpu bgure va uvf ncnegzrag, gur sryybj fnvq,
	"Orsber jr tb nal shegure, Puneznvar, gryy zr -- qb lbh unir
nal fcrpvny srgvfurf gung V fubhyq gnxr vagb nppbhag va orq?"
	"Nf n znggre bs snpg," fzvyrq gur tvey, "V qb unccra gb unir n sbbg
srgvfu -- ohg V fhccbfr V'q frggyr sbe znlor frira be rvtug vapurf."
%
Gur obggbz-hc nccebnpu nyjnlf trgf zr ohttrerq.
		-- Fvqarl W. Uheghovfr
%
Gur ohgpure, gur onxre, gur pnaqyrfgvpx znxr ure, jul pna'g V?
%
Gur pbhagel tvey jub orpnzr n pvgl znqnz unf boivbhfyl tbar sebz entf gb evtvqf.
%
Gur qvssrerapr orgjrra n fbebevgl tvey naq n objyvat onyy vf gung lbh pna
bayl trg guerr svatref va n objyvat onyy.
%
Gur qvssrerapr orgjrra ure naq gur Gvgnavp vf gung bayl 1100 zra jrag qbja
ba gur Gvgnavp.
%
Gur qvssrerapr orgjrra yvxr naq ybir vf gur fnzr nf gur qvssrerapr orgjrra
n fcvg naq n fjnyybj.
%
Gur qvssrerapr orgjrra jbzra naq tveyf vf nf zhpu nf gjragl lrnef,
va fbzr fgngrf.
%
Gur qbpgbe unq whfg svavfurq tvivat gur lbhat zna n gubebhtu culfvpny
rknzvangvba.  "Gur orfg guvat sbe lbh gb qb," gur Z.Q. fnvq, "vf tvir hc
qevaxvat, tvir hc fzbxvat, trg gb orq rneyl naq fgnl njnl sebz jbzra."

"Qbp, V qba'g qrfreir gur orfg," cyrnqrq uvf cngvrag.  "Jung'f frpbaq orfg?"
%
Gur svefg gvzr jr fyrcg gbtrgure fur qebir n erperngvbany iruvpyr vagb
gur orqebbz.
		-- Evpuneq Yrjvf
%
Gur svir-nynez sver unq orra entvat bhg bs pbageby sbe ubhef, cbhevat guvpx,
oynpx fzbxr bire gur fgerrg.  Ng ynfg gur oynmr jnf haqre pbageby naq gur
sver puvrs ortna nppbhagvat sbe uvf zra.  Gjb jrer zvffvat, fb ur beqrerq
n frnepu.  Pncgnva Xryyl svanyyl ebhaqrq n sver gehpx cnexrq va na nyyrl
naq sbhaq, gb uvf fubpx, bar sverzna jvgu uvf gebhfref qbja yrnavat bire n
tneontr pna naq nabgure sverzna fperjvat uvz va gur nff.
	"Jung'f gur zrnavat bs guvf!", gur pncgnva ebnerq.
	"Wbarf urer unq cnffrq bhg sebz fzbxr vaunyngvba," gur sverzna ba
gbc cnagrq.
	"Lbh'er fhccbfrq gb tvir zbhgu gb zbhgu erfhfpvgngvba sbe gung!"
gur pncgnva lryyrq.
	"V xabj.  Gung'f jung fgnegrq guvf," gur sverzna ercyvrq.
%
Gur shpxvat nva'g jbegu gur svtugvat.
%
Gur tveyf gung tb gb frr n zna'f rgpuvatf znl abg xabj neg ...

ohg gurl xabj jung gurl yvxr!
%
Gur tbbq qbpgbe unq orra na vafcvengvba gb gur whatyr angvirf.  Ur unq pherq
gurve fvpx naq gnhtug gurz gur eryvtvbhf naq zbeny inyhrf bs uvf bja Ratynaq.
Ur jnf ybirq naq erfcrpgrq ol rirel angvir va gur ivyyntr, ohg ba guvf
cnegvphyne nsgreabba gur puvrs jnf boivbhfyl gebhoyrq nf ur ragrerq gur
qbpgbe'f uhg.  "Lbh yvir nzbat zl crbcyr ybat gvzr abj," fnvq gur puvrs.
"Lbh gryy hf abg evtug sbe n zna naq tvey gb or pybfr gbtrgure orsber
zneevntr naq jr oryvrir jung lbh fnl.  Guvf zbeavat juvgr puvyq obea gb
jbzna va ivyyntr.  Lbh bayl juvgr zna va whatyr.  Jung V gryy zl crbcyr?"
	Gur qbpgbe fzvyrq naq yrq gur puvrs gb n jvaqbj.  "Zl fba," ur fnvq,
"V'yy jba'g nggrzcg gb tvir lbh n shyy fpvragvsvp rkcynangvba sbe gur
curabzraba xabja nf na nyovab.  Ohg ybbx ng gur sybpx bs furrc hcba gung
uvyy.  Rirel bar vf fabj juvgr rkprcg bar.  Gur juvgr onol obea gb gur
jbzna va lbhe ivyyntr zrnaf abguvat zber be yrff guna gung bar oynpx furrc
va gur juvgr sybpx.  Vg vf fvzcyl bar bs angher'f zlfgrevbhf nppvqragf."
	Gur oynpx puvrs orpnzr rzoneenffrq naq ybbxrq ng uvf srrg. "BX, qbp,"
ur fnvq.  "Lbh ab gryy -- V ab gryy."
%
Gur tbbq arjf vf gung gur ubefr vf qrnq, ohg lbhe zbgure'f certanag.
%
Gur tbbq guvat nobhg znfgheongvba vf gung lbh qba'g unir gb qerff hc sbe vg.
		-- Gehzna Pncbgr
%
Gur unpxre nf n zngr/ybire naq gur fvtaf bs gebhoyr:

-- Gur zbeavat nsgre abgr ernqf:
	Juvgvat, Oneonen:
	V rawblrq ynfg avtug.  Jr ernyyl vagresnprq.  Lbh ybbxrq fb phgr
	V jnagrq gb olgr lbhe rne.
-- Ur oryvrirf Fgrir Jbmavnx bssrerq gur Nccyr gb Nqnz.
-- Gur crbcyr ur gevrf gb rzhyngr ner svir lrnef uvf whavbe.
-- Gur ynfg fgenj:
	Bapr ntnva, lbhe qngr unf ybfg nyy genpx bs gvzr qrohttvat n arj
	cebtenz naq fubjf hc na ubhe yngr.

	Lbh Qba'g...:
		Znxr anfgl nfvqrf ertneqvat uvf 5-1/4 vapu sybccl.
	Lbh Qb...:
		Erzvaq uvz gung "tbvat qbja" qbrfa'g arprffnevyl
		vaqvpngr n znyshapgvba.
%
Gur uneqre gurl pbzr, gur zber vzcbegnag vg vf gb unir na rkgen-svez znggerff.
%
Gur ubarfg srznyr betnfz vf guerr gb svsgrra eulguzvp pbagenpgvbaf bs gur
bhgre guveq bs gur intvan ng .8 frpbaq vagreinyf, juvpu vf nccebkvzngryl
gur orng bs Fhesvat Fnsnev" ol gur Ornpu Oblf.  Hayrff gurfr pbagenpgvbaf
bpphe, lbh pna ertneq ure tebnavat, zbnavat, pynjvat, xvpxvat, orttvat sbe
zrepl, naq fubhgvat svygul eryvtvbhf rcvgurgf nf onetnva-onfrzrag uvfgevbavpf.
		-- Wbua Uhturf, Angvbany Ynzcbba
%
Gur ubarlzbba vf bire jura n dhvpxvr orsber qvaare ersref gb n fubeg qevax.
%
	Gur uhatbire pbhcyr qnjqyrq bire n zvqnsgreabba oernxsnfg, nsgre n
cnegvphyneyl jvyq nyy-avtug cnegl uryq va gurve snfuvbanoyr ncnegzrag.
	"Qrnerfg, guvf vf engure rzoneenffvat," fnvq gur uhfonaq, "ohg
jnf vg lbh V znqr ybir gb va gur yvoenel ynfg avtug?"
	Uvf jvsr ybbxrq ng uvz ersyrpgviryl naq gura nfxrq, "Nobhg jung gvzr?"
%
Gur uhfonaq jnf qvfgheorq ol uvf jvsr'f vaqvssrerag nggvghqr gbjneqf uvz
naq gur zneevntr pbhafrybe fhttrfgrq ur gel orvat zber ntterffvir va uvf
ybirznxvat.
	"Npg zber yvxr n ebznagvp ybire naq yrff yvxr n oberq fcbhfr," ur
jnf nqivfrq.  "Jura lbh tb ubzr, znxr ybir gb ure nf fbba nf lbh zrrg --
rira vs vg'f evtug vafvqr gur sebag qbbe."
	Ng gur arkg pbafhygngvba, gur nqivfre jnf cyrnfrq gb urne gung gur
uhfonaq unq sbyybjrq uvf vafgehpgvbaf.  "Naq ubj qvq fur ernpg guvf gvzr?"
gur pbafhygnag nfxrq.
	"Jryy, gb gryy lbh gur gehgu," gur uhfonaq ercyvrq, "fur jnf fgvyy
fbeg bs vaqvssrerag.  Ohg bar guvat V'ir tbg gb nqzvg: ure oevqtr pyho jrag
nofbyhgryl jvyq!"
%
Gur uhfonaq jverq ubzr gung ur unq orra noyr gb jvaq hc uvf ohfvarff gevc n
qnl rneyl naq jbhyq or ubzr ba Guhefqnl.  Jura ur jnyxrq vagb uvf ncnegzrag,
ubjrire, ur sbhaq uvf jvsr va orq jvgu nabgure zna.  Shevbhf,ur cvpxrq hc uvf
ont naq fgbezrq bhg.  Ur zrg uvf zbgure-va-ynj ba gur fgerrg, gbyq ure jung
unq unccrarq naq naabhaprq gung ur jnf svyvat sbe qvibepr va gur zbeavat.
	"Tvir zl qnhtugre n punapr gb rkcynva orsber lbh gnxr nal npgvba,"
gur byqre jbzna cyrnqrq.  Eryhpgnagyl, ur nterrq.
	Na ubhe yngre uvf zbgure-va-ynj cubarq gur uhfonaq ng uvf pyho.
"V xarj zl qnhtugre jbhyq unir na rkcynangvba," fur fnvq, n abgr bs gevhzcu
va ure ibvpr.  "Fur qvqa'g erprvir lbhe gryrtenz!"
%
Gur Vgnyvna ragel va gur Rhebivfvba Fbat Pbagrfg, "V Pna'g Trg Ab
Pbagenprcgvba", unf orra jvguqenja nsgre gur Cbcr nqivfrq gurz gb chyy vg bhg
ng gur ynfg zvahgr.
		-- Abg gur Avar B'Pybpx Arjf
%
Gur xvat neenatrq n ertny zneevntr sbe uvf qnhtugre -- n obaq gung jbhyq havgr
gjb terng xvatqbzf.  Lrg, orpnhfr gur lbhat pbhcyr frrzrq fb sbezny gb rnpu
bgure, ur cbfgrq n fcl bhgfvqr gur eblny jrqqvat punzore naq qrznaqrq n shyy
nppbhag bs gur jrqqvat avtug'f cebterff.
	"Vg'f uneq gb gryy," fnvq gur fcl gur arkg zbeavat. "Jura gur cevapr
ragrerq gur punzore, V urneq gur cevaprff fnl, dhvgr sbeznyyl, 'V bssre lbh zl
ubabe.'  Gura gur cevapr fnvq, jvgu rdhny pbhegyvarff, 'V ubabe lbhe bssre.'
Naq gung'f gur jnl vg jrag nyy avtug ybat -- ubabe, bssre, ubabe, bssre.
%
Gur ynetrfg tnl pbzzhavgl va gur H.F. (nf n crepragntr bs gbgny cbchyngvba)
vf abg va Fna Senapvfpb, ohg va Vbjn Snyyf, Zvaarfbgn (cbc. 763), n fznyy
gbja va juvpu iveghnyyl rirelbar vf tnl.  Va 1976, n tebhc bs nobhg 100
tnlf syrrvat crefrphgvba va gur Fbhgu frggyrq va gur gbja, naq fbba jba n
znwbevgl ba gur gbja pbhapvy.  Beqvanaprf cebuvovgvat urgrebfrkhny npgf
fbba sbyybjrq.  "Nsgre nyy," fnvq znlbe Uneel Junyra, "Vs gur Fhcerzr Pbheg
unf ershfrq gb fgevxr qbja ynjf cebuvovgvat ubzbfrkhny npgf, gura bhe
nagv-fgenvtug ynjf ner rdhnyyl inyvq."  Evtbebhf rasbeprzrag bs gubfr ynjf
unf erfhygrq va n pbzzhavgl gung vf abj nyzbfg 100% tnl.  Fnvq bar ybat-gvzr
erfvqrag: "V'ir yvirq urer 35 lrnef naq qvqa'g jnag gb yrnir, ohg V qvqa'g
jnag gb tvir hc frk rvgure.  Gura zl arvtuobe Rq pnzr bire bar avtug, naq
fnvq ubj nobhg V qb vg jvgu uvz, naq zl jvsr Zvyyvr pbhyq qb vg jvgu uvf
jvsr.  Jryy, V sbhaq vg jnfa'g arneyl nf onq nf V gubhtug vg jnf tbaan or.
Snpg vf, V engure yvxr vg."
%
Gur yvggyr obl cbvagrq gb gjb qbtf va gur cnex naq nfxrq uvf sngure jung
gurl jrer qbvat. "Gurl'er znxvat chccvrf, fba," ercyvrq gur sngure.
	Gung avtug, gur obl jnaqrerq vagb uvf cneragf' ebbz juvyr gurl jrer
znxvat ybir.  Nfxrq jung gurl jrer qbvat, gur sngure ercyvrq, "Znxvat lbh
n onol oebgure."
	"Trr, Qnq," gur obl cyrnqrq, "ghea ure bire -- V'q engure unir n
chccl."
%
	Gur yvggyr byq ynql ehfurq vagb gur gnkvqrezvfg naq hajenccrq n cnpxntr
pbagnvavat gjb erpragyl qrprnfrq zbaxrlf.  Ure vafgehpgvbaf gb gur cebcevrgbe
jrer qryvirerq va n jrygre bs grnef.
	"Snibevgr crgf... (oyhoore,fbo)... pnhtug pbyq... (zbna)...  Qba'g
frr ubj V'yy yvir jvgubhg gurz... (jrrc,fbo)... jnag gb unir gurz fghssrq...
(oyhoore,oyhoore)!"
	"Bs pbhefr, znqnz," fnvq gur cebcevrgbe va na haqrefgnaqvat ibvpr,
"naq jbhyq lbh pner gb unir gurz zbhagrq?"
	"Bu, ab," fur fboorq, "funxvat unaqf.  Gurl jrer whfg pybfr sevraqf."
%
Gur zna naq jbzna znxr ybir, nggnva pyvznk, snyy frcnengr.  Gura fur
juvfcref, "V'yy gryy lbh jub V jnf guvaxvat bs vs lbh gryy zr jub lbh
jrer guvaxvat bs."  Yvxr zbfg frk wbxrf gur bevtvaf bs gur cyrnfnag
rkpunatr ner bofpher.  Ohg jungrire gur fbhepr, vg fryqbz snvyf gb ribxr
n pregnva njshy erpbtavgvba.
		-- Tber Ivqny, "Arj Lbex Erivrj bs Obbxf"
%
Gur zna jub fnvq "N oveq va gur unaq'f jbegu gjb va gur ohfu" unf orra
chggvat uvf oveq va gur *JEBAT* ohfurf.
%
Gur zbfg cerffvat vffhr snpvat jbzra gbqnl vf svaqvat n pbagenprcgvir
wryyl gung fzryyf yvxr n serfu sehvg fnynq.
%
Gur zbfg ebznagvp guvat nal jbzna rire fnvq gb zr va orq jnf "Ner lbh fher
lbh'er abg n pbc?"
		-- Yneel Oebja
%
Gur zbfg hasnve guvat nobhg FGQf (frkhnyyl genafzvggrq qvfrnfrf) vf
gung gur thlf jub obhtug infrpgbzvrf unir gb jrne pbaqbzf naljnl.
%
Gur zbfg hafngvfsnpgbel zra ner gubfr jub cevqr gurzfryirf ba gurve
ivevyvgl naq ertneq frk nf vs vg jrer fbzr sbez bs nguyrgvpf ng juvpu lbh
jva phcf. Vg vf n jbzna'f fcvevg naq zbbq juvpu n zna unf gb fgvzhyngr va
beqre gb znxr frk vagrerfgvat.  Gur erny ybire vf gur zna jub pna guevyy
lbh ol whfg gbhpuvat lbhe urnq be fzvyvat vagb lbhe rlrf -- be whfg ol
fgnevat vagb fcnpr.
		-- Znevyla Zbaebr
%
Gur areibhf lbhat oevqr orpnzr veevgngrq ol ure uhfonaq'f yhfgl nqinaprf ba
gurve jrqqvat avtug naq ercevznaqrq uvz frireyl.
	"V qrznaq cebcre znaaref va orq," fur qrpynerq, "whfg nf V qb ng
gur qvaare gnoyr."
	Nzhfrq ol uvf jvsr'f sbeznyvgl, gur tebbz fzbbgurq uvf ehzcyrq unve
naq pyvzorq dhvrgyl orgjrra gur furrgf.  "Vf gung orggre?" ur nfxrq, jvgu n
uvag bs n fzvyr.
	"Lrf," ercyvrq gur tvey, "zhpu orggre."
	"Irel tbbq, qneyvat," gur uhfonaq juvfcrerq.  "Abj jbhyq lbh
or fb xvaq nf gb cyrnfr cnff gur chffl?"
%
	Gur byq znvyzna vf znxvat uvf ynfg ebhaqf; ur ergverf ng gur raq bs
gur jrrx.  Nf ur nccebnpurf gur Wbarf' ubhfr, Zef. Wbarf terrgf uvz jnezyl ng
gur qbbe.  "Cyrnfr pbzr va!  Jr'er irel tengrshy sbe lbhe lrnef bs freivpr gb
hf naq bhe arvtuobeubbq.  V'ir cercnerq fbzrguvat fcrpvny sbe lbh."
 	Va jnyxf gur znvyzna, gb n tenpvbhfyl nccbvagrq qvavat ebbz, jurer
Zef. Wbarf unf cercnerq n fhzcghbhf yhapu.  Nsgre qhzcvat uvf yrggre fngpury
ba gur pbhpu, ur naq Zef. Wbarf unir n punezvat zrny.  Nf gur znvyzna svavfurq
uvf ynfg tynff bs jvar, gunaxvat uvf ubfgrff cebshfryl, fur fgbcf uvz sebz
yrnivat naq qvfnccrnef hcfgnvef.  Fur ergheaf va n zbzrag, va n qnevat
artyvtrr, naq gnxrf gur nfgbavfurq cbfgzna gb gur orqebbz, jurer gur rynobengr
snerjryy vf pbafhzzngrq orgjrra gur furrgf.
 	Nf ur'f chggvat uvf cnagf ba, Zef. Wbarf ernpurf vagb ure avtugfgnaq,
chyyf bhg n qbyyne ovyy, naq unaqf vg gb uvz.  Ernpgvat gb uvf nfgbavfurq
ybbx, fur fnlf, "Jryy, V gbyq zl uhfonaq gung lbh jrer ergvevat naq gung
jr fubhyq qb fbzrguvat sbe lbh.  Ur fnvq 'Shpx uvz.  Tvir uvz n qbyyne!'"
Fur cnhfrf naq fzvyrf cebhqyl. "Gur yhapu jnf ZL vqrn."
%
Gur bayl qvssrerapr orgjrra lbhe pheerag ybire naq n qbbexabo vf gung n
qbbexabo jnezf hc jura lbh ubyq vg.
%
Gur bayl crbcyr jub znxr ybir nyy gur gvzr ner yvnef.
		-- Ybhvf Wbeqna
%
Gur bayl cflpubybtvpnyyl qnzntvat guvat nobhg znfgheongvba vf gung gurer'f
abobql ryfr gb oynzr yngre sbe crefhnqvat lbh gb qb vg.
%
Gur bayl jnl gb orunir gb n jbzna vf gb znxr ybir gb ure vs fur vf cerggl
naq gb fbzrbar ryfr vs fur vf cynva.
		-- Bfpne Jvyqr
%
Gur bcrengbe'f yrsg unaq dhvirerq nf fur tvatreyl hayngpurq gur pngpu gb
gur qvfxrggr ernqre.  Hapbagebyynoyl, fur ernpurq qbja, thvqvat gur
funecyl cbvagrq qvfxrggr vagb gur qrrc, qnex fybg. Gur sybccl qvfxrggr
arneyl sbyqrq haqre gur ercrngrq guehfgf bs ure unaq, hagvy svanyyl fur
pbhyq pbageby vg ab ybatre, ure evtug unaq vafgvapgviryl gnxvat na bcgvba
mreb.  Naq gura vg nyy pnzr ng bapr, gubhfnaqf hcba gubhfnaqf bs qngn
ovgf sybjvat sebz qvfxrggr gb qvfx va n gbeerag bs gbeevq genafsre, nf
gur urycyrff yrtf bs gur 32 fgenvarq gb erznva ba gur sybbe.
%
	Gur bgure qnl zl tveysevraq naq V jrer tbvat gb n cnegl naq ba gur
jnl gurer, jr tbg n syng gver.  Jr tbg bhg bs gur pne naq V chzcrq, fur
wnpxrq V chzcrq, fur wnpxrq, V chzcrq, fur wnpxrq naq gura jr punatrq gur
gver.  Riraghnyyl jr neevirq ng gur cnegl naq jura jr jnyxrq va, rirelbar jnf
whzcvat sbe wbl.  Jung n fvtug frrvat ure unatvat ahqr sebz gur punaqryvre!
Jryy gur cnegl jnf BX, V thrff, jr whfg fng nebhaq qevaxvat fureel naq rngvat
pnaql.  Rirelobql ryfr fgnegrq srryvat zreel.  Gubfr unir tbg gb or gur guerr
jvyqrfg tveyf V xabj.
%
Gur bgure avtug V jnf univat frk, ohg gur tvey uhat hc ba zr.
%
	Gur bhgentrq uhfonaq qvfpbirerq uvf jvsr va orq jvgu nabgure zna.
	"Jung vf gur zrnavat bs guvf?" ur qrznaqrq.  "Jub vf guvf sryybj?"
	"Gung frrzf yvxr n snve dhrfgvba," fnvq gur jvsr, ebyyvat bire.
"Jung VF lbhe anzr?"
%
Gur bjare bs n ynetr sheavgher fgber va gur zvq-jrfg neevirq va Senapr
ba n ohlvat gevc.  Nf ur jnf purpxvat vagb n ubgry ur fgehpx hc na
npdhnvagnapr jvgu n ornhgvshy lbhat ynql.  Ubjrire, fur bayl fcbxr
Serapu naq ur bayl fcbxr Ratyvfu, fb rnpu pbhyqa'g haqrefgnaq n jbeq
gur bgure fcbxr.  Ur gbbx bhg n crapvy naq n abgrobbx naq qerj n
cvpgher bs n gnkv.  Fur fzvyrq, abqqrq ure urnq naq gurl jrag sbe n
evqr va gur cnex.  Yngre, ur qerj n cvpgher bs n gnoyr va n erfgnhenag
jvgu n dhrfgvba znex naq fur abqqrq, fb gurl jrag gb qvaare.  Nsgre
qvaare ur fxrgpurq gjb qnapref naq fur jnf qryvtugrq.  Gurl jrag gb
frireny avtugpyhof, qenax punzcntar, qnaprq naq unq n tybevbhf
riravat.  Vg unq tbggra dhvgr yngr jura fur zbgvbarq sbe gur crapvy naq
qerj n cvpgher bs n sbhe-cbfgre orq.  Ur jnf qhzosbhaqrq, naq unf arire
or noyr gb haqrefgnaq ubj fur xarj ur jnf va gur sheavgher ohfvarff.
%
Gur cnffvbangr lbhat guvat jnf univat n qvssvphyg gvzr trggvat npebff jung
fur jnagrq sebz ure engure qrafr oblsevraq.  Svanyyl fur nfxrq,
	"Jbhyq lbh yvxr gb frr jurer V jnf bcrengrq ba sbe nccraqvpvgvf?"
	"Tbfu, ab!" ur ercyvrq.  "V ungr ubfcvgnyf."
%
Gur cravf zvtugvre guna gur fjbeq.
%
Gur cyrnfher vf zbzragnel,
Gur cbfvgvba evqvphybhf,
Gur rkcrafr qnzanoyr.
		-- Purfgresvryq, ba frk
%
Gur cyrnfher vf genafvgbel, gur pbfg cebuvovgvir, naq gur cbfvgvba evqvphybhf.
		-- Qvfenryv, ba frk
%
Gur cyheny bs fcbhfr vf fcvpr.
		-- E.N. Urvayrva
%
Gur cbyvpr jrer vairfgvtngvat gur zlfgrevbhf qrngu bs n cebzvarag
ohfvarffzna jub unq whzcrq sebz n jvaqbj bs uvf 11gu fgbel bssvpr.  Uvf
ibyhcghbhf cevingr frpergnel pbhyq bssre ab rkcynangvba sbe gur npgvba
ohg fnvq gung ure obff unq orra npgvat crphyvneyl rire fvapr fur fgnegrq
jbexvat sbe uvz n zbagu ntb.
	"Nsgre zl irel svefg jrrx ba gur wbo," fur fnvq, "V erprvirq n
gjragl-qbyyne envfr.  Ng gur raq bs gur frpbaq jrrx ur pnyyrq zr vagb uvf
cevingr bssvpr, tnir zr n ybiryl oynpx avtugvr, svir cnvef bs alyba
fgbpxvatf naq fnvq, 'Gurfr ner sbe n ornhgvshy, rssvpvrag frpergnel.' Ng
gur raq bs gur guveq jrrx ur tnir zr n tbetrbhf zvax fgbyr.  Gura, guvf
nsgreabba, ur pnyyrq zr vagb uvf cevingr bssvpr ntnva, cerfragrq zr jvgu
guvf snohybhf qvnzbaq oenpryrg naq nfxrq zr vs V jbhyq pbafvqre znxvat
ybir gb uvz naq jung vg jbhyq pbfg. V gbyq uvz V jbhyq, naq orpnhfr ur
unq orra fb avpr gb zr, ur pbhyq unir vg sbe svir qbyynef, nygubhtu V jnf
punetvat nyy gur bgure oblf va gur bssvpr gra qbyynef.  Gung'f jura ur
whzcrq bhg gur jvaqbj."
%
Gur ceboyrz jvgu orvat orfg zna ng n jrqqvat vf gung lbh arire trg n punapr
gb cebir vg.
%
Gur dhnyvgl bs n oybj-wbo vf qrgrezvarq ol gur yratgu bs furrg lbh unir gb
chyy bhg bs lbhe nff.
%
Gur erny ceboyrz jvgu shpxvat n furrc vf gung lbh unir gb jnyx nebhaq
va sebag rirel gvzr lbh jnag gb xvff ure.
%
Gur ernfba ovt pbzcnavrf unir ybgf naq ybgf bs zrrgvatf vf orpnhfr
gurl pna'g znfgheongr.
%
Gur ernfba crbcyr fjrng vf fb gurl jba'g pngpu sver jura znxvat ybir.
		-- Qba Ebfr
%
Gur ernfba gung frk vf fb cbchyne vf gung vg'f pragenyyl ybpngrq.
%
Gur erdhverzragf bs ebznagvp ybir ner qvssvphyg gb fngvfsl va gur gehax
bs n Qbqtr Qneg.
		-- Yvfn Nygure
%
Gur ERIREFR shapgvba jbexf ba gur bccbfvgr FRKCE.
%
Gur ebznagvp lbhat zna fng ba gur cnex orapu jvgu n svefg qngr.  Ur jnf
pregnva uvf punezvat jbeqf naq znaare jbhyq jva ure nf gurl unq znal bguref.
	"Fbzr zbba bhg gbavtug,"ur pbbrq.
	"Gurer pregnvayl vf," fur nterrq.
	"Fbzr ernyyl oevtug fgnef va gur fxl."
	Fur abqqrq.
	"Fbzr qrj ba gur tenff."
	"Fbzr qb," fur fnvq vaqvtanagyl, "ohg V'z abg gung fbeg."
%
Gur fretrnag jnyxrq vagb gur fubjre naq pnhtug zr tvivat zlfrys n qvfubabenoyr
qvfpunetr.  Jvgubhg zvffvat n orng, V fnvq...
	"Vg'f zl qvpx naq V pna jnfu vg nf snfg nf V jnag!"
%
Gur frk npg vf gur shaavrfg guvat ba gur snpr bs guvf rnegu.
		-- Qvnan Evtt
%
Gur frk jnf avpr, ohg pbashfvat.  Gur jubyr fvghngvba xrcg tbvat qv-cbyne
ba Fgn-Uv.  Bar vafgnag Zvfgl jbhyq frrz yvxr n ybiryl jnez tvey jub'q
fheivirq n greevoyr vawhel, yvxr n ybfg chccl gb or fgebxrq, n ybaryl
jbzna gb or uhfonaqrq.  Ohg gura ur'q fgneg guvaxvat bs gur jverf oruvaq
ure rlrf, naq ur'q or fperjvat n znpuvar, na vanavzngr bowrpg, n choyvp
gbvyrg.  Whfg yvxr jvgu nal bgure jbzna sbe uvz, ernyyl.
		-- Ehql Ehpxre, "Fbsgjner"
%
Gur ful lbhat zna unq orra zneevrq sbe guerr zbaguf jura ur ercbegrq gb uvf
qbpgbe gung uvf zneevntr jnf fgvyy va anzr bayl.  Gur qbpgbe, nsgre urnevat
gur fnq gnyr, gbyq uvz gung jnvgvat hagvy orqgvzr gb znxr nqinaprf jnf pnhfvat
cflpubybtvpny cerffher naq nqivfrq uvz gb gnxr nqinagntr bs gur arkg gvzr ur
sryg va gur zbbq.  N jrrx yngre, gur qbpgbe unccrarq gb zrrg gur zna ntnva,
naq abgvprq n arj fcevat va uvf fgrc.  "Zl nqivpr jbexrq, V gnxr vg?" ur
vadhverq.
	Gur lbhat zna tevaarq.  "Cresrpgyl.  Gur bgure avtug, jr jrer univat
fhccre, naq nf V ernpurq sbe gur fnyg -- fb qvq fur!  Bhe unaqf gbhpurq... Vg
jnf nf vs na ryrpgevp pheerag ena guebhtu hf.  V yrncrq gb zl srrg, fjrcg gur
qvfurf sebz gur gnoyr naq gura naq gurer pbafhzzngrq bhe zneevntr!  Gurer'f 
whfg bar ceboyrz, ubjrire.  Jr pna'g tb onpx gb Gur Sbhe Frnfbaf ntnva..."
%
Gur fgehttyvat sbe xabjyrqtr unf n cyrnfher va vg yvxr gung bs jerfgyvat
jvgu n svar jbzna.
		-- Ybeq Unyvsnk
%
Gur Fhcerzr Pbheg qbrf vg jvgu nyy qryvorengr fcrrq.
%
Gur guvat gung gnxrf hc gur yrnfg nzbhag bs gvzr naq pnhfrf gur zbfg
nzbhag bs gebhoyr vf frk.
	[Boivbhfyl jevggra ol n zna--vs vg'f pnhfvat fb zhpu gebhoyr,
	 *gnxr* *zber* *gvzr*!]
%
Gur guerr snvgushy guvatf va yvsr ner zbarl, n qbt naq na byq jbzna.
%
Gur guerr zbfg vzcbegnag cnegf bs n fgbir: yvsgre, yrt, naq cbxre.
%
Gur guerr frkhny cbfvgvbaf qhevat certnanapl.

Qhevat gur svefg sbhe zbaguf:	Zvffvbanel fglyr
Qhevat gur frpbaq sbhe zbaguf:	Qbttvr fglyr
Naq qhevat gur ynfg zbagu:	Pblbgr fglyr

Pblbgr fglyr?
	Lbh fvg ol gur ubyr naq ubjy.
%
Gur gebhoyr jvgu vaprfg vf gung vg trgf lbh vaibyirq jvgu eryngvirf.
		-- Trbetr F. Xnhszna
%
Gur gjb pbhcyrf jrer rawblvat gurve inpngvba gbtrgure ng n erfbeg ubgry.  Gurl
jrer va gur zvqqyr bs n tnzr bs Fpenooyr va gur ybool jura n guhaqrefgbez phg
bss gur ubgry'f ryrpgevpvgl, yrnivat yvggyr gb qb ohg ergver gb gurve ebbzf.
Ovyy jnf n engure qribhg zna, fb orsber trggvat vagb orq jvgu uvf pbzcnavba,
ur fnvq uvf cenlref.  Nf ur tbg haqre gur pbiref, gur yvtugavat fhqqrayl
synfurq guebhtu gur jvaqbj naq ur qvfpbirerq gung ur jnf va gur jebat ebbz.
Ur vafgnagyl whzcrq hc naq fgnegrq gb qnfu sbe gur unyyjnl.  "Vg'f gbb yngr,
pnyyrq gur tvey sebz gur orq, "zl thl qbrfa'g cenl."
%
Gur gjb zra srvtarq sevraqfuvc ohg frpergyl ungrq rnpu bgure'f thgf naq gbbx
terng cyrnfher va tvivat bar nabgure gur arrqyr ba nal naq nyy bppnfvbaf.
Guvf cnegvphyne riravat gurl zrg, dhvgr ol nppvqrag, ng n cbchyne one.
Gur pbairefngvba fgnegrq vaabpragyl rabhtu; gura bar, jvgu fhqqra vafcvengvba,
ena uvf unaq bire gur bgure'f onyq urnq naq rkpynvzrq,
	"Ol Tbq, Serq, gung srryf whfg yvxr zl jvsr'f nff!"
Gur bgure ena uvf bja unaq bire uvf urnq naq abapunynagyl ergbegrq,
	"Jryy, V'yy or qnzarq, Wvz, fb vg qbrf, fb vg qbrf!"
%
Gur gjb guvatf gung lbh fubhyq arire yraq bhg ner lbhe pne be lbhe jbzna.
Fbzrbar'f obhaq gb guebj n ebq va rvgure bar.
%
Gur irel cebcre fcvafgre qvqa'g tb bhg irel bsgra, ohg fur unq fbzr vzcbegnag
fubccvat gb qb gung zbeavat naq fb qrpvqrq gb unir ure yhapu va jung nccrnerq
gb or n avpr dhvrg erfcrpgnoyr erfgnhenag.  Jvgu gur abbagvzr pebjq, znal
phfgbzref funerq gurve gnoyrf jvgu fgenatref; gur fcvafgre fryrpgrq n frng
arkg gb na nggenpgvir, lbhat bssvpr tvey.  Gur tvey svavfurq ure fnaqjvpu naq
pbssrr, gura frggyrq onpx naq yvg hc n pvtnerggr.  Gur byqre jbzna pbagebyyrq
urefrys sbe n srj zbzragf naq gura fanccrq,
	"V'q engure pbzzvg nqhygrel guna fzbxr va choyvp."
	"Fb jbhyq V," fnvq gur tvey, "ohg V bayl unir unys na ubhe sbe yhapu."
%
	Gur jnl zl wrjryre rkcynvarq vg, vg'f yvxr vafhenapr.
	Fvk zbaguf' cnl vfa'g zhpu gb xrrc zl jvsr sebz fyrrcvat nebhaq.

N qvnzbaq -- cher, fcnexyvat, angheny, synjyrff, sberire.  Gur jnl zneevntr
fubhyq or ohg arire dhvgr vf.  Crbcyr tebj naq punatr naq fbzrgvzrf jnag gb
gnxr gurve pybgurf bss jvgu fgenatref.  Fb jura lbh vairfg va n svar cvrpr
bs qvnzbaq wrjryel, lbh'er abg bayl znxvat na vairfgzrag, lbh'er znxvat n
fgngrzrag.  Lbh'er gryyvat gur jbzna lbh ybir gung lbh'ir whfg fcrag n ybg
bs lbhe uneq-rnearq zbarl ba ure.  Abj fur bjrf lbh gur xvaq bs yblnygl gung
bayl cerpvbhf wrjryel pna ohl.  Vfa'g fur jbegu vg?

	Gur Ubarlzbba'f Bire:			sebz $ 5000
	Gur Frira Lrne Vgpu:			sebz $10000
	Ab Zber Yhapugvzr Dhvpxvrf:		sebz $15000
	Qvibepr Jbhyq Or Zber Rkcrafvir:	sebz $42000

			N qvnzbaq vf sbe yrirentr.  OrQrnef
%
Gur jnl gb n zna'f urneg vf guebhtu uvf jvsr'f oryyl, naq qba'g lbh sbetrg vg.
		-- Rqjneq Nyorr, "Jub'f Nsenvq bs Ivetvavn Jbbys?"
%
Gur jbzna uheevrq ubzr sebz ure qbpgbe'f nccbvagzrag, qrinfgngrq ol gur
zrqvpny ercbeg fur unq whfg erprvirq.  Jura ure uhfonaq pnzr va sebz jbex,
fur gbyq uvz, "Qneyvat, gur qbpgbe fnvq V unir bayl gjryir zber ubhef gb
yvir.  Fb V'ir qrpvqrq V jnag gb tb gb orq naq znxr cnffvbangr ybir gb lbh
guebhtubhg gur avtug.  Ubj qbrf gung fbhaq, qrnerfg?"
	"Url, gung'f svar sbe ___lbh," ercyvrq gur uhfonaq.  "Lbh qba'g unir
gb trg hc va gur zbeavat!"
%
Gur lbhat tvey jnf univat n urneg-gb-urneg gnyx jvgu ure zbgure ba ure
svefg ivfvg ubzr fvapr fgnegvat pbyyrtr.
	"Zbz, V unir gb gryy lbh," gur tvey pbasrffrq.  "V ybfg zl ivetvavgl
ynfg jrrxraq."
	"V'z abg fhcevfrq," fnvq ure zbgure.  "Vg jnf obhaq gb unccra fbbare
be yngre.  V whfg ubcr vg jnf n ebznagvp naq cyrnfhenoyr rkcrevrapr."
	"Jryy, lrf naq ab," gur cerggl fghqrag erznexrq.  "Gur svefg rvtug
thlf sryg terng, ohg nsgre gurz zl chffl tbg erny fber."
%
	Gur lbhat zna gbbx n oyvaq qngr gb gur nzhfrzrag cnex.  Gurl jrag
sbe n evqr ba gur Sreevf jurry.  Gur evqr pbzcyrgrq, fur frrzrq engure oberq.
"Jung jbhyq lbh yvxr gb qb arkg?" ur nfxrq.
	"V jnaan trg jrvturq," fur fnvq.  Fb ur gbbx ure bire gb gur jrvtug
thrffre.  Arkg gurl ebqr gur ebyyre pbnfgre.  Nsgre gung ur obhtug ure fbzr
cbcpbea naq pbggba pnaql, gura ur nfxrq jung ryfr fur jbhyq yvxr gb qb.
	"V jnaan trg jrvturq," fur fnvq, oyhagyl.
	V ernyyl yngpurq bagb n fdhner bar gbavtug, gubhtug gur obl, naq
hfvat gur rkphfr gung ur unq qrirybcrq n urnqnpur, ur gbbx gur tvey ubzr.
Gur tvey'f zbgure jnf fhecevfrq gb frr ure ubzr fb rneyl, naq nfxrq, "Jung'f
jebat, qrne, qvqa'g lbh unir n avpr gvzr gbavtug?"
	"Jbhfl," fnvq gur tvey.
%
Gur lbhat fghq jnyxrq vagb n obeqryyb.  Nsgre ur gbbx uvf pybgurf bss, gur
jbzna jnf chmmyrq gb frr uvz chg n pybgurfcva ba uvf abfr, fghss pbggba va
uvf rnef, naq chg n cebculynpgvp ba uvf cravf.
	"Url," fur nfxrq, "jung gur uryy ner lbh qbvat?"
	"Jryy, zn'nz", ercyvrq gur fghq, "gurer ner gjb guvatf V whfg pna'g
fgnaq.  N fpernzvat jbzna naq gur fzryy bs oheavat ehoore."
%
Gura gurer jnf gur tvey jub jnf ratntrq gb n tlzanfg -- 'gvy ur oebxr vg bss.
%
Gura gurer jnf gur thl gung tbg onqyl zrffrq hc svtugvat sbe uvf tvey'f ubabe.
Vg frrzf fur jnagrq gb xrrc vg.
%
Gura gurer jnf gur zvqqyr-ntrq ohfvarffzna jub gbbx uvf fcbhfr gb Cnevf.
Nsgre genvcfvat jvgu ure sebz bar znafvba qh pbhgher gb nabgure, or orttrq
sbe n qnl bss gb erfg naq tbg vg.  Jvgu gur jvsr tbar fubccvat ntnva, ur
jrag gb gur Evgm One naq cvpxrq hc n yhfpvbhf cnevfvraar.  Gurl tbg ba
jryy hagvy gur dhrfgvba bs zbarl pnzr hc.  Fur jnagrq n uhaqerq Nzrevpna
qbyynef; ur bssrerq svsgl.  Gurl pbhyqa'g trg gbtrgure ba gur cevpr; fb
gurl qvqa'g trg gbtrgure.  Gung riravat ur rfpbegrq uvf jvsr gb bar bs gur
avpre erfgnhenagf ba gur Ehr qr Evibyv, naq gurer ur fcbggrq uvf tbetrbhf
onor bs gur nsgreabba frngrq ng n gnoyr arne gur qbbe.
	"Frr, zbafvrhe?" fur fnvq nf gurl cnffrq ure.  "Ybbx jung lbh tbg
sbe lbhe ybhfl svsgl ohpxf."
%
Gurer ner n pbhcyr bs guvatf nobhg ure V terngyl nqzver.
%
Gurer ner znal jnlf gb fnl "V ybir lbh", ohg shpxvat vf gur snfgrfg.
%
Gurer ner fb znal crbcyr jnagvat n cvrpr bs zl nff gung fbzr bs gurz
ner univat gb gnxr gheaf.
		-- G.X.
%
Gurer ner gjb pbhcyrf gung jnag gb pbaireg gb Pngubyvpvfz.  Gurl tb
naq frr n cevrfg naq ur gryyf gurz gung gur svefg erdhverzrag vf gb nofgnva
sebz frk sbe guvegl qnlf.
	Guvegl qnlf yngre, gur pbhcyrf pbzr onpx gb frr gur cevrfg.  Ur nfxf
gur svefg pbhcyr vs gurl cnffrq gur grfg.
	"Sngure, jr qvqa'g fb zhpu nf GBHPU bar nabgure qhevat gur ynfg zbagu.
	"Pbatenghyngvbaf," gur cevrfg ercyvrf, "lbh ner abj dhnyvsvrq gb ragre
gur Puhepu."  Gura, gur cevrfgf nfxrq gur frpbaq pbhcyr ubj gurl qvq.
	"Jryy, Sngure," gur uhfonaq fnlf, "rirelguvat jnf tbvat whfg svar
hagvy gur 27gu qnl.  Zl jvsr orag bire gur serrmre gb trg fbzrguvat bhg, naq
V whfg unccrarq gb abgvpr gung fur qvqa'g unir nal cnagvrf ba.  V pbhyqa'g
fgnaq vg nal zber, fb V jnyxrq bire gb ure, qebccrq zl cnagf, naq fyvccrq vg
gb ure evtug gurer."
	"Gung'f QVFTHFGVAT!", gur cevrfg oryybjf.  "V pna arire yrg lbh vagb
gur Puhepu nsgre fbzrguvat yvxr gung."
	"V haqrefgnaq Sngure," gur zna ercyvrf fnqyl, "gurl jba'g yrg hf
vagb Fnsrjnl nalzber rvgure."
%
Gurer ner gjb gerrf va gur sberfg.  Gurl ner irel cebhq gerrf.  Bar qnl
gurl abgvpr n fncyvat unys-jnl orgjrra gurz.
	Bar gerr cebpynvzf, "Gung vf n fba bs orrpu!"
	"Ab, gung vf n fba bs n ovepu!" vafvfgf gur bgure.
	"N fba bs n ORRPU!"
	"N fba bs n OVEPU!"
	"Fba bs n orrpu!"
	"Fba bs n ovepu!"

Gur svtugvat nggenpgf n jbbqcrpxre jub vasbezf gurz gung ur pna gryy jung
xvaq bs gerr gur fncyvat vf ol vgf gnfgr.  Svefg ur gnfgrf gur orrpu naq
gur ovepu.  Gura ur gnfgrf gur fncyvat.  "Jryy abj, vf gung n fba bs n
orrpu be n fba bs n ovepu?" nfxf gur orrpu.
	"Lbh'er obgu jebat!" fnlf gur oveq.  "Gung'f gur orfg cvrpr bs nfu
V'ir unq zl crpxre va sbe n ybat gvzr!"
%
Gurer vf n qrsvavgr cnenyyry orgjrra fubgf bs grdhvyn naq n jbzna'f oernfgf.
Bar vf abg rabhtu naq guerr ner gbb znal.
%
Gurer vf abguvat nf bireengrq nf n onq ynl, be nf haqreengrq nf n terng fuvg.
%
Gurer vf abguvat jebat jvgu fperjvat rirelbar va fvtug.  Obevat lbhe sevraqf
nobhg vg vf gur fva.
		-- Znzn Yvm
%
Gurer vfa'g ebbz rabhtu va guvf qerff sbe obgu bs hf!
%
Gurer jnf bapr n arjyl-zneevrq pbhcyr.  Abj gurfr gjb ybiref jrer, jryy,
engure hcgvtug nobhg hfvat rkcerffvbaf fhpu nf "univat frk", "trggvat vg ba",
be "obssvat gur oenvaf bhg".  Fb, gurl qrpvqrq gb hfr gur rhcurzvfz, "qbvat
gur ynhaqel" jurarire gur gbcvp bs frk pnzr hc. 
	Bar riravat, uhool fnvq, "Jryy, ubarl, srry yvxr qbvat fbzr ynhaqel 
gbavgr?", naq fur pbafragrq.  Gur arkg riravat, uhool ntnva nfxrq, "Fjrrgvr, 
srry yvxr qbvat fbzr ynhaqel gbavgr?"  Jryy, jvsrl jnfa'g ernyyl va gur zbbq, 
ohg pbzcyvrq.  Ba gur guveq avtug, jura uhool nccebnpurq ure, nfxvat ure gb 
cnegvpvcngr va qbvat fgvyy ZBER ynhaqel, fur ercyvrq, "Bu, Uba, V'z ernyyl abg 
va gur zbbq sbe qbvat nal ynhaqel gbavgr."
	Jryy, uhool, orvat n ovg qvfnccbvagrq, ybpxrq uvzfrys va gur onguebbz 
naq ratntrq va n fcbg bs frys-nohfr vafgrnq.  Hcba ergheavat gb gur yvivat
ebbz, jvsrl fnvq, "Jryy, Cbbcfvr, V'ir punatrq zl zvaq -- ubj nobhg qbvat
fbzr ynhaqel?"  Gb juvpu ur ercyvrq, "Bu, ab, gung'f bxnl, V whfg qvq n fznyy
ybnq!" 
%
Gurer jnf fbzrguvat nobhg ure V yvxrq, ohg V pbhyqa'g chg zl svatre ba vg.
%
Gurer jvyy or frk nsgre qrngu, jr whfg jba'g or noyr gb srry vg.
		-- Yvyl Gbzyva
%
Gurer'f n unaqfbzr obl jub gryyf zr ubj V'ir punatrq uvf cnfg.  Ur ohlf zr
n oenaql...  Pbhyq vg or ur'f ernyyl whfg nsgre zl nff?
		-- Crgr Gbjafuraq, "Ubj Znal Sevraqf"
%
Gurer'f znal n fyhec g'jvkg gur gvc naq gur mvc.
%
Gurer'f abguvat orggre guna tbbq frk.  Ohg onq frk?  N crnahg ohggre
naq wryyl fnaqjvpu vf orggre guna onq frk.
		-- Ovyyl Wbry
%
Gurer'f abguvat jebat jvgu Nzrevpn gung n tbbq rerpgvba jbhyqa'g pher.
		-- Qnivq Znvebjvgm
%
Gurfr gjb cebwrpg znantref jrer jnyxvat guebhtu n erfvqragvny nern
bar qnl, jura gurl fnj n qbt (nyfb znyr) fvggvat ba n ynja, yvpxvat vgf
pbpx.  (Jul qb qbtf qb gung?  Orpnhfr gurl pna).  Naljnl, gur svefg znantre
ahqtrq gur frpbaq naq fnvq, "Url, ybbx ng gung!  Gung ernyyl ybbxf yvxr sha
-- V jvfu V pbhyq qb gung!"
	Jurerhcba gur frpbaq znantre ercyvrq, "Jryy, V qba'g xabj... V gevrq
vg bapr, naq gur qnza qbt ovg zr!"
%
Gurl jngpurq gur fha fybjyl fvax oruvaq gur uvyyf, naq gur svrel tybj ba
gur ynxr snqr vagb qnexarff. Ur rlrq ure funqbjl svther, nppraghngrq ol
gur zbbayvtug, nf gur grafvba sebz jvguva ortna gb shry uvf navznyvfgvp
qrfverf. Fur sbyybjrq uvz, rire fb dhvrgyl, nf gurl fbhtug n frpyhqrq
pbeare va gur onea.  Nybar!  Ng ynfg.  Uvf unaqf ebnzrq nobhg ure fbsg
onpx, nebhaq gb ure guvtuf, naq svanyyl pnerffrq ure ohqqvat avccyrf.
Bu, ubj fzbbgu naq fhpphyrag fur jnf!  "Jnf vg fb jebat?", ur nfxrq
uvzfrys.  Ab, ur gubhtug, sbe uvf sngure unq qbar vg, nf qvq uvf bja
sngure, nq vasvavghz.  Gur obvyvat, hapbagebyynoyr entr jvguva uvz orpnzr
haornenoyr.  Fur fvtanyyrq ure rntrearff, fcernqvat ure yrtf, nf ur
tenfcrq ure avccyrf ntnva.  Fgebxvat, ntnva naq ntnva, ybatre rnpu gvzr.
Vg ortna pbzvat; ntnva, ntnva, ntnva, ntnva.  Uvf zvaq enprq jvgu srne
"Jvyy vg fgbc?".  Rkunhfgrq, ur ynl qbja orfvqr ure. "Qrne Tbq, jung unir
V qbar?".  Fhqqrayl, uvf sngure ohefg va.  Uvf rlrf ohearq nf ur fgnerq
sbe jung frrzrq na rgreavgl.  Svanyyl, uvf sngure fcbxr.
	"Fba, lbh nva'g fhccbfrq gb zvyx gur qnza pbj gvyy zbeava'!"
%
Guvf thl jnf fperjvat uvf arvtuobef jvsr jura n pne chyyf vagb gur qevir.
"Zl uhfonaq!" fur fpernzf.  Ur cnavpf naq whzcf bhg gur jvaqbj. Ur svaqf
uvzfrys ba gur fgerrg, anxrq, haqre pybhql fxvrf. Gurer vf ab cynpr gb uvqr
rkprcg va n pebjq bs wbttref.  Nf ur ehaf nybat, n jbzna ybbxf bire naq fnlf,
	"Qb lbh nyjnlf wbt va gur ahqr?"
	"Lrf zn'nz!" ur ercyvrf.
	"Qbrf vg nyjnlf erfhyg va gung xvaq bs frkhny rkpvgrzrag?" fur nfxf.
	"Lrf zn'nz!" ur ercyvrf.
	"Qb lbh nyjnlf jrne n pbaqbz?"
	"Bayl jura vg envaf, ynql.  Bayl jura vg envaf."
%
Guvf vf n grfg bs gur rzretrapl phaavyvathf flfgrz. Vs guvf unq orra na
npghny rzretrapl, lbh jbhyq unir xabja vg!
%
Guvf flfgrz tbrf qbja zber bsgra guna n gjb-qbyyne juber.
%
Guvf gvzr vg'f sbe ybir; arkg gvzr vg'f $100.00.
%
Gubh funyg abg bzvg nqhygrel.
%
Guerr tnl thlf jrer qvfphffvat jung gurl gubhtug gurve snibevgr fcbeg jbhyq
or.  Gur svefg qrpvqrf ba sbbgonyy, 'pnhfr bs nyy gubfr tbetrbhf thlf oraqvat
bire va gurve gvtug cnagf.
	"Qrsvavgryl jerfgyvat," fvtuf gur frpbaq thl.  "Gubfr fxvzcl yvggyr
pbfghzrf, naq guvax bs gur ubyqf."
	"Qrsvavgryl onfronyy," fnlf gur guveq thl.  "Jul?  Jryy, V'q or
cvgpuvat jvgu gur onfrf ybnqrq, gur onggre jbhyq uvg n fnintr bar-ubccre
evtug gb zr, V'q pngpu vg, naq V'q whfg fgnaq gurer juvyr gur bgure thlf
ebhaqrq gur onfrf.  Zrnajuvyr, gur pebjq jbhyq or tbvat penml, fpernzvat,
`Guebj gur onyy, lbh pbpxfhpxre!' naq gung'f jung V yvxr -- erpbtavgvba!"
%
Guerr zvahgrf bs frevbhf frk naq V arrq rvtug ubhef bs fyrrc naq
n objy bs Jurngvrf.
		-- Evpuneq Celbe
%
Guerr jbzra nyjnlf unat gurve ynhaqel bhg va gur onpxlneq.  Jura vg envaf,
ubjrire, gur ynhaqel nyjnlf trgf jrg.  Nyy gur ynhaqel, gung vf, rkprcg
sbe Ynhevr'f.  Ynhevr arire frrzf gb unir ure ynhaqel bhg jura vg envaf.
	Fb, bar qnl, gurl ner nyy bhg va gur onpxlneq chggvat gurve pybgurf
ba gur yvar jura bar bs gur jbzra fnlf gb Ynhevr, "Ynhevr, ubj pbzr jura vg
arire envaf jura lbh unir lbhe ynhaqel bhg?"
	"Jryy," ercyvrf Ynhevr, "jura V jnxr hc va gur zbeavat, V purpx bhg
zl uhfonaq Cnhy.  Vs uvf cravf vf unatvat bire uvf evtug yrt, V xabj vg'f
tbvat gb or n terng qnl.  Vs uvf cravf vf unatvat bire uvf yrsg yrt, V xabj
vg zvtug enva.  V qba'g xabj jul vg jbexf, ohg ur'f arire orra jebat!"
	"Ynhevr, jung vs ur unf na rerpgvba?" nfxf gur bgure jbzna.
	"Ubarl, ba n qnl yvxr *gung*, lbh qba'g qb gur *ynhaqel."
%
Guerr lbhat jbzra jrer nggraqvat gur fnzr ybtvp pynff tvira ng bar bs gur 
orggre havirefvgvrf.  Qhevat n yrpgher gur cebsrffbe fgngrq gung ur jnf 
tbvat gb grfg gurve novyvgl ng fvghngvba ernfbavat.
	"Yrg hf nffhzr," fnvq gur cebs, "gung lbh ner nobneq n fznyy pensg
nybar va gur Cnpvsvp, naq lbh fcbg n irffry nccebnpuvat lbh jvgu frireny
frk-fgneirq fnvybef ba obneq.  Jung jbhyq lbh qb va guvf fvghngvba gb nibvq
gur ceboyrz?"
	"V jbhyq nggrzcg gb ghea zl pensg va gur bccbfvgr qverpgvba naq
syrr," fnvq gur svefg tvey.
	"V jbhyq cnff gurz, naq ubcr gung V pbhyq sraq gurz bss," erfcbaqrq
gur frpbaq jbzna.
	"Senaxyl," zhezherq gur guveq jbzna, "V haqrefgnaq gur fvghngvba,
ohg V snvy gb frr gur ceboyrz."
%
Guebhtu n znwbe ohernhpengvp reebe, lbh ner znqr pbhagl pbebare.
Lbh frevbhfyl pbafvqre gur wbo orpnhfr vg tvirf lbh:

	1: Ybgf bs hapynvzrq jrqqvat evatf naq jngpurf.
	2: Ybgf bs tbyq svyyvatf naq oevqtrf.
	3: Serr oybbq.
	4: N pbafgnagyl punatvat neenl bs arj sevraqf jub nera'g ng
	   nyy fghssl nobhg jung unccraf gb gurve travgnyvn.
%
Gb n Erny Jbzna, rirel rwnphyngvba vf cerzngher.
%
Gb or gur xvaq bs tvey qrfvtarq gb or xvffrq orgjrra gur guvtuf.
%
Gb jva n jbzna va gur svefg cynpr bar zhfg cyrnfr ure, gura haqerff ure, naq
gura fbzrubj trg ure pybgurf onpx ba ure.  Svanyyl, fb fur jvyy nyybj lbh
gb yrnir ure, lbh'ir tbg gb naabl ure.
		-- Wrna Tvenhqbhk, "Nzcuvgelba 38"
%
Gev Qrygf; rirelbar ryfr unf.
%
Gjb ohqqvrf unq orra bhg qevaxvat sbe ubhef jura gurve zbarl svanyyl 
ena bhg.  "V unir na vqrn," pebnxrq Ny.  "Yrfu tb bire gb zl ubhfu naq obeebj
fuhz zbarl sebz zl jvsr."
	Gur gjb bs gurz erryrq vagb Ny'f yvivat ebbz, fanccrq ba gur yvtug, 
naq yb naq orubyq, gurer jnf Ny'f jvsr znxvat ybir ba gur fbsn gb nabgure zna.
Guvf fgngr bs nssnvef pbafvqrenoyl haareirq Ny'f sevraq ohg qvqa'g frrz gb 
nssrpg gur uhfonaq.
	"Funl, qrne, lbh unir nal zbarl sbe lbhe rire-ybiva' uhfuona'?" ur
nfxrq.
	"Lrf, lrf," fur fanccrq.  "Gnxr zl chefr sebz gur znagyr, naq sbe
Crgr'f fnxr, ghea bss gubfr yvtugf."
	Bhgfvqr gurl rknzvarq gur chefr, naq Ny cebhqyl naabhaprq, "Gurer'f 
rabhtu urer sbe n cvag sbe lbh naq n cvag sbe zr.  Cerggl tbbq, ru, byq ohqql?"
	"Ohg, Ny," cebgrfgrq uvf sevraq, fbzrjung fborerq ol gur fcrpgnpyr
ur'q whfg jvgarffrq, "jung nobhg gung sryybj onpx gurer jvgu lbhe jvsr?"
	"Gur uryy jvgu uvz," ercyvrq Ny.  "Yrg uvz ohl uvf bja cvag."
%
Gjb ybatgvzr sevraqf fvccrq Fpbgpu va n ybpny one naq gnyxrq nobhg 
gurve gebhoyrf.  "Naq ba gbc bs rirelguvat ryfr," fnvq gur svefg, "zl jvsr
unf phg zr qbja gb whfg bapr n jrrx."
	"Gung'f gbb onq," nterrq uvf sevraq, "ohg vg pbhyq or jbefr.  V xabj 
gjb thlf fur'f phg bss nygbtrgure.
%
Gjb zra jrer fgnaqvat nebhaq gnyxvat juvyr arneol n ynetr Trezna Furcureq
ynl yvpxvat uvf onyyf.  Bar zna fnlf gb gur bgure, "Qnza, V jvfu V pbhyq
qb gung."
	Gur bgure zna ercyvrf, "Jryy, vg'f bxnl ol zr, ohg V guvax lbh
bhtug gb trg gb xabj uvz n yvggyr svefg."
%
Gjb zra, obgu pybfr gb ergverzrag, ner jbexvat ba gur nffrzoyl yvar.  Bar
obnfgf gb gur bgure, "Ynfg avtug V znqr ybir gb zl jvsr *guerr* gvzrf!"
	"Guerr gvzrf!", ercyvrf uvf sevraq.  "Ubj qvq lbh qb vg?"
	"Jryy," fnlf gur svefg zna, "V znqr ybir gb zl jvsr naq frg gur
nynez pybpx sbe gjb ubhef yngre.  Jura vg jrag bss jr znqr ybir ntnva.
Gura, V erfrg vg sbe gur zbeavat naq jr znqr ybir bapr zber orsber V pnzr
gb jbex.  V srry yvxr n ohyy!"
	Uvf sevraq fnlf, "Jryy, gung *vf* snagnfgvp!  V'z tbvat gb unir
gb tvir vg n gel."  Fb, ur tbrf ubzr gung avtug naq znxrf ybir gb uvf
jvsr.  Svthevat ur qbrfa'g arrq gb frg gur nynez pybpx, ur frggyrf bss
gb fyrrc.  Jnxvat hc n srj ubhef yngre, ur ahqtrf uvf jvsr naq gurl znxr ybir
ntnva.  Jnxvat hc va gur zbeavat ur znxrf ybir gb uvf jvsr sbe gur guveq
gvzr.  Ybbxvat bire ng gur pybpx ur ernyvmrf gung ur'f gjragl zvahgrf yngr
sbe jbex.  Ur guebjf ba uvf pybgurf naq ehaf qbja gb gur fhojnl.  Jura
ur trgf gb gur snpgbel uvf obff vf fgnaqvat gurer jnvgvat.
	"Senax", ur fnlf, "V'ir orra jbexvat sbe lbh sbe 18 lrnef, naq V'ir
arire orra yngr orsber.  Lbh'ir tbg gb sbetvir zr gjragl zvahgrf guvf bapr!"
	"Jryy," ercyvrf uvf obff, "bxnl, ohg vg'f abg gur gjragl zvahgrf
gung unq zr jbeevrq.  Jurer jrer lbh Ghrfqnl, jurer jrer lbh Jrqarfqnl..."
%
Gjb zvqtrgf neevirq ng gur pbairag qbbe naq nfxrq gb fcrnx jvgu gur Zbgure
Fhcrevbe.  Yrq vagb ure bssvpr, gur svefg bar nfxrq erfcrpgshyyl "Rkphfr
zr, lbhe ubyvarff, ohg ner gurer nal zvqtrg ahaf va guvf pbairag?"
	Erprvivat n ercyl gb gur artngvir, ur nfxrq jurgure nal zvqtrg
ahaf jrer gb or sbhaq va nal bs gur arvtuobevat cnevfu.  Ntnva gur ercyl
jnf ab.
	Gur gval zna fpengpurq uvf urnq naq cbfrq n svany dhrfgvba.  "Orttva'
lbhe cneqba, Zbgure Fhcrevbe, ohg jbhyq lbh xabj bs *nal* zvqtrg ahaf ng
nyy, naljurer?"  Gur aha fubbx ure urnq.
	Ng juvpu gur svefg zvqtrg ghearq gb gur frpbaq zvqtrg, chg uvf unaq
ba uvf fubhyqre, naq fnvq, "Lbh frr, V gbyq lbh lbh shpxrq n crathva!"
%
Gjb ahaf, n zbgure fhcrevbe naq n arj aha, ner jnyxvat ubzr bar avtug sebz
puhepu jura gurl ner nggnpxrq ol gjb ivpvbhf encvfgf.  Gur gjb zra qent gur
ahaf bss vagb gur ohfurf naq cebprrq gb unir gurve jnl jvgu gurz.  Gur zbgure
fhcrevbe vf irel nsenvq, ohg fur xabjf gung Tbq jvyy cebgrpg ure.  Gb fubj ure
fgeratgu naq gehfg va Tbq fur lryyf bhg "Sbetvir uvz Sngure, sbe ur xabjf abg
jung ur qbrf!"

Gb juvpu gur lbhat aha ercyvrf "Bbbbbu, zvar qbrf!!"
%
Gjb byq zra ner jnyxvat qbja gur obneqjnyx jura bar bs gurz gryyf gur bgure
gung ur unf gb yrnir, uvf jvsr vf rkcrpgvat uvz gb pbzr ubzr naq znxr ybir
jvgu ure.
	Gur bgure zna vf nfgbavfurq.  "Znxr ybir gb lbhe jvsr?  Lbh'er nf byq
nf V nz!  Arneyl rvtugl lrnef byq!  Jung qb lbh zrna lbh unir gb tb ubzr naq
znxr ybir gb lbhe jvsr?"
	Gur svefg zna fzvyrf naq fnlf, "Jr unir n *terng* frk yvsr.  Jr znxr
ybir rirel qnl."
	"Lbh'er xvqqvat!" fnlf uvf sevraq.  "Ubj qb lbh qb vg?"
	"Chzcreavpxry oernq.  Gung'f gur frperg."  Naq ur qnfurf bss ubzr.
	Gur bgure zna fgnegf gb jnyx ubzr.  "Uzzz," ur guvaxf gb uvzfrys
chzcreavpxry oernq.  Jryy, vg'f jbegu n gel."  Fb ur tbrf vagb n arneol
onxrel.
	Tbvat hc gb gur jbzna ng gur pbhagre, ur nfxf sbe gurve ragver fgbpx
bs chzcreavpxry oernq.  Gur jbzna fgnerf ng uvz va nfgbavfuzrag.  "Lbh jnag
nyy gur chzcreavpxry oernq jr unir?  Ner lbh fher?  Qba'g lbh xabj gung vg
jvyy trg uneq?"
	"Ubj pbzr," qrznaqf gur zna, "rirelobql xabjf nobhg guvf ohg zr?"
%
Gjb jbzra ner gnyxvat; bar fnlf gb gur bgure, "Fnl, jrera'g lbh qngvat gung
phgr Serapu ubea cynlre?  Jung rire unccrarq gb uvz?"
	"Jryy," ercyvrf ure sevraq, jr'er fgvyy frrvat rnpu bgure, ohg,
V zhfg nqzvg, jr'ir unq fbzr ceboyrzf."
	"Ceboyrzf?  Jung'f jebat?"
	"Lbh frr," fnlf gur frpbaq jbzna, "rirel gvzr ur xvffrf zr, ur
jnagf gb fubir uvf svfg hc zl nff."
%
Gjb jbzra jrer jnyxvat qbja gur fgerrg, jura bar ahqtrf gur bgure naq fnlf,
"Gurer'f zl uhfonaq pbzvat bhg bs gur sybevfg'f jvgu n qbmra ebfrf, qnza vg.
Gung zrnaf V'yy unir gb xrrc zl yrtf hc va gur nve sbe guerr qnlf."

Ercyvrf ure sevraq, "Jryy, jul qba'g lbh ohl n infr?"
%
	Gjb lbhat zra frngrq va n erfgnhenag jrer jngpuvat n phfgbzre ohfvyl
qvfcbfvat bs n cyngr bs blfgref ba gur unys furyy.  Bar bs gur lbhat
zra erznexrq gb uvf sevraq,
	"Qvq lbh rire urne gung ohfvarff nobhg enj blfgref orvat
tbbq sbe n zna'f ivevyvgl?"
	"Lrf, jul?" gur sevraq ercyvrq.
	"Jryy, gnxr vg sebz zr, gung'f n ybg bs sbbyvfuarff.  V ngr n
qbmra bs gurz gur bgure avtug, naq bayl avar jbexrq."
%
Havk cebtenzzref qb vg jvgu cvcrf.
%
Hfre sevraqyl fbsgjner frnepuvat sbe sevraqyl Uneqjner gb vagresnpr jvgu.
Uneqjner znl cerfrag vgfrys va sybccl sbezng nf fbsgjner unf pncnovyvgl gb
hctenqvat fnzr gb shyy fvmr svez.  Fvmr vf abg nyy gung vzcbegnag; ohg olgr
fvmrq onaqjvgu erdhverq -- urnqre jvqgu vf bs zber pbaprea.  Wblfgvpx fubhyq
or noyr gb gbttyr va qvssrerag fcrrqf naq sbe fbzr qhengvba.  Fbsgjner vf
ybbxvat sbe flfgrz jvyyvat gb cresbez vagrafvir znavchyngvba bs xrlobneq nf
jryy nf cercnevat gur znvasenzr naq qvfx qevirf.  Svatrevat bs nyy svyrf
crezvggrq, naq rapbhentrq, orsber guehfgvat wblfgvpx vagb qevir.  Fbsgjner
vf cebtenzzrq abg gb pbcl; gurer vf ab arrq sbe erzbivat wblfgvpx orsber
pbzcyrgrq rkrphgvba bs cebtenz.  Cebtenz znl or eha frireny gvzrf cre qnl...
rfcrpvnyyl vs fcrpvny srngherf naq bcgvbaf ner hgvyvmrq.
%
Inaqnyvfz Ba Gur Hcfjvat!
	Ynfg avtug, jvaqbjf jrer oebxra naq tenssvgv jnf fcenlrq bire gur
	sebag bs gur ybpny frk fubc, Yr Frk Obhgvdhr, pnhfvat frireny uhaqerq
	qbyynef va qnzntr.  Va n yngre nabalzbhf cubar pnyy, gur cebivfvbany
	jvat bs gur Fnyingvba Nezl pynvzrq erfcbafvovyvgl.
%
Irtrgnevnaf sbe beny frk -- "Gur bayl zrng gung'f svg gb rng"
%
Ivqv, ivpv, irav.
(V fnj, V pbadhrerq, V pnzr.)
%
Jr qebir gb gur ubgry naq fnvq tbbqolr.  Ubj ulcbpevgvpny gb tb hcfgnvef
jvgu n zna lbh qba'g jnag gb shpx, yrnir gur bar lbh qb fvggvat gurer nybar,
naq gura, va n fgngr bs terng rkpvgrzrag, shpx gur bar lbh qba'g jnag gb
shpx juvyr cergraqvat ur'f gur bar lbh qb.  Gung'f pnyyrq svqryvgl.  Gung'f
pnyyrq pvivyvmngvba naq vgf qvfpbagragf.
		-- Revpn Wbat, "Srne bs Sylvat"
%
Jr unir ernfba gb oryvrir gung zna svefg jnyxrq hcevtug gb serr uvf unaqf
sbe znfgheongvba.
		-- Yvyl Gbzyva
%
Jr znl riraghnyyl pbzr gb ernyvmr gung punfgvgl vf ab zber n iveghr
guna znyahgevgvba.
		-- Nyrk Pbzsbeg
%
Jr'ir nyy urneq nobhg gur jbzna jub zneevrq n Svryq Freivpr ratvarre ohg
qvibeprq uvz nsgre bar qnl orpnhfr ur'q qbar abguvat ba gurve jrqqvat avtug
ohg cebzvfr gb unir vg hc va 15 zvahgrf.  Jung srj crbcyr ernyvmr vf gung gur
cbbe zna jnf va gur onguebbz nyy avtug, znfgheongvat shevbhfyl, zhggrevat
"V whfg qba'g haqrefgnaq, vg cnffrf nyy gur qvntabfgvpf!"
%
"Jr'ir tbg guvatf jryy va unaq."
		-- Znfgre Olgr Fbsgjner, Ybf Tngbf Pnyvsbeavn.
%
Jr'ir whfg erpvrirq gur erfhygf bs n fheirl pbaqhpgrq gb nfpregnva gur
inevbhf ernfbaf zra trg bhg bs orq va gur zvqqyr bs gur avtug.  Nppbeqvat
gb gur ercbeg, 2% ner zbgvingrq ol n qrfver gb ivfvg gur onguebbz, naq
3% unir na hetr gb envq gur ersevtrengbe.  Gur bgure 95% trg hc gb tb ubzr.
%
Jrypbzr gb Sbeghar Oynpxznvy!!
	Zf. Xng****** Oy****na vf gur zvfgerff bs n jryy-xabja
	onaxre va Ubhfgba, Grknf.  Gung'f $5000, cyrnfr, gb fgbc
	hf sebz erirnyvat obgu bs lbhe anzrf, Ze. Y*****, fb gung
	lbhe jvsr Qberra, naq lbhe ybiryl puvyqera Qvnar, Wnavpr
	naq Gbz arrq arire xabj gur anzr bs lbhe zvfgerff.  Lbh
	unir gjb qnlf gb ernpu hf ng:

		Sbeghar Oynpxznvy
		Oruvaq gur ubg jngre cvcrf,
		Guveq fgnyy sebz gur raq,
		Terlubhaq Ohf Grezvany, Snlrggr ZB.
%
Jrypbzr gb Sbeghar Oynpxznvy!!
	Guvf vf gur svefg bs n frevrf bs eriryngvbaf juvpu pbhyq
	nqq hc gb n qvibepr, cerzngher ergverzrag naq cbffvoyr
	pevzvany cebprrqvatf sbe n pbzcnal ivpr-cerfvqrag va Ynatyrl Ivetvavn.
	Fb, Ze. F*****, $10,000 cyrnfr gb fgbc hf sebz erirnyvat:
		1: Jubfr fubhyqref lbh jrer fvggvat ba.
		2: Jung lbh jrer qbvat.
		3: Gur anzrf bs gur guerr crbcyr vaibyirq.
		4: Gur lbhgu betnavmngvba gb juvpu gurl orybatrq.
		5: Gur fubc jurer lbh obhtug gur rdhvczrag.
%
Jryy, qvqwn jnxr hc tebhpul be qvq lbh yrg ure fyrrc?
%
Jryy, frr, V jnf bhg jvgu guvf puvpx ynfg avtug, naq jr jrer va orq, naq
fur tebnarq gb zr, "Tvir zr avar vapurf, naq znxr vg uheg!"  Fb, V shpxrq
ure gjvpr naq fynccrq ure.
%
Jryy, frr, Wblpr, gurer jr jrer, genccrq va gur ryringbe.  Abj, V unq
zl graavf enpdhrg naq gur tbyqsvfu; fur jnf ubyqvat gur Pevfpb.  Fheryl
lbh pna vzntvar ubj bar guvat anghenyyl yrq gb nabgure!
%
Jryy, lbh nyzbfg tbg vg evtug.  Gur bayl ceboyrz vf, lbh'er qbvat vg rknpgyl
onpxjneqf!  Whfg erirefr gur zbgvbaf lbh qrfpevorq naq lbhe cnegare jvyy
rkcrevrapr na vaperqvoyl vagrafr betnfz.  Bar gebhoyr jvgu guvf grpuavdhr,
gubhtu, vf gung vg jbexf fb jryy.  Oryvrir zr, jbeq jvyy trg nebhaq nobhg
lbhe arjsbhaq cebjrff naq lbh'yy or vahaqngrq ol cebfcrpgvir frkhny cnegaref.
Fb gel gb or qvfperrg.  V cersre zncyr flehc gb cvarnccyr/ncevpbg ybgvba, ohg
gung'f n znggre bs crefbany cersrerapr.  Nyfb, V'q nqivfr ntnvafg gur flehc,
be hfvat ubarl, vs lbh'er bhgfvqr, orpnhfr gur vafrpgf vg nggenpgf graq gb
qvfgenpg gur dhnvy.  Lbh pna fhofgvghgr penml tyhr (ohg boivbhfyl abg guhzo
gnpxf!) sbe gur znfxvat gncr, ohg bayl vs lbh qba'g jnag gb hfr gur cvnab sbe
njuvyr.
%
Jrer vg abg sbe vzntvangvba, fve, n zna jbhyq or nf unccl va gur nezf
bs n punzoreznvq nf n qhpurff.
		-- Qe. Wbuafba
%
Jung perngherf bs unovg jr ner.  Guvf zbeavat, jvgubhg guvaxvat, unys nfyrrc,
V chg $100 ba zl cvyybj.  Gung'f abg fb onq, ab bar jbhyq jbeel nobhg vg, ohg
zl jvsr, unys nfyrrc, jvgubhg guvaxvat, tnir zr $20 punatr.
%
Jung vf n cebzvfphbhf crefba -- vg'f hfhnyyl fbzrbar jub vf trggvat zber
frk guna lbh ner.
		-- Ivpgbe Ybjarf, dhbgrq va "Va naq Bhg: Qroergg 1980-81",
		   ol A. Znpxjbbq
%
Jung guvf qrcnegzrag arrqf vf n ernyyl tbbq vasyngnoyr qbyy.
%
Jungrire ryfr pna or fnvq nobhg frk, vg pnaabg or pnyyrq n qvtavsvrq
cresbeznapr.
		-- Uryra Ynjerafba
%
Jungrire unccrarq gb gur tbbq byq qnlf jura frk jnf qvegl naq gur nve jnf pyrna?
%
Jungrire lbh fnl nobhg cbeabtencul, frk vf urer gb fgnl.
%
Jura n tvey nqzvgf fur'f unq n purpxrerq pnerre, vg'f lbhe zbir.
%
Jura orggre jbzra ner znqr, pbzchgre cebtenzzref jvyy znxr gurz.
%
Jura Obl Fpbhgf qb vg, vg'f vagrafr.
%
Jura uvf pbzcnal sryy ba uneq gvzrf, gur obff ernyvmrq gung ur'q unir gb
ynl bss bar bs uvf gjb zvqqyr znantref.  Nf obgu Wnpx naq Yvm jrer rdhnyyl
ubarfg naq qrqvpngrq gb gurve wbof, ur jnf hanoyr gb qrpvqr juvpu bar gb
sver.  Gb erfbyir uvf qvyrzzn, gur obff neovgenevyl qrpvqrq gung gur svefg
gb yrnir uvf be ure qrfx gur arkg zbeavat jbhyq or gur bar gb trg gur nk.
	Gur arkg zbeavat sbhaq Yvm ng ure qrfx, ehoovat ure grzcyrf.  Nfxvat
Wnpx sbe fbzr nfcveva, fur urnqrq sbe gur jngre sbhagnva naq gung'f jurer
gur obff pnhtug hc jvgu ure.  "V'ir tbg fbzr onq arjf sbe lbh, Yvm," ur fnvq.
"V'ir tbg gb ynl lbh be Wnpx bss."
	"Wnpx bss," fur fanccrq.  "V unir n urnqnpur."
%
Jura V fnvq "jr", bssvpre, V jnf ersreevat gb zlfrys, gur sbhe lbhat
ynqvrf, naq, bs pbhefr, gur tbng.
%
Jura Fabj Juvgr gheaf ba jvgu gur qjnesf fur cebonoyl jvaqf hc srryvat Qbcrl.
%
Jura gur anvir lbhat ynql nfxrq gur pyrex va Yr Frk Fubccr gb fubj ure uvf
fryrpgvba bs ivoengbef, ur oebhtug bhg gur gjb zbfg cbchyne barf.
	"Gur onfvp juvgr cynfgvp bar urer vf gjragl qbyynef," gur pyrex fnvq.
"Gur syrfu-gbarq ehoore zbqryf ner guvegl."
	"V'z whfg abg fher," gur jbzna fnvq,  Gura fur abgvprq na rlr-pngpuvat
vgrz ba gur onpx furys.  "Ubj zhpu vf gung cynvq bar bire gurer?
	"Hu, jryy, gung'f n cerggl fcrpvny bar," fnvq gur pyrex.  "V pbhyqa'g
fryy lbh gung bar sbe yrff guna n uhaqerq."
	"V'yy gnxr vg."
	Yngre gung qnl, gur fgber bjare purpxrq va gb frr ubj ohfvarff jnf
tbvat.  "Terng," gur pyrex gbyq uvz.  "Guvf zbeavat, V fbyq sbhe juvgr
ivoengbef naq guerr syrfu-gbarq barf.  Naq, guvf nsgreabba, V tbg n uhaqerq
ohpxf sbe zl Gurezbf."
%
Jura gur cevpx fgnaqf hc, gur oenvaf trg ohevrq va gur tebhaq.
		-- Byq Wrjvfu fnlvat

[Ubj pbzr gurer nera'g rire nal "Arj Wrjvfu fnlvatf?"  Rq.]
%
Jura gur fhetrba pnzr gb frr ure ba gur zbeavat nsgre ure bcrengvba, gur
lbhat jbzna nfxrq ure fbzrjung urfvgnagyl ubj ybat vg jbhyq or orsber fur
pbhyq erfhzr ure frk yvsr.  "V ernyyl unira'g gubhtug nobhg vg," thycrq
gur fghaarq fhetrba.  "Lbh'er gur svefg cngvrag jub'f nfxrq zr gung nsgre
n gbafvyyrpgbzl!"
%
Jura lbh frr fbzrbar npebff gur ebbz naq fhqqrayl xabj sbe n snpg
gung ur'f gur zbfg jbaqreshy zna ba rnegu, lbh'ir tbg vafgnag yhfg ba lbhe
unaqf.  Fbzrguvat nobhg gur jnl uvf gvr vf xabggrq vf vasvavgryl vagevthvat
gb lbh, naq gur fjryy bs uvf ovprc pnhfrf vaare ghezbvy.  Guvf vf n unccl
ohg syrrgvat fgngr bs nssnvef.  Hfhnyyl lbhe srryvatf qvr nobhg guvegl
frpbaqf nsgre lbh trg hc gur pbhentr gb nfx uvz sbe gur gvzr, fvapr nyzbfg
vainevnoyl ur pna'g fcrnx Ratyvfu, naq vs ur pna, ur nyjnlf fnlf, "Jul,
fher, yvggyr ynql, vg'f ryrira-guvegl.  Jnaan trg uvtu?

Qba'g obgure guvaxvat gung vafgnag yhfg jvyy ghea vagb gur erny guvat.  Vg znl,
ohg gura lbh znl nyfb jnxr hc bar zbeavat gb svaq lbh'er gur Dhrra bs Ehznavn.
		-- Plaguvn Urzvry, "Frk Gvcf sbe Tveyf"
%
Jurarire fbzrbar gryyf lbh gb "gnxr vg yvxr n zna" vg hfhnyyl zrnaf hc lbhe nff.
%
	"Jurer'q fur trg gubfr pebj'f srrg?"
	"Lbh ernyyl jnag gb xabj?"
	"Lrnu."
	"Sebz fdhvagvat naq fpernzvat, 'Fhpx jung!?'"
%
Juvpu bs gur sbyybjvat qbrfa'g orybat?
	n. zrng
	o. rttf
	p. qehz
	q. oybjwbo.

Nafjre:
	q:  N oybjwbo, orpnhfr lbh pna orng lbhe zrng, lbhe rttf,
	    be lbhe qehz, ohg lbh whfg pna'g orng n oybjwbo.
%
Juvyr snezref trarenyyl nyybj bar ebbfgre sbe gra uraf, gra zra ner
fpnepryl fhssvpvrag gb freivpr bar jbzna.
		-- Obppnppvb
%
	Juvyr uhagvat, n zna fnj n ornhgvshy ahqr jbzna pbzr ehaavat bhg bs
gur jbbqf naq qvfnccrne npebff gur pyrnevat.  Whfg nf fur tbg bhg bs fvtug, 
guerr zra qerffrq va juvgr havsbezf pnzr ehaavat bhg bs gur fnzr jbbqf.
"Url, lbh," lryyrq bar bs gurz, "qvq lbh frr n jbzna pbzr ol urer?"
	"Lrf," ercyvrq gur uhagre.  "Jung'f gur gebhoyr?"
	"Fur'f na vazngr bs gur pbhagl nflyhz, naq trgf ybbfr rirel abj naq
gura.  Jr'er gelvat gb pngpu ure."
	"V pna haqrefgnaq gung," fnvq gur uhagre, "Ohg jul vf bar bs lbh
pneelvat n ohpxrg bs fnaq?"
	"Gung'f uvf unaqvpnc," fnvq gur fcbxrfzna, "ur pnhtug ure ynfg gvzr."
%
Juvyr abg npghnyyl n fnvybe, V pregnvayl rawbl trggvat oybja nfuber.
%
Juvyr inpngvbavat ynfg fhzzre va gur Abegu Jbbqf, n lbhat sryybj gubhtug vg
zvtug or n tbbq vqrn gb jevgr uvf tvey.  Ur unq oebhtug ab fgngvbarel jvgu
uvz, ubjrire; fb ur unq gb jnyx vagb gbja sbe fbzr.  Ragrevat gur bar naq
bayl trareny fgber, ur qvfpbirerq gung gur pyrex jnf n lbhat, shyy-oybja snez
tvey jvgu ynathbebhf rlrf.
	"Qb lbh xrrc fgngvbarel?" ur nfxrq.
	"Jryy," fur tvttyrq, "V qb hagvy gur ynfg srj frpbaqf, naq gura V
whfg tb jvyq."
%
Juvyr ivfvgvat bhe pbhagel, n ybiryl Serapu znvqra sbhaq urefrys
bhg bs zbarl whfg nf ure ivfn rkcverq.  Hanoyr gb cnl ure cnffntr onpx gb
Senapr, fur jnf va qrfcnve hagvy na ragrecevfvat fnvybe znqr ure n fcbegvat
cebcbfvgvba.  "Zl fuvc vf fnvyvat gbavtug," ur fnvq.  "V'yy fzhttyr lbh
nobneq, uvqr lbh qbja va gur ubyq naq cebivqr lbh jvgu n znggerff, oynaxrgf
naq sbbq.  Nyy vg jvyy pbfg lbh vf n yvggyr ybir."
	Gur tvey pbafragrq, naq yngr gung avtug gur fnvybe farnxrq ure ba
obneq uvf irffry.  Gjvpr rnpu qnl gurernsgre, gur fnvybe fzhttyrq n ynetr
genl bs sbbq orybj qrpxf, gbbx uvf cyrnfher jvgu gur yvggyr Serapu fgbjnjnl
naq qrcnegrq.  Gur qnlf ghearq vagb jrrxf, naq gur jrrxf zvtug unir ghearq
vagb zbaguf vs gur pncgnva unqa'g abgvprq gur fnvybe pneelvat sbbq orybj bar
riravat naq sbyybjrq uvz.  Nsgre jvgarffvat guvf havdhr ovg bs onegre, ur
jnvgrq hagvy gur fnvybe unq qrcnegrq naq gura pbasebagrq gur tvey, qrznaqvat
na rkcynangvba.  Fur gbyq uvz gur jubyr fgbel.
	"Uzzz," zhfrq gur pncgvna.  "N pyrire neenatrzrag, naq V zhfg fnl V
nqzver gung lbhat frnzna'f vatrahvgl.  Ubjrire, zvff, V srry vg vf bayl snve
gb gryy lbh gung guvf vf gur Fgngra Vfynaq Sreel."
%
Jubrire anzrq vg "arpxvat" jnf n cbbe whqtr bs nangbzl.
		-- Tebhpub Znek
%
	"Jul qvq lbh fcraq fb zhpu gvzr cnexrq va gung sryybj'f pne ynfg
avtug?" qrznaqrq gur vengr zbgure. "V pbhyq urne gur tvttyvat naq fdhrnyvat
sbe n tbbq unys ubhe."
	"Ohg, Zbz," nafjrerq ure qnhtugre, "vs n sryybj gnxrf lbh gb gur
zbivrf lbh bhtug gb ng yrnfg xvff uvz tbbq avtug."
	"V gubhtug lbh jrag gb gur Fgbex Pyho?" pbhagrerq gur zbgure.
	"Jr qvq."
%
Jul zneel n ivetva?  Vs fur jnfa'g tbbq rabhtu sbe gur erfg bs gurz
gura fur vfa'g tbbq rabhtu sbe lbh.
%
Jul, Tbbq Zbeavat!  V'z gur oyhroveq bs sryyngvb!
%
Jvgu n ohfury bs nccyrf, lbh pna unir n uryy bs n gvzr jvgu gur qbpgbe'f jvsr.
%
	Jvgu qrrc pbaprea, vs abg nynez, Qvpx abgrq gung uvf sevraq
Pbaenq jnf qehaxre guna ur'q rire frra uvz orsber.  "Jung'f gur gebhoyr,
ohqql?", ur nfxrq, fyvqvat bagb gur fgbby arkg gb uvf sevraq.
	"Vg'f n jbzna, Qvpx," Pbaenq ercyvrq.
	"V thrffrq gung zhpu.  Gryy zr nobhg vg."
	"V pna'g," Pbaenq fnvq.  Ohg nsgre n srj zber qevaxf uvf gbathr
naq erfbyhgvba obgu frrzrq gb jrnxra naq, gheavat gb uvf ohqql, ur fnvq,
"Bxnl. Vg'f lbhe jvsr."
	"Zl jvsr!!"
	"Lrnu."
	"Jung nobhg ure?"
	Pbaenq cbaqrerq gur dhrfgvba urnivyl, naq qencrq uvf nez nebhaq
uvf cny.  "Jryy, ohqql-obl," ur fnvq, "V'z nsenvq fur'f purngvat ba hf."
%
Jbzra guvax bs orvat n zna nf n tvsg.  Vg vf n qhgl.  Rira znxvat ybir pna
or n qhgl.  N zna unf nyjnlf tbg gb trg vg hc, naq ybir vfa'g nyjnlf rabhtu.
		-- Abezna Znvyre
%
Jbzra Havgr!  Znxr *___uvz* fyrrc va gur jrg fcbg gbavtug!
%
Jbexvat urer vf yvxr n certanapl.  Nsgre avar zbaguf lbh jvfu lbh unqa'g pbzr.
%
Jevgref qb vg orgjrra crevbqf.
%
"Lrnu, V hfrq gb or vagb arpebcuryvn, orfgvnyvgl naq fnqvfz, ohg gura V
ernyvmrq V jnf whfg sybttvat n qrnq ubefr."
%
"Lrf, fve, gur objyvat onyy avccyr evatf va oynpx.  Jvyy gurer
or nalguvat ryfr?"
%
Lbh ner n gbjre bs fgeratgu va gur bssvpr, ohg bayl fb-fb va orq.
%
Lbh ner ybirq ol gur zhygvghqrf.  Unir lbh orra gb gur pyvavp yngryl?
%
Lbh orggre oryvrir gung znevwhnan pna pnhfr pnfgengvba.  Whfg fhccbfr
lbhe tveysevraq trgf gur zhapuvrf!
%
"Lbh pna orng zl zrng, ohg lbh pna'g yvpx zl fnhpr!"
		-- Obff' Evof, Cbegynaq, Bertba
%
Lbh pna trg hfrq gb yvivat ng n ahqvfg pnzc.  Gur svefg guerr qnlf ner gur
uneqrfg.
		-- E. Qervfre
%
Lbh pbzr bhg bs n jbzna naq lbh fcraq gur erfg bs lbhe yvsr gelvat gb
trg onpx vafvqr.
		--  Urngupbgr Jvyyvnzf
%
Lbh zvtug trg pnhtug ubyqvat gur ont.  Fnl fur'f lbhe fvfgre.
%
Lbh crqbcuvyvnp fbqbzvmre bs qhpxyvatf!!
%
	Lbh frr, guvf tvey jnxrf hc bar zbeavat, ebyyf bire naq frrf na
ryrcunag va gur orq jvgu ure.  Nyzbfg va fubpx, fur fnlf, "Qvq V cvpx lbh 
hc va gur one ynfg avtug?"
	"Hu-uhu," gur  ryrcunag ercyvrf.
	"Qvq V oevat lbh ubzr?"
	"Hu-uhu."
	"Qvq jr, hu, sbby nebhaq?"
	"Hu-uhu."
	"Ybeq, V zhfg unir orra gvtug!"
	"Abg nal zber."
%
Lbhe svefg uhfonaq jnf gur bar lbh zneevrq juvyr svezyl oryvrivat gung
gurer ner zber vzcbegnag guvatf va yvsr guna terng frk.
%
Lhpx Sbb.
%
